
HACKING
The Ultimate Hacking for Beginners
How to Hack
1
st Edition
Price : $ 3.99 (USD)
COPYRIGHT NOTICE
© Kevin Smith
This book shall not be copied or reproduced unless you have obtained specific permissions for the
same from the author Kevin Smith. Any unauthorized use, distribution or reproduction of this eBook is
strictly prohibited.
DISCLAIMER
This book has been published for education purpose only. It does not in deem to legitimize certain
steps that may be illegal under applicable law and organization policies in different parts of the
world. This book does not contain any legal permission on what may be deemed as legal. Readers are
advised to examine the privacy policy, organization policies and the laws of respective countries
before taking their own decisions. They cannot rely on the present publication as a defense in any
proceeding. The publisher and author are not liable for any steps that a reader may take based on this
publication and are not responsible for any steps that may have been taken after reading the
publication. Microsoft Windows and any other marks used (Pictures, Screen Shots, etc.) have beenused descriptively as the marks are owned by third parties.
CONTENTS
Click the below chapter links to go to that chapter
CHAPTER 1 : Hacking briefly
CHAPTER 2 : Classification various Kind of hacking
CHAPTER 3 : Computer Security Computer Crime and Intelligence Agency
CHAPTER 4 : Network systems and DNS working
CHAPTER 5 : Various Types of Hacking attacks
CHAPTER 6 : Hacking Tools
CHAPTER 7 : Malware : A hackers Henchman
CHAPTER 8 : Common Attacks and Viruses
CHAPTER 9 : Password cracking and How to hack an Email password?
CHAPTER 10 : Penetration Testing
CHAPTER 11 : Windows Hacking Tricks
CHAPTER 12 : Internet Hacking Tricks
__________________________________
CHAPTER 1
Hacking briefly
__________________________________
Hacking
Hacking is the practice of modifying the features of a system, in order to accomplish a goal outside of
the creator's original purpose.
The most fundamental meaning of hacking is gaining unauthorized access to data in a system or
computer.
Hacking is exploiting security controls either in a technical, physical or a human-based element. ~
Kevin Mitnick
The person who is consistently engaging in hacking activities, and has accepted hacking as a lifestyle
and philosophy of their choice, is called a hacker.
Computer hacking is the most popular form of hacking nowadays, especially in the field of computer
security.
The mass attention given to blackhat hackers from the media cause the whole hacking term is often
mistaken for any security related cybercrime.
However, the word "hacking" has two definitions. The first definition refers to the hobby/profession
of working with computers. The second definition refers to modifies computer hardware or software
in a way that changes the creator's original intent.
It is the art of exploiting computers to get access to otherwise unauthorized information. Now that the
world is using IT systems to gather, store and manipulate important information there is also a need to
make sure that data is secure. However, no system is without is problems. Holes are often present
within security systems which, if exploited, allow hackers to gain access to this otherwise restricted
information.
Purpose behind Hacking : When somebody tries to access other's computer systems with the aimof destroying or altering important information or data, such an activity is defined as hacking and
the person is called a hacker. It is believed that hacking activities are not backed by solid logical
reasons. On the contrary, hackers try to experiment with the computer brilliance by trying of
af ect other system with viruses. Hacking is done mostly for sheer pleasure by which a hacker
wants to prove his skills. But if at all one searches for reasons behind it, it can be logically
concluded Hacking is carried out with the objective of tracing vital information and af ecting
computer systems with viruses.
Hacker
Hacker is a term used by some to mean "a clever programmer" and by others, especially those in
popular media, to mean "someone who tries to break into computer systems.
Cracking
Cracking is the act of breaking into a computer system, often on a network. A cracker can be doing
this for profit, maliciously, for some altruistic purpose or cause, or because the challenge is there.
Some breaking-and-entering has been done ostensibly to point out weaknesses in a site's security
system.
Contrary to widespread myth, cracking does not usually involve some mysterious leap of hackerly
brilliance, but rather persistence and the dogged repetition of a handful of fairly well-known tricks
that exploit common weaknesses in the security of target systems. Accordingly, most crackers are
only mediocre hackers. These two terms should not be confused with each others. Hackers generallydeplore cracking.
Cracker
A cracker is someone who breaks into someone else's computer system, often on a network; bypasses
passwords or licenses in computer programs; or in other ways intentionally breaches computer
security.
Hacking as a Destructive Tool
The common stance on hacking with the average person is that it is morally wrong. There have beenseveral instances where hacking has proven to have caused problems. Hacking can create a variety of
damages to people, groups and systems of broad spectrum. Negative Hacking Interactions:
Identity Theft – Some hackers can gain access to sensitive information which could be used to fuel
identity theft. This identity theft can cause damages to credit ratings from consumer agencies, run-ins
with the law because the person who stole the identity committed a crime, or other damages which
may not be repairable at all.
E-mail Access – Hackers have the ability to gain access to personal e-mail accounts. These can have
a variety of information and other private files which most people would regard as important. This
information could also hold sensitive data which could be used against someone or simply cause ruin
for those who are involved in the breach of privacy.
Website Security – Many websites have been victims of hackers. Usually the hackers would simplydestroy data and leave the websites in an inoperable state which would leave website owners with
the task of rebuilding their sites from scratch if they did not have a backup. This could also pose risks
for companies who had their consumer's payment information hosted on their websites. Defacing the
websites by leaving tags or "calling cards" stating the unknown group's signature was not uncommon
in the early days of hacking websites.
Hacking as a Political Statement
Some hackers are out to get the government and show the vulnerabilities that the government has in
trusting their systems too much.
This is extremely illegal in the United States and other countries. This has led to some vulnerability insecurity systems to being fixed and made the government computer systems even stronger. Of course it
is difficult to do this kind of hacking without a trace being left behind.
Most if not all hackers who get into the government systems around the world are captured by the
government and punished for unauthorized access to their systems.
Hacking through Worm Exploits
Worms are nasty pieces of malicious code which are designed to find vulnerabilities in computer
systems and exploit them with automated processing.
They can be used to destroy data, collect information or simply lie in wait until they are given
commands to do something. The worm code self replicates and tries to infect as many systems as
possible.
The big threat that these worms bring is the knowledge that a system is open. This can allow the
automated response to install a back door into a system which can allow malicious hackers to gain
access to computers as well as turning systems into "zombies" which could be used for various
purposes including spamming and masking the actions of the original hacker. Creators of catastrophic
software such as the author of the first Internet worm, Robbert Tappan Morris Jr. did not mean to do
bad at all.
Before the Internet, there was ARPANET (Advanced Research Projects Agency Network), whichwas used by the United States government Department of Defense. Morris created the Morris worm,
which was meant to gauge the size of the Internet but had actually gained access to ARPANET byaccessing vulnerabilities in Unix based systems which were in use at the time.
There was an error in his coding of the worm which caused replication at exponential rates which
gained access into NASA and the Air Force systems. It was not intended to harm the computers, butdid show that they were vulnerable to attacks. He got off with only community service even though
federal guidelines should have given him extensive consequences for his actions. He was hired by
MIT and is currently a professor working in the Artificial Intelligence Laboratory.
Hacking as a Learning Tool
Hacking leads several people into the interest of creating newer, better software which can
revolutionize the electronic world.
Although it is important to remember that hacking is a varied skill and those who have been hacking
the longest will have more success because they know how computers work and how they have
evolved over time.
Ethical hackers use their knowledge to improve the vulnerabilities in systems, their hardware and
software. The ethical hackers come from a wide variety of different backgrounds.
The best examples are from ex-malicious hackers who decide their purpose is to help prevent
damages to companies by holes in their security. These companies pay their ethical hackers
handsomely as they are providing a service which could be extremely useful in preventing damages
and loss.
They can be hired by single companies who need advanced protection while others could be hired by
software designers who will reach millions of people around the world.
Possible Protection from Hackers
Protection from hackers is important no matter whether it is for personal use or for large
corporations. The following tools are the best defense against hackers:
Firewalls – The firewall is a software barrier which is designed to protect private resources and
prevents unauthorized network traffic. They are designed to block off ports of access on the computer
and require administrative clearance to access resources.
Routers – All modern routers include firewalls and protective features. You can password protect
wireless networks and create useful protection with them.
Updates – Software updates are crucial to ensure the safety and security of any application of the
software. It could be the operating system at home or the server software that processes website
information and more.
___________________________
CHAPTER 2
Classification
various Kind of hacking
___________________________
Computer Hackers have been around for so many years. Since the Computer and Internet becamewidely used in the World, We have started to hear more and more about hacking.
As the word ‘Hacking’ has two meaning, so the word ‘Hacker’ is a word that has two meanings:
Traditionally, a Hacker is someone who likes to play with Software or Electronic Systems. Hackersenjoy Exploring and Learning how Computer systems operate. They love discovering new ways towork electronically.
Recently, Hacker has taken on a new meaning that someone who finds weaknesses in a computer or
computer network, though the term can also refer to someone with an advanced understanding of
computers and computer networks.
Normally, Hackers are people who try to gain unauthorized access to your computer.
With controversy, the term hacker is reclaimed by computer programmers who argue that someone
breaking into computers is better called a cracker, not making a difference between computer
criminals (black hats) and computer security experts (white hats). Some white hat hackers claim that
they also deserve the title hacker, and that only black hats should be called crackers.
If hackers, if anyone committing a criminal act, wants to reduce their risk, they obviously don't
involve anybody else. The greater the circle of people that know what you're doing, the higher the
risk. ~ Kevin Mitnick
Classifications of Hacker
There are many more types of hackers in the world according to their motive and type of work. The
following list forwards one mote steps to better knowing hackers.
White hat hacker
The term "White hat hacker" refers to an ethical hacker, or a computer security expert, who
specializes in penetration testing and in other testing methodologies to ensure the security of an
organization's information systems. Ethical hacking is a term coined by IBM meant to imply a broader
category than just penetration testing. White-hat hackers are also called penetration tester, sneakers,
red teams, or tiger teams. Generally, White hat hackers or ethical hackers are the good guy in the
world of hackers.
Black hat hacker
A black hat hacker is an individual with extensive computer knowledge whose purpose is to breach
or bypass internet security. Black hat hackers are also known as crackers or dark-side hackers. The
general view is that, while hackers build things, crackers break things. They are computer security
hackers that break into computers and networks or also create computer viruses. The term “black hat”
comes from old westerns where the bad guys usually wore black hats.
Black hat hackers break into secure networks to destroy data or make the network unusable for those
who are authorized to use the network.
They choose their targets using a two-pronged process known as the "pre-hacking stage".
Step 1: Targeting
Step 2: Research and Information Gathering
Step 3: Finishing the Attack
Grey hat hacker
A grey hat hacker is a combination of a black hat and a white hat hacker. It may relate to whether they
sometimes arguably act illegally, though in good will, or to show how they disclose vulnerabilities.
They usually do not hack for personal gain or have malicious intentions, but may be prepared to
technically commit crimes during the course of their technological exploits in order to achieve better
security.
Blue hat
A blue hat hacker is someone outside computer security consulting firms who is used to bug test a
system prior to its launch, looking for exploits so they can be closed. Microsoft also uses the termBlueHat to represent a series of security briefing events.
Elite hacker
A social status among hackers, elite is used to describe the most skilled. Newly discovered activities
will circulate among these hackers.
Script kiddie
A script kiddie (or skiddie) is a non-expert who breaks into computer systems by using pre-packaged
automated tools written by others, usually with little understanding of the underlying concept hence
the term script (i.e. a prearranged plan or set of activities) kiddie (i.e. kid, child an individual lacking
knowledge and experience, immature).
Neophyte “newbie”
A neophyte, "n00b", or "newbie" is someone who is new to hacking or phreaking and has almost no
knowledge or experience of the workings of technology, and hacking.
Hacktivist
A hacktivist is a hacker who utilizes technology to announce a social, ideological, religious, or
political message. In general, most hacktivism involves website defacement or denial-of-service
attacks.
Nation state
It refers to Intelligence agencies and cyber warfare operatives of nation states.
Organized criminal gangs
Criminal activity carried on for profit.
Bots
Automated software tools, some freeware, available for the use of any type of hacker.
_____________________
CHAPTER 3
Computer Security
Computer Crime and
Intelligence Agency
_____________________
Computer Security
The security applied to computing devices such as computers and smartphones, as well as computer
networks such as private and public networks, including the whole Internet is called as Computer
Security.
It includes physical security to prevent theft of equipment and information security to protect the data
on that equipment. It is sometimes referred to as "Cyber Security" or "IT security".
Cybersecurity is the process of applying security measures to ensure confidentiality, integrity, and
availability of data.
Computer Threats
A threat is a possible danger that might exploit a vulnerability to breach security and thus cause
possible harm.
It can be either "intentional" (i.e., intelligent; e.g., an individual cracker or a criminal organization) or
"accidental" (e.g., the possibility of a computer malfunctioning, or the possibility of a natural disaster
such as an earthquake, a fire, or a tornado) or otherwise a circumstance, capability, action, or event.
Computer Crime
Computer crime refers to any crime that involves a computer and a network. Net crime refers to
criminal exploitation of the Internet.
Cybercrimes are defined as: "Of ences that are committed against individuals or groups of
individuals with a criminal motive to intentionally harm the reputation of the victim or cause
physical or mental harm to the victim directly or indirectly, using modern telecommunication
networks such as Internet (Chat rooms, emails, notice boards and groups) and mobile phones
(SMS/MMS)".
Such crimes may threaten a nation’s security and financial health. Issues surrounding this type of
crime has become high-profile, particularly those surrounding cracking, copyright infringement, child
pornography, and child grooming. There are also problems of privacy when confidential information
is lost or intercepted, lawfully or otherwise.
Topology of computer crime
Computer crime encompasses a broad range of activities. Generally, however, it may be divided into
two categories: (1) crimes that target computers directly; (2) crimes facilitated by computer networks
or devices, the primary target of which is independent of the computer network or device.
1. Crimes that primarily target computer networks or devices include: Computer viruses,
Denial-of-service attacks, Malware (malicious code)
2. Crimes that use computer networks or devices to advance other ends include: Cyber
stalking, Fraud and identity theft, Information warfare, Phishing scams
Cyber Terrorism
Cyber terrorism in general, can be defined as an act of terrorism committed through the use of
cyberspace or computer resources. As such, a simple propaganda in the Internet, that there will be
bomb attacks during the holidays can be considered cyber-terrorism.
Top 10 Intelligence agencies of the world
CIA – America
Formed : September 18, 1947
Agency executive : Leon Panetta, Director
Parent agency : Central Intelligence Group
CIA is the largest of the intelligence agencies and is responsible for gathering data from other
countries that could impact U.S. policy. It is a civilian intelligence agency of the United Statesgovernment responsible for providing national security intelligence to senior United States
policymakers. The CIA also engages in covert activities at the request of the President of the UnitedStates of America. The CIA’s primary function is to collect information about foreign governments,
corporations, and individuals, and to advise public policymakers. The agency conducts covert
operations and paramilitary actions, and exerts foreign political influence through its Special
Activities Division. It has failed to control terrorism activities including 9/11, Not even a single toplevel Al-Queda leader captured own its own in the past 9 years – ‘they missed 1 Million’ Soviet
troops marching into Afghanistan’. Iraq’s Weapons of Mass Destruction, Have the found them yet? -
Number of defectors/ double agents numbers close to a thousand. On 50th anniversary of CIA,President Clinton said ”By necessity, the American people will never know the full story of your
courage. Indeed, no one knows that what CIA really does”. Highly funded and technologically mostadvanced Intelligence set-up in the world.
M1-6 – United Kingdom
Formed : 1909 as the Secret Service Bureau
Jurisdiction : Government of the United Kingdom
Headquarters : Vauxhall Cross, London
Agency executive : Sir John Sawers KCMG, Director General
Parent agency : Foreign and Commonwealth Office
The British have had a long public perception of an effective intelligence agency (due to the success
of the unrealistic, yet entertaining, James Bond movies). This perception matches reality. MI6, the
British equivalent to the CIA, has had two big advantages in staying effective: The British OfficialSecrets Act and D notices can often prevent leaks (which have been the bane of the CIA’s existence).
Some stories have emerged. In the Cold War, MI6 recruited Oleg Penkovsky, who played a key partin the favorable resolution of the Cuban Missile Crisis, and Oleg Gordievski, who operated for adecade before MI6 extracted him via Finland. The British were even aware of Norwood’s activities,but made the decision not to tip their hand. MI6 also is rumored to have sabotaged the Tu-144
supersonic airliner program by altering documents and making sure they fell into the hands of the
KGB.
ISI – Pakistan
Formed : 1948
Jurisdiction : Government of Pakistan
Headquarters : Islamabad, Pakistan
Agency executive : Lieutenant General Ahmad Shuja Pasha, PA Director General
With the lengthiest track record of success, the best know Intelligence so far on the scale of records is
ISI. The Inter-Services Intelligence was created as an independent unit in 1948 in order to strengthenthe performance of Pakistan’s Military Intelligence during the Indo-Pakistani War of 1947. Its successin achieving its goal without leading to a full scale invasion of Pakistan by the Soviets is a feat
unmatched by any other through out the intelligence world. KGB, The best of its time, failed tocounter ISI and protect Soviet interests in Central Asia. It has had 0 double agents or Defectorsthrough out its history, considering that in light of the whole war campaign it carried out from money
earned by selling drugs bought from the very people it was bleeding, The Soviets. It has protected its
Nuclear Weapons since formed and it has foiled Indian attempts to attain ultimate supremacy in the
South-Asian theatres through internal destabilization of India. It is above All laws in its host countryPakistan ‘A State, with in a State’. Its policies are made ‘outside’ of all other institutions with the
exception of The Army. Its personnel have never been caught on camera. Its is believed to have the
highest number of agents worldwide, close to 10,000. The most striking thing is that its one of the
least funded Intelligence agency out of the top 10.
Mossad – Israel
Formed : December 13, 1949 as the Central Institute for Coordination
Agency executive : Meir Dagan, Director
Parent agency : Office of the Prime Minister
The Mossad is responsible for intelligence collection and covert operations including paramilitaryactivities. It is one of the main entities in the Israeli Intelligence Community, along with Aman(military intelligence) and Shin Bet (internal security), but its director reports directly to the Prime
Minister. The list of its successes is long. Israel’s intelligence agency is most famous for having taken
out a number of PLO operatives in retaliation for the attack that killed eleven Israeli athletes at the1972 Olympic games in Munich. However, this agency has other success to its name, including the
acquisition of a MiG-21 prior to the Six-Day war of 1967 and the theft of the plans for the Mirage 5after the deal with France went sour. Mossad also assisted the United States in supporting Solidarityin Poland during the 1980s.
MSS – China
Jurisdiction : People’s Republic of China
Headquarters : Beijing
Agency executive : Geng Huichang, Minister of State Security
Parent agency : State Council
Ministry of State Security is the security agency of the People’s Republic of China. It is also probablythe Chinese government’s largest and most active foreign intelligence agency, though it is also
involved in domestic security matters. Article 4 of the Criminal Procedure Law gives the MSS thesame authority to arrest or detain people as regular police for crimes involving state security with
identical supervision by the procuratorates and the courts. It is headquartered near the Ministry of
Public Security of the People’s Republic of China in Beijing. According to Liu Fuzhi, SecretaryGeneral of the Commission for Politics and Law under the Central Committee of the Communist Partyof China and Minister of Public Security, the mission of the MSS is to ensure “the security of the statethrough effective measures against enemy agents, spies, and counter-revolutionary activities designed
to sabotage or overthrow China’s socialist system.” One of the primary missions of the MSS isundoubtedly to gather foreign intelligence from targets in various countries overseas. Many MSSagents are said to have operated in the Greater China region (Hong Kong, Macau, and Taiwan) and tohave integrated themselves into the world’s numerous overseas Chinese communities. At one point,
nearly 120 agents who had been operating under non-official cover in the U.S., Canada, Western and
Northern Europe, and Japan as businessmen, bankers, scholars, and journalists were recalled toChina, a fact that demonstrates the broad geographical scope of MSS agent coverage.
BND – Germany
Formed : 1 April 1956
Agency executive : Gehlen Organization
Parent agency : Central Intelligence Group
The Bundesnachrichtendienst is the foreign intelligence agency of the German government, under the
control of the Chancellor’s Office. The BND acts as an early warning system to alert the Germangovernment to threats to German interests from abroad. It depends heavily on wiretapping and
electronic surveillance of international communications. It collects and evaluates information on a
variety of areas such as international terrorism, WMD proliferation and illegal transfer of technology,
organized crime, weapons and drug trafficking, money laundering, illegal migration and information
warfare. As Germany’s only overseas intelligence service, the BND gathers both military and civil
intelligence.
FSB – Russia
Formed : 3 April, 1995
Headquarters : Lubyanka Square
Preceding agency : KGB
The Federal Security Service of Russian Federation (FSD) is the main domestic security agency ofthe Russian Federation and the main successor agency of the Soviet-era Cheka, NKVD and KGB. TheFSB is involved in counter-intelligence, internal and border security, counter-terrorism, and
surveillance. Its headquarters are on Lubyanka Square, downtown Moscow, the same location as the
former headquarters of the KGB. All law enforcement and intelligence agencies in Russia work under
the guidance of FSB, if needed. For example, the GRU, spetsnaz and Internal Troops detachments ofRussian Ministry of Internal Affairs work together with the FSB in Chechnya. The FSB is responsiblefor internal security of the Russian state, counterespionage, and the fight against organized crime,
terrorism, and drug smuggling. The number of FSB personnel and its budget remain state secrets,
although the budget was reported to jump nearly 40% in 2006.
DGSE – France
Formed : April 2, 1982
Preceding agency : External Documentation and Counter-Espionage Service
Minister responsible : Hervé Morin, Minister of Defence
Agency executive : Erard Corbin de Mangoux, Director
Directorate General for External Security is France’s external intelligence agency. Operating under
the direction of the French ministry of defence, the agency works alongside the DCRI (the CentralDirectorate of Interior Intelligence) in providing intelligence and national security, notably byperforming paramilitary and counterintelligence operations abroad. The General Directorate for
External Security (DGSE) of France has a rather short history compared to other intelligence agencies
in the region. It was officially founded in 1982 from a multitude of prior intelligence agencies in the
country. Its primary focus is to gather intelligence from foreign sources to assist in military and
strategic decisions for the country. The agency employs more than five thousand people.
RAW – India
Formed : 21 September 1968
Headquarters : New Delhi, India
Agency executive : K. C. Verma, Secretary (R)
Parent agency : Prime Minister’s Office, GoI
Research and Analysis Wing is India’s external intelligence agency. It was formed in September
1968, after the newly independent Republic of India was faced with 2 consecutive wars, the SinoIndian war of 1962 and the India-Pakistani war of 1965, as it was evident that a credible intelligence
gathering setup was lacking. Its primary function is collection of external intelligence, counterterrorism and covert operations. In addition, it is responsible for obtaining and analyzing information
about foreign governments, corporations, and persons, in order to advise Indian foreign policymakers.
Until the creation of R&AW, the Intelligence Bureau handled both internal and external intelligence.
ASIS – Australia
Formed : 13 May 1952
Headquarters : Canberra, Australian Capital Territory, Australia
Minister responsible : The Hon. Stephen Smith MP, Minister for Foreign Affairs
Agency executive : Nick Warner, Director-General
Australian Secret Intelligence Service is the Australian government intelligence agency responsiblefor collecting foreign intelligence, undertaking counter-intelligence activities and cooperation with
other intelligence agencies overseas. For more than twenty years, the existence of the agency was a
secret even from its own government. Its primary responsibility is gathering intelligence from mainly
Asian and Pacific interests using agents stationed in a wide variety of areas. Its main purpose, as withmost agencies, is to protect the country’s political and economic interests while ensuring safety for
the people of Australia against national threats.
______________________________
CHAPTER 4
Network systems and DNS working
______________________________
Computer Network
A computer network is a group of computer systems and other computing hardware devices that are
linked together through communication channels to facilitate communication and resource-sharing
among a wide range of users. Networks are commonly categorized based on their characteristics.
One of the earliest examples of a computer network was a network of communicating computers that
functioned as part of the U.S. military's Semi-Automatic Ground Environment (SAGE) radar systemIn 1969, the University of California at Los Angeles, the Stanford Research Institute, the University ofCalifornia at Santa Barbara and the University of Utah were connected as part of the AdvancedResearch Projects Agency Network (ARPANET) project. It is this network that evolved to becomewhat we now call the Internet.
Networks are used to:
Facilitate communication via email, video conferencing, instant messaging, etc.
Enable multiple users to share a single hardware device like a printer or scanner
Enable file sharing across the network
Allow for the sharing of software or operating programs on remote systems
Make information easier to access and maintain among network users
There are many types of networks, including:
Local Area Networks (LAN)
The computers are geographically close together (that is, in the same building).
Wide Area Networks (WAN)
The computers are farther apart and are connected by telephone lines or radio waves.
Metropolitan Area Networks (MAN)
A data network designed for a town or city.
Home Area Networks (HAN)
A network contained within a user's home that connects a person's digital devices.
Intranet
An intranet is basically a network that is local to a company. In other words, users from within this
company can find all of their resources without having to go outside of the company. An intranet can
include LANs, private WANs and MANs,
Extranet
An extranet is an extended intranet, where certain internal services are made available to known
external users or external business partners at remote locations.
Internet
An internet is used when unknown external users need to access internal resources in your network. Inother words, your company might have a web site that sells various products, and you want any
external user to be able to access this service.
VPN
A virtual private network (VPN) is a special type of secured network. A VPN is used to provide asecure connection across a public network, such as an internet. Extranets typically use a VPN toprovide a secure connection between a company and its known external users or offices.
Authentication is provided to validate the identities of the two peers.
Confidentiality provides encryption of the data to keep it private from prying eyes.
Integrity is used to ensure that the data sent between the two devices or sites has not been tampered
with.
Benefits of networking
There are lots of advantages from build up a network, but the three big facts areFile Sharing
From sharing files you can view, modify, and copy files stored on a different computer on the network
just as easily as if they were stored on your computer.
Resource Sharing
Resources such as printers, fax machines, Storage Devices (HDD, FDD and CD Drives), WebcamScanners, Modem and many more devices can be shared.
Program Sharing
Just as you can share files on a network, you can often also share program on a network. For example,
if you have the right type of software license, you can have a shared copy of Microsoft Office, or
some other program, and keep it on the network server, from where it is also run.
Network Host
A network host (or simply referred to as a host) can be any computer or network device connected to
the computer network. This computer can be a terminal or a web server offering services to its
clients.
Network Protocol
A network protocol (or just referred to as protocol) is a set of rules and conventions that are
necessary for the communication between two network devices. For example, two computers on a
network can communicate only if they agree to follow the protocols.
The following are some of the most widely referred network protocols:
Internet Protocol (IP Address)
An Internet Protocol address (IP address) is a numerical label assigned to each device (e.g.,
computer, printer) participating in a computer network that uses the Internet Protocol for
communication. An IP address serves two principal functions: host or network interface identification
and location addressing. Its role has been characterized as follows: "A name indicates what we seek.
An address indicates where it is. A route indicates how to get there."
IP addresses are binary numbers, but they are usually stored in text files and displayed in humanreadable notations, such as 172.16.254.1 (for IPv4), and 2001:db8:0:1234:0:567:8:1 (for IPv6).
Types of IP Address
Private IP Address: A private IP address is the one that is assigned to a computer on the Local Area
Network (LAN). A typical example of private IP address would be something like: 192.168.0.4
Public IP Address: A public IP address is the one that is assigned to a computer connected to the
Internet. An example public IP address would be something like: 59.93.115.119
In most cases a computer gets connected to the ISP network using a private IP. Once a computer is onthe ISP network it will be assigned a public IP address using which the communication with the
Internet is made possible.
How to Find the IP Address of a Computer?
Finding your public IP is extremely simple. Just type “what is my IP” on Google to see your public IPaddress displayed in search results.
In order to find your private IP, just open the command prompt window (type cmd in the “Run” box)
and enter the following command:
ipconfig/all
This will display a long list of details about your computer’s network devices and their configuration.
To see your private IP address, just scroll down to find something as “IPv4 Address” which is
nothing but your private IP.
Hyper Text Transfer Protocol (HTTP)
Hypertext Transfer Protocol, abbreviated as HTTP, is a communications protocol used for thetransfer of information over the Internet. A client makes an HTTP request using a web browser towhich an HTTP response is sent from the server.
File Transfer Protocol (FTP)
The File Transfer Protocol provides a standard for transferring files between two computers on the
network. FTP is most widely used in carrying out upload/download operations between a server and
a workstation.
Simple Main Transfer Protocol (SMTP)
The Simple Mail Transfer Protocol provides a standard for sending e-mails from one server toanother. Most e-mail systems that send mail over the Internet use SMTP to exchange messagesbetween the server.
Telnet
Telnet is a network protocol that allows you to connect to remote hosts on the Internet or on a local
network. It requires a telnet client software to implement the protocol using which the connection is
established with the remote computer.
In most cases telnet requires you to have a username and a password to establish connection with the
remote host. Occasionally, some hosts also allow users to make connection as a guest or public.
After the connection is made, one can use text based commands to communicate with the remote host.
The syntax for using the telnet command is as follows:
telnet <hostname or IP> port
WWW
The World Wide Web (abbreviated as WWW or W3, and commonly known as the Web) is a systemof interlinked hypertext documents accessed via the Internet. With a web browser, one can view web
pages that may contain text, images, videos, and other multimedia, and navigate between them via
hyperlinks.
It is the collection of internet resources (such as FTP, telnet, Usenet), hyperlinked text, audio, andvideo files, and remote sites that can be accessed and searched by browsers based on standards such
as HTTP and TCP/IP.
SSH - Secure Shell
Developed by SSH Communications Security Ltd., Secure Shell is a program to log into anothercomputer over a network, to execute commands in a remote machine, and to move files from one
machine to another. It provides strong authenticationand secure communications over insecure
channels. It is a replacement for rlogin, rsh, rcp, and rdist.
SSH protects a network from attacks such as IP spoofing, IP source routing, and DNS spoofing.
An attacker who has managed to take over a network can only force ssh to disconnect. He or she
cannot play back the traffic or hijack the connection when encryptionis enabled.
When using ssh's slogin (instead of rlogin) the entire login session, including transmission of
password, is encrypted; therefore it is almost impossible for an outsider to collect passwords.
SSH port forwarding
An SSH service that provides secure and encrypted connections to traditionally non-encryptedservices, such as e-mail or news.
SSH port forwarding allows you to establish a secure SSH session and then tunnel TCP connectionsthrough it. It works by opening a connection to forward a local port to a remote port over SSH.
The client software (e.g. your e-mail client) is then set to connect to the local port. With SSH portforwarding passwords are sent over an encrypted connection. Also called SSH tunneling.
Network Port
A computer may be running several services on it like HTTP (web server), SMTP, FTP and so on.Each of these services are uniquely identified by a number called network port (or simply referred to
as port). If a computer wants to avail a specific service from another computer, it has to establish a
connection to it on the exact port number where the intended service is running.
For example, if a terminal is to request a web document from a remote server using HTTP, it has tofirst establish a connection with the remote server on port 80 (HTTP service runs on port 80) before
placing the request.
In simple words, port numbers can be compared to door numbers where each door grants access to a
specific service on a computer.
List of Well-Known Ports
Port
Number
Description
1 TCP Port Service Multiplexer
(TCPMUX)
5 Remote Job Entry (RJE)
7 ECHO
18 Message Send Protocol (MSP)
20 FTP -- Data
21 FTP -- Control
22 SSH Remote Login Protocol
23 Telnet
25 Simple Mail Transfer Protocol
(SMTP)
29 MSG ICP
37 Time
42 Host Name Server (Nameserv)
43 WhoIs
49 Login Host Protocol (Login)
53 Domain Name System (DNS)
69 Trivial File Transfer Protocol (TFTP)
70 Gopher Services
79 Finger
80 HTTP
103 X.400 Standard
108 SNA Gateway Access Server
109 POP2
110 POP3
115 Simple File Transfer Protocol (SFTP)
118 SQL Services
119 Newsgroup (NNTP)
137 NetBIOS Name Service
139 NetBIOS Datagram Service
143 Interim Mail Access Protocol (IMAP)
150 NetBIOS Session Service
156 SQL Server
161 SNMP
179 Border Gateway Protocol (BGP)
190 Gateway Access Control Protocol
(GACP)
194 Internet Relay Chat (IRC)
197 Directory Location Service (DLS)
389 Lightweight Directory Access Protocol
(LDAP)
396 Novell Netware over IP
443 HTTPS
444 Simple Network Paging Protocol
(SNPP)
445 Microsoft-DS
458 Apple QuickTime
546 DHCP Client
547 DHCP Server
563 SNEWS
569 MSN
1080 Socks
A port number is a way to identify a specific process to which an Internet or other network
message is to be forwarded when it arrives at a server.
A port number is a way to identify a specific process to which an Internet or other network
message is to be forwarded when it arrives at a server. For the Transmission Control Protocol and
the User Datagram Protocol, a port number is a 16-bit integer that is put in the header appended
to a message unit. This port number is passed logically between client and server transport layers
and physically between the transport layer and the Internet Protocol layer and forwarded on.
Domain Name System
DNS, as it is called, refers to the hierarchical naming system used for computers, resources andservices on the Internet. It translates the computer hostnames to IP addresses.
DNS resolves an IP address to a hostname or vice versa.
DNS is basically a large database which resides on various computers that contains the names and IPaddresses of various hosts/domains. Other than ip-address DNS also associates various informationwith the domain names.
Structure of a DNS
DNS uses a hierarchical tree based name structure. At top of the tree is the “root” (represented as a
dot (.) ) followed by the TLD ( Top Level Domain ), then by the domain-name and any number oflower level sob-domains separated by a dot.
The Top Level Domains are divided into 2 categories:
1. Generic TLD (gTLD)
2. Country Code TLD (ccTLD)
Below are some of the common Generic Top Level Domains:
.com – comercial web sites
.org – non profit organizations web sites
.edu – restricted to schools and institutions.
.net – originally for network infrastructures, now unrestricted
Below are some fo the Country Code Top Level Domains:
.us – United States
.in – India
.uk – United Kingdom
.ru – Russia
The following shows a sample representation of the structure of the DNS tree:
Authority, Delegation and Zone
The Authority for the root domain and gTLD lies with Internet Corporation for Assigned Numbers and
Names (ICANN). ccTLD’s are delegated to individual countries for administration purpose. Eachlevel in the hierarchy may delegate the authoritative control to the next lower level. There is a DNSserver running in every level of the hierarchy and the responsibility of running the DNS server lies
with the Authority at that level.
For Example, when the root domain gets a DNS query for www.example.com, the root will delegateresponsibility for resolving to its lower level “.com”, which in-turn will delegate to “example”.
Finally the DNS server in the “example” will respond with the IP address of the hostname “www”.
A zone is simply a portion of a domain. For SOFTWARICA{NOW_YOU_KNOW_HOW_TO_US_grep} example, the domain example.com may contain all the
information for a.example.com, b.example.com and c.example.com. However, the zone example.comcontains only information for example.com and delegates the responsibility to the authoritative name
servers for the subdomains. In general, if there are no subdomains, then the zone and domain are
essentially the same.
Resource Records
A DNS zone database is made up of a collection of resource records. Each resource record specifiesinformation about a particular object. The DNS server uses these records to answer queries for hostsin its zone. For example, address mapping (A) record, map a host name to an IP address, and reverselookup pointer (PTR) records map an IP address to a host name. Here are some of commonly usedResource Records.
A Record: The ‘A’ record specifies the IP address of a host. ‘A’ record will have the details of the
domain name and its associated IP address. When a Query is given to resolve domain name, DNSserver will refer the ‘A’ record and answer with the IP address present in the record.
PTR Record: A PTR record maps the IP address to a specific host.
NS Record: An NS record or name server record maps a domain name to a list of DNS serversauthoritative for that domain. Delegations depend on NS records.
MX Record: An MX record or mail exchange record maps a domain name to a list of mail exchange
servers for that domain. For example, when you send a mail to alpha@example.com, the mail will be
routed to the Mail Server as specified in MX record.
DNS Queries
A DNS query would be something like ‘what is the IP address of a.example.com’. A DNS server mayreceive such a query for any domain, to which it has no information about. The DNS server will
respond is different ways for which it has no information about.
The following are the three types of DNS queries:
1. Recursive query
2. Iterative query
3. Inverse query
In Recursive query, the following are the steps involved when a host queries its local DNS server for
‘a.example.com’.
Host sends query ‘what is the IP address of a.example.com’ to locally configured DNSserver.
DNS server looks up a.example.com in local tables – not found
DNS sends query to a root-server for the IP of a.example.com
The root-server replies with a referral to the TLD servers for .com
The DNS server sends query ‘what is the IP address a.example.com’ to one of the .com TLDservers.
The TLD server replies with a referral to the name servers for example.com
The DNS server sends query ‘what is the IP address a.example.com’ to name server for
example.com.
Zone file defines a A record which shows ‘a’ s IP address is x.x.x.x.
DNS returns the A record for ‘a’.
In Iterative query, if the DNS server doesn’t know the answer, it will refer other DNS server asresponse. So the client which initiates the query will once again contact the DNS server which came
in as response.
In Inverse query, an IP address will be provided and a hostname will be asked.
Proxy server
A proxy server is a server (a computer system or an application) that acts as an intermediary for
requests from clients seeking resources from other servers.
A client connects to the proxy server, requesting some service, such as a file, connection, web page,
or other resource available from a different server and the proxy server evaluates the request as a
way to simplify and control its complexity.
Proxies were invented to add structure and encapsulation to distributed systems.
Today, most proxies are web proxies, facilitating access to content on the World Wide Web and
providing anonymity.
Communication between two computers (shown in grey) connected through a third computer
(shown in red) acting as a proxy. Bob does not know whom the information is going to, which is
why proxies can be used to protect privacy.
Proxy Server - Types
There are many different types of proxy server and here are some common types:
Anonymous Proxy
Anonymous proxy servers conceal your information. When you go to request something from the
webpage, the webpage gets the IP address of the proxy server that you're using instead of your own.
The server has no way of accessing your IP address and communication between you and the proxyserver is encrypted, in cases where the greatest deal of security is desired.
High Anonymity Proxy
This type of proxy server does not identify itself as a proxy server and does not make available the
original IP address. High anonymity proxies, only include the REMOTE_ADDR header with the IPaddress of the proxy server, making it appear that the proxy server is the client.
Transparent Proxy
An example of a transparent proxy would be a server that simply forwards your request to the
resource that you want without concealing any of your information. This may be used in the
workplace, where the IP address of the request is revealed to the server being requested from but
where the proxy provides access to the resource for a multitude of computers within the network.
Transparent proxies are generally not what people are looking for when they go shopping for proxy
server access online.
Reverse Proxy
A reverse proxy server is generally used to pass requests from the Internet, through a firewall to
isolated, private networks. It is used to prevent Internet clients from having direct, unmonitored
access to sensitive data residing on content servers on an isolated network, or intranet. If caching is
enabled, a reverse proxy can also lessen network traffic by serving cached information rather than
passing all requests to actual content servers.
___________________________________
CHAPTER 5
Various Types of Hacking attacks
___________________________________
Active attacks
An active attack is a network exploit in which a hacker attempts to make changes to data on the target
or data en route to the target.
Types of active attacks
Masquerade Attack
In a masquerade attack, the intruder pretends to be a particular user of a system to gain access or to
gain greater privileges than they are authorized for. A masquerade may be attempted through the use
of stolen login IDs and passwords, through finding security gaps in programs or through bypassing the
authentication mechanism.
Session Replay Attack
In a session replay attack, a hacker steals an authorized user’s log in information by stealing the
session ID. The intruder gains access and the ability to do anything the authorized user can do on the
website.
Message Modification Attack
In a message modification attack, an intruder alters packet header addresses to direct a message to a
different destination or modify the data on a target machine.
Denial of Service (DoS) attack
In a denial of service (DoS) attack, users are deprived of access to a network or web resource. Thisis generally accomplished by overwhelming the target with more traffic than it can handle.
Distributed Denial-of-Service (DDoS) exploit
In a distributed denial-of-service (DDoS) exploit, large numbers of compromised systems(sometimes called a botnet or zombie army) attack a single target.
Passive Attack
A passive attack is a network attack in which a system is monitored and sometimes scanned for open
ports and vulnerabilities. The purpose is solely to gain information about the target and no data is
changed on the target.
Passive attacks include active reconnaissance and passive reconnaissance.
In passive reconnaissance, an intruder monitors systems for vulnerabilities without interaction,
through methods like session capture.
In active reconnaissance, the intruder engages with the target system through methods like port
scans.
Methods of passive attacks
War driving detects vulnerable Wi-Fi networks by scanning them from nearby locations with a
portable antenna. The attack is typically carried out from a moving vehicle, sometimes with GPSsystems that hackers use to plot out areas with vulnerabilities on a map. War driving can be done just
to steal an Internet connection or as a preliminary activity for a future attack.
In dumpster diving, intruders look for information stored on discarded computers and other devices
or even passwords in trash bins. The intruders can then use this information to facilitate covert entry
to a network or system.
An intruder might masquerade as an authorized network user and spy without interaction. With that
access, an intruder might monitor network traffic by setting the network adapter to promiscuous mode.
_____________________
CHAPTER 6
Hacking Tools
_____________________
HACKING TOOLS
A hacking tool is a program designed to assist with hacking, or a piece of software which
can be used for hacking purposes.
Examples include Nmap, Nessus, John the Ripper, p0f, and Winzapper.
Bribes have also been described as among the most potent hacking tools, due to their
potential exploitation in social engineering attacks. Occasionally, common software such
as ActiveX is exploited as a hacking tool as well.
Hacking tools such as Cain and Abel, however, are well known as Script Kiddie Tools.
Script kiddies are people who follow instructions from a manual, without realising how it
happens. These Script Kiddies have been an enormous threat to computer security as
there are many hacking tools and keyloggers up for download which are free.
Password Cracker Software
A password cracker software, which is often referred to as a password recovery tool, can be used to
crack or recover the password either by removing the original password, after bypassing the data
encryption, or by outright discovery of the password. In the process of password cracking, a very
common methodology used to crack the user password is to repeatedly make guesses for the probable
password and perhaps finally hitting on the correct one. It cannot be denied that whenever we are
referring to cyber security, passwords are the most vulnerable security links. On the other hand if the
password is too completed, the user might forget it. Password Cracker software are often used by the
hackers to crack the password and access a system to manipulate it. Do not unethically use these
software for hacking passwords.
In the next section you would be getting familiar with some of the popular Password Cracker tools
which are used by hackers for password cracking.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Ophcrack
• Medusa
• RainbowCrack
• Wfuzz
• Brutus
• L0phtCrack
Fgdump
THC Hydra
• John The Ripper
Aircrack
• Cain And Abel
• IKECrack
Wireless Hacking Tools
Wireless Hacking Tools are those hacking tools which are used to hack into a wireless network
which is usually more susceptible to security threats. One must also ensure that the network is
completely secured against hacking or other malwares. The list of wireless hacking tools which
would be discussed now can be used to do a Penetration Testing for a Wireless Network. This is an
intentional attack on a network to detect security vulnerabilities by accessing its data and
functionality.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Aircrack-ng
• Kismet
• InSSIDer
• KisMAC
• Firesheep
• Airjack
• KARMA
• NetStumbler
• WepLab
Network Scanning & Hacking Tools
Click the software names to download the software from their website
Nmap
Nmap or Network Mapper is a free open source utility tool for network discovery and security
auditing solution for you. It is a flexible, powerful, portable and easy-to-use tool that is supported by
most of the operating systems like Linux, Windows, Solaris, Mac OS and others.
SuperScan
It is an multi-functional application that is designed for scanning TPC port. This is also a pinger and
address resolver. It also has useful features like ping, traceroute, WhoIs and HTTP request. There is
no need of installation as it is a portable application.
Angry IP Scanner
It is a fast port and IP address scanner. It is a lightweight and cross-platform application that has the
capacity to scan the IP addresses in any range and also in their ports. It simply pings each IP address.
Packet Crafting to Exploit Firewall Weaknesses
Through Packet crafting technique, an attacker capitalizes your firewall’s vulnerabilities. Here are
some packet crafting tools.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Hping
• Scapy
• Netcat
• Yersinia
• Nemesis
• Socat
Traffic Monitoring for Network Related Hacking
These tools allow users to monitor the websites one’s children or employees are viewing. Here’s a
list of some of these tools.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
Splunk
If you want to convert your data into powerful insights Splunk tools are the best options for you. The
Splunk tools are the leading platforms for operational intelligence. It can collect any type of data from
any machine in real time.
Nagios
Nagios is the name for the industry standard in monitoring IT infrastructure. The Nagios tools helps
you monitor your entire IT infrastructure and have the capability to detect problems well ahead they
occur. It can also detect security breaches and share data availability with stakeholders.
P0f
It is versatile passive tool that is used for OS fingerprinting. This passive tool works well in both
Linux and Windows operating systems. It has the capability to detect the hooking up of the remote
system whether it is Ethernet, DSL or OC3.
Ngrep
Ngrep or network grep is a pcap-aware tool that allows you to extend hexadecimal or regular
expressions in order to match it against the data loads of the packet. It can recognize IPv4/6, UDP,
TCP, Ethernet, SLIP, PPP, FDDI and many others.
Packet Sniffers to Analyze Traffic
These tools help capture and analyze incoming traffic on your website. Some of the popular ones are
listed below.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Wireshark
• Tcpdump
• Ettercap
• Dsniff
• EtherApe
Paros
• Fiddler
• Ratproxy
• Sslstrip
Rootkit Detectors to Hack File System
This is a directory and file integrity checker. It checks the veracity of files and notifies the user if
there’s an issue.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• AIDE (Advanced Intrusion Detection Environment)
• Netfilter
• PF: OpenBSD Packet Filter
Fuzzers to Search Vulnerabilities
Fuzzing is a term used by hackers for searching a computer system’s security vulnerabilities. Here is
a list of a few:
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Skipfish
• Wfuzz
• Wapiti
• W3af
Forensics
These tools are used for computer forensics, especially to sniff out any trace of evidence existing in a
particular computer system. Here are some of the most popular.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
Sleuth Kit
It is an open source digital intervention or forensic tool kit. It runs on varied operating systems
including Windows, Linux, OS X and many other Unix systems. It can be used for analyzing disk
images along with in-depth analysis of file system like FAT, Ext3, HFS+, UFS and NTFS.
Helix
This is a Linux based incident response system. It is also used in system investigation and analysis
along with data recovery and security auditing. The most recent version of this tool is based on
Ubuntu that promises ease of use and stability.
Maltego
It is an open source forensic and intelligence application. It can be used for gathering information in
all phases of security related work. It saves you time and money by performing the task on time in
smarter way.
Encase
Encase is the fastest and most comprehensive network forensic solution available in the market. It is
created following the global standard of forensic investigation software. It has the capability of
quickly gathering data from wide variety of devices.
Debuggers to Hack Running Programs
These tools are utilized for reverse engineering binary files for writing exploits and analyzing
malware.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• GDB
• Immunity Debugger
• Netcat
• Traceroute
• Ping.eu
• Dig
• CURL
Hacking Operating Systems
There are numerous professionals who aspire to have a career as ethical hackers. Hacking is not an
easy task as it requires great insight about technology and programing. There are specific operating
systems as well that are specially designed for the hackers to use. These operating systems have
preloaded tools and technologies that hackers can utilize to hack. This article offers a detailed
overview of various operating systems that are built keeping hacking in mind. All these operating
systems are unique from each other and have proved to be a great resource for the hackers around the
world.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
Backtrack 5r3
This operating system is built keeping the most savvy security personnel in mind as audience. This is
also a useful tool even for the early newcomers in the information security field. It offers quick and
easy way to find and also update the largest database available for the security tools collection till
date.
Kali Linux
This is a creation of the makers of BackTrack. This is regarded as the most versatile and advanced
penetration testing distribution ever created. The documentation of the software is built in an easy
format to make it the most user friendly. It is one of the must-have tools for ethical hackers that is
making a buzz in the market.
SELinux
Security Enhanced Linux or SELinux is an upstream repository that is used for various userland tools
and libraries. There are various capabilities like policy compilation, policy management and policy
development which are incorporated in this utility tool along with SELinux services and utilities. The
user can get the software as a tested release or from the development repository.
Knoppix
The website of Knoppix offers a free open source live Linux CD. The CD and DVD that is available
contain the latest and recent updated Linux software along with desktop environments. This is one of
the best tools for the beginners and includes programs like OpenOffice.org, Mozilla, Konqueror,
Apache, MySQL and PHP.
BackBox Linux
It is a Linux distribution that is based on Ubuntu. If you want to perform security assessment and
penetration tests, this software is the one that you should have in your repository. It proactively
protects the IT infrastructure. It has the capability to simplify the complexity of your IT infrastructure
with ease as well.
Pentoo
It is security focused live CD that is created based on Gentoo. It has a large number of customized
tools and kernels including a hardened kernel consisting of aufs patches. It can backport Wi-Fi stack
from the latest kernel release that is stable as well. There are development tools in Pentoo that have
Cuda/OPENCL cracking.
Matriux Krypton
If you are looking for a distro to be used in penetration testing and cyber forensic investigation, then
Matriux Krypton is the name that you can trust. This is a Debian based GNU/Linux security
distribution. It has more than 340 powerful tools for penetration testing and forensics; additionally, it
contains custom kernel 3.9.4.
NodeZero
This is regarded as the specialist tool that is specifically designed for security auditing and
penetration testing. It is a reliable, stable and powerful tool to be used for this purpose and is based
on the current Ubuntu Linux distribution. It is a free and open source system that you can download
from the website.
Blackbuntu
It is free and open source penetration testing distribution available over the internet. It is based on
Ubuntu 10.10, which is designed specifically for the information security training students and
professional. It is fast and stable yet a powerful tool that works perfectly for you. This software is a
recommendation from most of the users.
Blackbuntu
It is free and open source penetration testing distribution available over the internet. It is based on
Ubuntu 10.10, which is designed specifically for information security, training students and
professionals. It is fast and stable, yet a powerful tool that works perfectly for you. This software is a
recommendation from most of the users.
Samurai Web Testing Framework
It is a live Linux environment that is designed in such a way that it functions as a web-pen testing
environment. The software CD contains tools and programs that are open source and free. The tool
selection is based on the ones that the company themselves use for security of their IT infrastructure.
WEAKERTH4N
It's a great pentesting distro comprising of some innovative pentesting tools. The software uses
Fluxbox and is built using Debian Squeeze. One of it's popular features is its ability to hack old
Android based systems.
CAINE (Computer Aided Investigative Environment)
It is an Italian GNU/Linux live distribution list that was created as project of Digital Forensic. It
offers a complete forensic environment. This environment is organized in such a way that it integrates
the existing software tools and software module, and finally throws the result in the form of friendly
graphical interface.
Bugtraq
It is one of the most stable and comprehensive distributions. It offers stable and optimal
functionalities with stable manger in real-time. It is based upon 3.2 and 3.4 kernel Generic that is
available in both 32 and 64 Bits. Bugtraq has a wide range of tools in various branches of the kernel.
The features of the distribution vary as per your desktop environment
DEFT
DEFT is a distribution that is created for computer forensics. It can run in live stream on the system
without corrupting the device. The system is based on GNU/Linux and the user can run this live using
CD/DVD or USB pendrive. DEFT is now paired with DART, which is a forensic system.
Helix
There are various versions of Helix released by e-fense that are useful for both home and business
use. The Helix3 Enterprise is a cyber-security solution offered by this organization that provides
incident response. It throws live response and acquires volatile data. Helix3 Pro is the newest
version in the block of Helix family products.
Encryption Tools
Times are changing and spying has become a common phenomenon everywhere. There have been
increasing instances where even the governments have been found to be spying on their citizens from
time to time. This is one of the prime reasons why the importance of Encryption has increased
manifold. Encryption tools are very important because they keep the data safe by encrypting it so that
even if someone accesses the data, they can’t get through the data unless they know how to decrypt the
data. These tools use algorithm schemes to encode the data to prevent unauthorized access to the
encrypted data.
Some of the popular Encryption Tools will be listed below:
Click the software names to download the software from their website
TrueCrypt
TrueCrypt is open source encryption tool which can encrypt a partition in the Windows environment
(except Windows 8); it’s equipped for creating a virtual encrypted disk in a file. Moreover, it has the
capability to encrypt the complete storage device. TrueCrypt can run on different operating systems
like Linux, Microsoft Windows and OSX. TrueCrypt stores the encryption keys in the RAM of the
computer.
OpenSSH
OpenSSH is the short name for Open Secure Shell and is a free software suite which is used to make
your network connections secured. It uses the SSH protocol to provide encrypted communication
sessions in a computer network. It was designed originally as an alternative to the Secure Shell
Software developed by SSH Communications Security. The tool was designed as a part of the
OpenBSD project.
PuTTY
It an open source encryption tool available on both UNIX and Windows operating system. It is a free
implementation of SSH (Secure Shell) and Telnet for both Windows as well as UNIX. The beauty of
this tool is that it supports many network protocols like Telnet, SCP, rlogin, SSH and raw socket
connection. The word PuTTY has no specific meaning, however as in UNIX tradition, tty is a
terminal name.
OpenSSL
OpenSSL is an open source encryption tool which implements the TLS and SSL protocols.
OpenSSL’s core library is written in the C programming language. The fundamental cryptographic
functions are implemented by it. OpenSSL versions are available for operating systems like UNIX,
Solaris, Linux and Mac OS X. The project was undertaken in 1988 with the objective of inventing
free encryption tools for the programs being used on the internet.
Tor
Tor is a free encryption tool and has the capability to provide online anonymity as well as censorship
resistance. Internal traffic is directed through a free network which consists of more than five
thousand relays so that the user’s actual location can be hidden. It is difficult to track the Internet
activities like visiting web sites and instant messages; the most important goal of this tool is to ensure
the personal privacy of the users.
OpenVPN
It is an open source tool for the implementation of virtual private network techniques so that secured
site-to-site or point-to-point connections using routers or bridges are possible, also remote access is
possible. OpenVPN offers the users a secured authentication process by using secret keys which are
pre-shared.
Stunnel
Stunnel is a multi-platform open source tool which is used to ensure that both the clients and the
servers get secured encrypted connections. This encryption software can operate on a number of
operating system platforms like Windows as well as all operating systems which are UNIX like.
Stunnel depends upon a distinct library like SSLeay or OpenSSL to implement the protocols (SSL or
TLS)
KeePass
KeePass is an open source as well as free password management tool for the Microsoft Windows as
well as unofficial ports for operating systems such as iOS, Linux, Android, Mac OS X and Windows
Phone. All the usernames, passwords and all other fields are stored by KeePass in a secured
encrypted database. This database in turn is protected by a single password.
Intrusion Detection System and the IDs Tools
An Intrusion Detection System is a software application or a device which is equipped to do network
or system monitoring activities for any malicious threats and sends reports to the management station.
Intrusion detection tools can help in identifying potential threats which can be dangerous for the
system or the network.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Snort
• NetCop
Hacking Vulnerability Exploitation Tools
A tool which identifies whether a remote host is vulnerable to a security attack and tries to protect the
host by providing a shell or other function remotely, is called a Vulnerability Exploitation tool. Here
is a list of some popular ones:
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Metasploit
• Sqlmap
• Sqlninja
• Social Engineer Toolkit
• NetSparker
• BeEF
• Dradis
Vulnerability Scanners
The scanners which assess the vulnerability of a network or a computer to security attacks are known
as Vulnerability Scanners. The tools might function differently, however all of them aim to provide an
analysis on how vulnerable the system or a network is. Here is a list of the best ones:
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Nessus
• OpenVAS
• Nipper
• Secunia PSI
• Retina
• QualysGuard
• Nexpose
Web Vulnerability Scanners
While vulnerability scanners are meant for your system, the web vulnerability scanners assess the
vulnerability of web applications. It identifies the security vulnerabilities that your app might have by
conducting various tests.
Click the software names to download the software from their website
• Burp Suite
• Webscarab
• Websecurify
• Nikto
• W3af
___________________________
CHAPTER 7
Malware : A hackers Henchman
___________________________
Malware
Malware, short for malicious software, is any software used to disrupt computer operation, gather
sensitive information, or gain access to private computer systems.
Malware is defined by its malicious intent, acting against the requirements of the computer user, and
does not include software that causes unintentional harm due to some deficiency. The term badware is
sometimes used, and applied to both true (malicious) malware and unintentionally harmful software.
Types of Malware
Adware
Adware (short for advertising-supported software) is a type of malware that automatically delivers
advertisements. Common examples of adware include pop-up ads on websites and advertisements
that are displayed by software. Software and applications often offer “free” versions that come
bundled with adware. Most adware is sponsored or authored by advertisers and serves as a revenue
generating tool.
While some adware is solely designed to deliver advertisements, it is not uncommon for adware to
come bundled with spyware that is capable of tracking user activity and stealing information. Due to
the added capabilities of spyware, adware/spyware bundles are significantly more dangerous than
adware on its own.
Spyware
Spyware is a type of malware that functions by spying on user activity without their knowledge.
These spying capabilities can include activity monitoring, collecting keystrokes, data harvesting
(account information, logins, financial data), and more. Spyware often has additional capabilities as
well, ranging from modifying security settings of software or browsers to interfering with network
connections. Spyware spreads by exploiting software vulnerabilities, bundling itself with legitimate
software or in Trojans.
Bot
Bots are software programs created to automatically perform specific operations. While some bots
are created for relatively harmless purposes (video gaming, internet auctions, online contests, etc), it
is becoming increasingly common to see bots being used maliciously. Bots can be used in botnets
(collections of computers to be controlled by third parties) for DDoS attacks, as spambots that render
advertisements on websites, as web spiders that scrape server data, and for distributing malware
disguised as popular search items on download sites. Websites can guard against bots with
CAPTCHA tests that verify users as human.
Bug
In the context of software, a bug is a flaw produces an undesired outcome. These flaws are usually the
result of human error and typically exist in the source code or compilers of a program. Minor bugs
only slightly affect a program’s behaviour and, as a result, can go for long periods of time before
being discovered. More significant bugs can cause crashing or freezing. Security bugs are the most
severe type of bugs and can allow attackers to bypass user authentication, override access privileges,
or steal data. Bugs can be prevented with developer education, quality control and code analysis
tools.
Ransomware
Ransomware is a form of malware that essentially holds a computer system captive while demanding
a ransom. The malware restricts user access to the computer either by encrypting files on the hard
drive or locking down the system and displaying messages that are intended to force the user to pay
the malware creator to remove the restrictions and regain access to their computer. Ransomware
typically spreads like a normal computer worm (see below) ending up on a computer via a
downloaded file or through some other vulnerability in a network service.
Rootkit
A rootkit is a type of malicious software designed to remotely access or control a computer without
being detected by users or security programs. Once a rootkit has been installed it is possible for the
malicious party behind the rootkit to remotely execute files, access/steal information, modify systemconfigurations, alter software (especially any security software that could detect the rootkit), install
concealed malware, or control the computer as part of a botnet.
Rootkit prevention, detection, and removal can be difficult due to their stealthy operation. Because a
rootkit continually hides its presence, typical security products are not effective in detecting and
removing rootkits. As a result, rootkit detection relies on manual methods such as monitoring
computer behaviour for irregular activity, signature scanning, and storage dump analysis.
Organisations and users can protect themselves from rootkits by regularly patching vulnerabilities in
software, applications and operating systems, updating virus definitions, avoiding suspicious
downloads and performing static analysis scans.
Trojan Horse
A Trojan horse, commonly known as a “Trojan,” is a type of malware that disguises itself as a normal
file or program to trick users into downloading and installing malware. A Trojan can give a
malicious party remote access to an infected computer. Once an attacker has access to an infected
computer, it is possible for the attacker to steal data (logins, financial data, even electronic money),
install more malware, modify files, monitor user activity (screen watching, keylogging, etc), use the
computer in botnets, and anonymise internet activity by the attacker.
Virus
A virus is a form of malware that is capable of copying itself and spreading to other computers.
Viruses often spread to other computers by attaching themselves to various programs and executing
code when a user launches one of those infected programs. Viruses can also spread through script
files, documents, and cross-site scripting vulnerabilities in web apps. Viruses can be used to steal
information, harm host computers and networks, create botnets, steal money, render advertisements,
and more.
Worm
Computer worms are among the most common types of malware. They spread over computer
networks by exploiting operating system vulnerabilities. Worms typically cause harm to their host
networks by consuming bandwidth and overloading web servers. Computer worms can also contain
“payloads” that damage host computers. Payloads are pieces of code written to perform actions on
affected computers beyond simply spreading the worm. Payloads are commonly designed to steal
data, delete files, or create botnets.
Computer worms can be classified as a type of computer virus, but there are several characteristics
that distinguish computer worms from regular viruses. A major difference is that computer worms
have the ability to self-replicate and spread independently while viruses rely on human activity to
spread (running a program, opening a file, etc). Worms often spread by sending mass emails with
infected attachments to users’ contacts.
Key logger
A special kind of trojan that records the keyboard and/or mouse activity on a PC and relays the
information over the Internet to someone wishing to record passwords or other personal information.
Zombie Computer
A Trojan horse is used to plant malware on an unsuspecting PC owner's system that allows a remote
computer to use that system to send out spam or to perform other malicious tasks on the Internet
without the owner's knowledge.
Drive-by-Download
The automatic download of software to a user’s computer triggered simply by visiting a Web site or
viewing an HTML formatted email. The download occurs without the user’s consent and oftenwithout any notice at all.
Scareware
Malware that pops up windows claiming your computer is infected and offers to clean it for a fee or
tries to get you to click a link that will install a trojan. The malware can come from a drive-bydownload or from a web page that has other malicious JavaScript on it.
Web beacon or web bug
A small, usually 1×1 pixel, transparent image that is placed somewhere in a web page or e-mail. Due
to its small size and transparency it is visually undetectable by the reader. Because the computer has
to make a request to an external server in order to load this image, whoever planted the image knows
that you have visited the web page or opened the e-mail. The server records the date and time of the
request, along with any other information it receives such as your IP address and browser version.
Backdoors
A backdoor is a method of bypassing normal authentication procedures, usually over a connection to
a network such as the Internet. Once a system has been compromised, one or more backdoors may be
installed in order to allow access in the future, invisibly to the user.
The idea has often been suggested that computer manufacturers preinstall backdoors on their systems
to provide technical support for customers, but this has never been reliably verified. It was reported
in 2014 that US government agencies had been diverting computers purchased by those considered
"targets" to secret workshops where software or hardware permitting remote access by the agency
was installed, considered to be among the most productive operations to obtain access to networks
around the world. Backdoors may be installed by Trojan horses, worms, implants, or other methods.
Malware Symptoms
While these types of malware differ greatly in how they spread and infect computers, they all can
produce similar symptoms. Computers that are infected with malware can exhibit any of the following
symptoms:
Increased CPU usage
Slow computer or web browser speeds
Problems connecting to networks
Freezing or crashing
Modified or deleted files
Appearance of strange files, programs, or desktop icons
Programs running, turning off, or reconfiguring themselves (malware will often reconfigure
or turn off antivirus and firewall programs)
Strange computer behaviour
Emails/messages being sent automatically and without user’s knowledge (a friend receives a
strange email from you that you did not send)
Vulnerability to Malware
Security defects in software
Malware exploits security defects (security bugs or vulnerabilities) in the design of the operating
system, in applications (such as browsers, e.g. older versions of Microsoft Internet Explorer
supported by Windows XP), or in vulnerable versions of browser plugins such as Adobe FlashPlayer, Adobe Acrobat or Reader, or Java.
Sometimes even installing new versions of such plugins does not automatically uninstall old versions.
Security advisories from plug-in providers announce security-related updates.
Common vulnerabilities are assigned CVE IDs and listed in the US National Vulnerability Database.
Secunia PSI is an example of software, free for personal use that will check a PC for vulnerable outof-date software, and attempt to update it.
Malware authors target bugs, or loopholes, to exploit. A common method is exploitation of a buffer
overrun vulnerability, where software designed to store data in a specified region of memory does
not prevent more data than the buffer can accommodate being supplied.
Malware may provide data that overflows the buffer, with malicious executable code or data after the
end; when this payload is accessed it does what the attacker, not the legitimate software, determines.
Insecure design or user error
Early PCs had to be booted from floppy disks; when built-in hard drives became common the
operating system was normally started from them, but it was possible to boot from another boot
device if available, such as a floppy disk, CD-ROM, DVD-ROM, or USB flash drive.
It was common to configure the computer to boot from one of these devices when available. Normallynone would be available; the user would intentionally insert, say, a CD into the optical drive to boot
the computer in some special way, for example to install an operating system. Even without booting,
computers can be configured to execute software on some media as soon as they become available,
e.g. to autorun a CD or USB device when inserted.
Malicious software distributors would trick the user into booting or running from an infected device
or medium; for example, a virus could make an infected computer add autorunnable code to any USBstick plugged into it; anyone who then attached the stick to another computer set to autorun from USBwould in turn become infected, and also pass on the infection in the same way.
More generally, any device that plugs into a USB port - "including gadgets like lights, fans, speakers,
toys, even a digital microscope" can be used to spread malware. Devices can be infected during
manufacturing or supply if quality control is inadequate.
This form of infection can largely be avoided by setting up computers by default to boot from the
internal hard drive, if available, and not to autorun from devices. Intentional booting from another
device is always possible by pressing certain keys during boot.
Older email software would automatically open HTML email containing potentially maliciousJavaScript code; users may also execute disguised malicious email attachments and infected
executable files supplied in other ways.
Over-privileged users and over-privileged code
In computing, privilege refers to how much a user or program is allowed to modify a system. Inpoorly designed computer systems, both users and programs can be assigned more privileges than
they should be, and malware can take advantage of this. The two ways that malware does this is
through overprivileged users and overprivileged code.
Some systems allow all users to modify their internal structures, and such users today would be
considered over-privileged users. This was the standard operating procedure for early
microcomputer and home computer systems, where there was no distinction between an administrator
or root, and a regular user of the system. In some systems, non-administrator users are overprivileged by design, in the sense that they are allowed to modify internal structures of the system. In
some environments, users are over-privileged because they have been inappropriately granted
administrator or equivalent status.
Some systems allow code executed by a user to access all rights of that user, which is known as overprivileged code. This was also standard operating procedure for early microcomputer and home
computer systems. Malware, running as over-privileged code, can use this privilege to subvert the
system. Almost all currently popular operating systems, and also many scripting applications allow
code too many privileges, usually in the sense that when a user executes code, the system allows that
code all rights of that user. This makes users vulnerable to malware in the form of e-mail attachments,
which may or may not be disguised.
Homogeneity
When all computers in a network run the same operating system; upon exploiting one, one worm can
exploit them all. For example, Microsoft Windows or Mac OS X have such a large share of themarket that concentrating on either could enable an exploited vulnerability to subvert a large number
of systems.
Instead, introducing diversity, purely for the sake of robustness, could increase short-term costs for
training and maintenance. However, having a few diverse nodes could deter total shutdown of the
network as long as all the nodes are not part of the same directory service for authentication, and
allow those nodes to help with recovery of the infected nodes. Such separate, functional redundancy
could avoid the cost of a total shutdown, at the cost of increased complexity and reduced usability in
terms of single sign-on authentication.
Malware prevention and removal
There are several general best practices that organisations and individual users should follow to
prevent malware infections. Some malware cases require special prevention and treatment methods,
but following these recommendations will greatly increase a user’s protection from a wide range of
malware:
Install and run anti-malware and firewall software. When selecting software, choose a program that
offers tools for detecting, quarantining, and removing multiple types of malware. At the minimum,
anti-malware software should protect against viruses, spyware, adware, Trojans, and worms. The
combination of anti-malware software and a firewall will ensure that all incoming and existing data
gets scanned for malware and that malware can be safely removed once detected.
Keep software and operating systems up to date with current vulnerability patches. These patches are
often released to patch bugs or other security flaws that could be exploited by attackers.
Be vigilant when downloading files, programs, attachments, etc. Downloads that seem strange or are
from an unfamiliar source often contain malware.
Website security scans
As malware also harms the compromised websites (by breaking reputation, blacklisting in search
engines, etc.), some websites offer vulnerability scanning. Such scans check the website, detect
malware, may note outdated software, and may report known security issues.
"Air gap" isolation or "Parallel Network"
As a last resort, computers can be protected from malware, and infected computers can be prevented
from disseminating trusted information, by imposing an "air gap" (i.e. completely disconnecting themfrom all other networks). However, information can be transmitted in unrecognized ways; in
December 2013 researchers in Germany showed one way that an apparent air gap can be defeated.
Later in 2015, "BitWhisper", a Covert Signaling Channel between Air-Gapped Computers usingThermal Manipulations was introduced. "BitWhisper" supports bidirectional communication andrequires no additional dedicated peripheral hardware.
Grayware
Grayware is a term applied to unwanted applications or files that are not classified as malware, but
can worsen the performance of computers and may cause security risks.
It describes applications that behave in an annoying or undesirable manner, and yet are less serious or
troublesome than malware. Grayware encompasses spyware, adware, fraudulent dialers, joke
programs, remote access tools and other unwanted programs that harm the performance of computers
or cause inconvenience. The term came into use around 2004.
Another term, PUP, which stands for Potentially Unwanted Program (or PUA Potentially UnwantedApplication), refers to applications that would be considered unwanted despite often having been
downloaded by the user, possibly after failing to read a download agreement. PUPs include spyware,
adware, fraudulent dialers. Many security products classify unauthorised key generators as grayware,
although they frequently carry true malware in addition to their ostensible purpose.
Software maker Malwarebytes lists several criteria for classifying a program as a PUP.
__________________________
CHAPTER 8
Common Attacks and Viruses
__________________________
Identify Theft
Identity theft criminals come in all shapes and sizes these days. If you're ever unlucky enough to be a
victim of identity theft, the culprit is far more likely to be a local meth user than a professional
hacker. That said, most organized crimes gangs around the world are becoming much more involved
in computer hacking. Computer identity theft can happen in a number of ways. Criminal organizations
can use their own hackers, hire college students, or simply buy large amounts of stolen information
from professional hackers. And the result is a spike in the number and size of reported data breaches
by hackers.
Hacking attacks can be launched in a number of ways:
Attacking computers that don't have firewalls installed.
Installing keystroke loggers or other malicious code by hiding it in email attachments.
Exploiting browser vulnerabilities that have not been properly patched.
Exploiting weak or poorly protected passwords.
Hiding malicious code in downloads or free software.
Hiding malicious code in images on websites and waiting for unsuspecting users to click on
them.
Employees or other trusted users simply accessing an unprotected computer.
Exploiting poorly installed networks, and especially wireless home networks.
How does identify theft work?
First things first, your social security number isn't necessarily a magic ticket to your identity—it's
really more like a cheat code. If you know where, when, and how to use someone else's number, you
can effectively steal their identity and cause them significant hardship. Former public and now private
investigator Randy Barnhart explains how easy it is to gain a line of credit in someone else's name if
you know what to do:
Many retailers of er credit cards, most of er Visa and Master Card accounts as well. If I
have someone's social security number, all I have to do is complete a one page credit
application using the stolen SSN and hand it to a cashier that is 18-20 years old. Thecashier enters the SSN into their system and a line of credit is issued. Depending on the
victim's credit rating, the line of credit can be $1000 to $100,000. Usually the cashier
hands me a temporary shopping pass with a limited balance that I can use immediately.
If they have multiple identities, the thief can open several accounts and max out the
credit line very quickly.
Barnhart suggests that this would be simple to stop, as additional security checks would be required,
but this would involve the sacrifice of convenience—something we're not always eager to abandon.
It's also not the sort of thing retailers want to give up because they make a lot of money off of
providing you with a credit line.
Even still, that's just one example of the many problems that can arise from identity theft. We tend to
concentrate only on the monetary damage, but much more can occur. Matt Davis, a victim advisor for
the Identity Theft Resource Center, explains many of the other issues:
ID thieves can use an social security number to procure your medical benefits, social
security, unemployment, file false tax returns, and even pawn of their criminal charges
when they have run-ins with the law on you. The possibilities are limitless with the right
information and an informed thief. A credit report will not show you if anyone is running
up criminal charges as you, using your medical insurance to finance medical procedures,
or creating a fraudulent job history report by working under your information.
Basically, your identity is valuable to different kinds of people for different reasons. You might be
targeted for a line of credit or because an illegal immigrant needs "lawful" employment and health
care. Monitoring your credit report isn't enough. You need to pay attention to everything if you're
going to catch a thief.
How can one protect them from identity theft?
There's no way you can stop a young retail cashier from processing a credit application they don't
know is fraudulent, or much of anything that would stop the thief once they have your social security
number. Your goal is to make sure that number stays with you and doesn't get in the hands of anyone
you don't trust. The easiest way to procure a social security number from a victim is by going through
their trash, as your mail will sometimes have your number on it. There are also other ways your
number can leave your protection. As a result, you'll want to do the following:
If your social security number does appear on any documents, destroy them before you throw
them out.
Never give out your social security number to any third-party unless you know they need it
(e.g. a credit application) and you trust the organization. Before handing it over, you may
want to ask what measures they take to ensure social security numbers are not recorded. For
example, a friend of mine works in a sales job. They're not allowed to have cellphones or
any devices connected to the internet. They can't use computers, either, aside from the one
provided. This is to make it virtually impossible for them to record any credit card numbers
they receive from a customer. While a company is not going to outlaw pencil and paper,
therefore not completely eliminating the possibility of your social security number leaving
the building, they likely take several countermeasures to help protect you. If you're worried,
ask. Whoever is requesting the number likely knows about them since they live with themevery day.
Before handing over your social security number to any company, ask if it will ever appear
on a document they send you in the mail. Also find out how it is securely stored on their
servers so it will be protected in case of a hack.
Avoid entering your social security number online unless you are absolutely sure you're on a
secure connection and dealing with a company you can trust. If you're not, call them to verify
or don't do it.
Spoofing Attacks
A spoofing attack is when a malicious party impersonates another device or user on a network in
order to launch attacks against network hosts, steal data, spread malware or bypass access controls.
There are several different types of spoofing attacks that malicious parties can use to accomplish this.
Some of the most common methods include IP address spoofing attacks, ARP spoofing attacks and
DNS server spoofing attacks.
IP address spoofing attacks
IP address spoofing is one of the most frequently used spoofing attack methods. In an IP address
spoofing attack, an attacker sends IP packets from a false (or “spoofed”) source address in order to
disguise itself. Denial-of-service attacks often use IP spoofing to overload networks and devices withpackets that appear to be from legitimate source IP addresses.
What sorts of attacks are launched through IP spoofing? To name a few:
Blind spoofing: In this type of attack, a cracker outside the perimeter of the local network
transmits multiple packets to his intended target to receive a series of sequence numbers,
which are generally used to assemble packets in the order in which they were intended --
Packet 1 is to be read first, then Packet 2, 3 and so on. The cracker is blind to howtransmissions take place on this network, so he needs to coax the machine into responding to
his own requests so he can analyze the sequence numbers. By taking advantage of knowing
the sequence number, the cracker can falsify his identity by injecting data into the stream of
packets without having to have authenticated himself when the connection was first
established. (Generally, current operating systems employ random sequence number
generation, so it's more difficult for crackers to predict the correct sequence number.)
Nonblind spoofing: In this type of attack, the cracker resides on the same subnet as his
intended target, so by sniffing the wire for existing transmissions, he can understand an
entire sequence/acknowledge cycle between his target and other hosts (hence the cracker
isn't "blind" to the sequence numbers). Once the sequence is known, the attacker can hijack
sessions that have already been built by disguising himself as another machine, bypassing
any sort of authentication that was previously conducted on that connection.
Denial-of-service attack: To keep a large-scale attack on a machine or group of machines
from being detected, spoofing is often used by the malefactors responsible for the event to
disguise the source of the attacks and make it difficult to shut it off. Spoofing takes on a
whole new level of severity when multiple hosts are sending constant streams of packet to
the DoS target. In that case, all the transmissions are generally spoofed, making it verydifficult to track down the sources of the storm.
Man-in-the-middle attack: Imagine two hosts participating in normal transmissions
between each other. In a man-in-the-middle attack, a malicious machine intercepts the
packets sent between these machines, alters the packets and then sends them on to the
intended destination, with the originating and receiving machines unaware their
communications have been tampered with; this is where the spoofing element enters the
equation. Typically, this type of attack is used to get targets to reveal secure information and
continue such transmissions for a period of time, all the while unaware that the machine in
the middle of the transmission is eavesdropping the whole time.
ARP spoofing attacks
ARP is short for Address Resolution Protocol, a protocol that is used to resolve IP addresses toMAC (Media Access Control) addresses for transmitting data. In an ARP spoofing attack, a malicious
party sends spoofed ARP messages across a local area network in order to link the attacker’s MACaddress with the IP address of a legitimate member of the network. This type of spoofing attackresults in data that is intended for the host’s IP address getting sent to the attacker instead. Malicious
parties commonly use ARP spoofing to steal information, modify data in-transit or stop traffic on a
LAN. ARP spoofing attacks can also be used to facilitate other types of attacks, including denial-ofservice, session hijacking and man-in-the-middle attacks. ARP spoofing only works on local area
networks that use the Address Resolution Protocol.
DNS server spoofing attacks
The Domain Name System (DNS) is a system that associates domain names with IP addresses.Devices that connect to the internet or other private networks rely on the DNS for resolving URLs,email addresses and other human-readable domain names into their corresponding IP addresses. In a
DNS server spoofing attack, a malicious party modifies the DNS server in order to reroute a specificdomain name to a different IP address. In many cases, the new IP address will be for a server that is
actually controlled by the attacker and contains files infected with malware. DNS server spoofingattacks are often used to spread computer worms and viruses.
Spoofing attack prevention and mitigation
There are many tools and practices that organisations can employ to reduce the threat of spoofing
attacks. Common measures that organisations can take for spoofing attack prevention include:
Packet filtering: packet filters inspect packets as they are transmitted across a network.
Packet filters are useful in IP address spoofing attack prevention because they are capable of
filtering out and blocking packets with conflicting source address information (packets from
outside the network that show source addresses from inside the network and vice versa).
Avoid trust relationships: organisations should develop protocols that rely on trust
relationships as little as possible. It is significantly easier for attackers to run spoofing
attacks when trust relationships are in place because trust relationships only use IP
addresses for authentication.
Use spoofing detection software: There are many programs available that help
organisations detect spoofing attacks, particularly ARP spoofing. These programs work byinspecting and certifying data before it is transmitted and blocking data that appears to be
spoofed.
Use cryptographic network protocols: Transport Layer Security (TLS), Secure Shell(SSH), HTTP Secure (HTTPS) and other secure communications protocols bolster spoofingattack prevention efforts by encrypting data before it is sent and authenticating data as it is
received.
Phishing Attacks
Phishing is an e-mail fraud method in which the perpetrator sends out legitimate-looking email in an
attempt to gather personal and financial information from recipients. Typically, the messages appear
to come from well-known and trustworthy Web sites. Web sites that are frequently spoofed by
phishers include PayPal, eBay, MSN, Yahoo, BestBuy, and America Online. A phishing expedition,
like the fishing expedition it's named for, is a speculative venture: the phisher puts the lure hoping to
fool at least a few of the prey that encounter the bait.
Fraudsters send fake emails or set up fake web sites that mimic Yahoo!'s sign-in pages (or the sign-in
pages of other trusted companies, such as eBay or PayPal) to trick you into disclosing your user name
and password. This practice is sometimes referred to as "phishing" — a play on the word "fishing"
— because the fraudster is fishing for your private account information. Typically, fraudsters try to
trick you into providing your user name and password so that they can gain access to an online
account. Once they gain access, they can use your personal information to commit identity theft,
charge your credit cards, empty your bank accounts, read your email, and lock you out of your online
account by changing your password.
If you receive an email (or instant message) from someone you don't know directing you to sign in to a
website, be careful! You may have received a phishing email with links to a phishing website. A
phishing website (sometimes called a "spoofed" site) tries to steal your account password or other
confidential information by tricking you into believing you're on a legitimate website. You could even
land on a phishing site by mistyping a URL (web address).
Is that website legitimate? Don't be fooled by a site that looks real. It's easy for phishers to create
websites that look like the genuine article, complete with the logo and other graphics of a trusted
website.
Important: If you're at all unsure about a website, do not sign in. The safest thing to do is to close andthen reopen your browser, and then type the URL into your browser's URL bar. Typing the correct
URL is the best way to be sure you're not redirected to a spoofed site.
Signs you May have Received a Phishing Email
If you receive an email from a web site or company urging you to provide confidential information,
such as a password or Social Security number, you might be the target of a phishing scam. The tips
below can help you avoid being taken in by phishers.
Unofficial "From" address
Look out for a sender's email address that is similar to, but not the same as, a company's official
email address. Fraudsters often sign up for free email accounts with company names in them (such as
"ysmallbusiness@yahoo.com"). These email addresses are meant to fool you. Official email fromYahoo! always comes from an "@yahoo-inc.com" email address.
Urgent action required
Fraudsters often include urgent "calls to action" to try to get you to react immediately. Be wary of
emails containing phrases like "your account will be closed," "your account has been compromised,"
or "urgent action required." The fraudster is taking advantage of your concern to trick you into
providing confidential information.
Generic greeting
Fraudsters often send thousands of phishing emails at one time. They may have your email address,
but they seldom have your name. Be skeptical of an email sent with a generic greeting such as "Dear
Customer" or "Dear Member".
Link to a fake web site
To trick you into disclosing your user name and password, fraudsters often include a link to a fake
web site that looks like (sometimes exactly like) the sign-in page of a legitimate web site. Just
because a site includes a company's logo or looks like the real page doesn't mean it is! Logos and the
appearance of legitimate web sites are easy to copy. In the email, look out for:
Links containing an official company name, but in the wrong location. For example:
"https://www.yahoo.com is a fake address that doesn't go to a real Yahoo! web site. A real Yahoo!
web address has a forward slash ("/") after "yahoo.com" — for example, "https://www.yahoo.com/"
or "https://login.yahoo.com/."
Legitimate links mixed with fake links
Fraudsters sometimes include authentic links in their spoof pages, such as to the genuine privacy
policy and terms of service pages for the site they're mimicking. These authentic links are mixed in
with links to a fake phishing web site in order to make the spoof site appear more realistic.
And look for these other indicators that an email might not be trustworthy:
Spelling errors, poor grammar, or inferior graphics.
Requests for personal information such as your password, Social Security number,
or bank account or credit card number. Legitimate companies will never ask you to
verify or provide confidential information in an unsolicited email.
Attachments (which might contain viruses or keystroke loggers, which record what
you type).
Signs you May be on a Phishing Site
Phishers are becoming more and more sophisticated in designing their phony websites, follow these
steps if you think you’ve been phished. There's no surefire way to know if you're on a phishing site,
but here are some hints that can help you distinguish a real website from a phishing site:
Check the Web address
Just because the address looks OK, don't assume you're on a legitimate site. Look in your browser'sURL bar for these signs that you may be on a phishing site:
Incorrect company name. Often the web address of a phishing site looks correct but
actually contains a common misspelling of the company name or a character or
symbol before or after the company name. Look for tricks such as substituting the
number "1" for the letter "l" in a Web address (for example, www.paypa1.com
instead of www.paypal.com).
"http://" at the start of the address on Yahoo sign-in pages. A legitimate Yahoo
sign-in page address starts with "https://" ― the letter "s" must be included. So
check the website address for any Yahoo sign-in page.
A missing forward slash. To verify that you're on a legitimate Yahoo site, make
sure a forward slash ( / ) appears after "yahoo.com" in the URL bar, for example,
"https://www.yahoo.com” is a fake website address.
Be leery of pop-ups
Be careful if you're sent to a website that immediately displays a pop-up window asking you to enter
your username and password. Phishing scams may direct you to a legitimate website and then use a
pop-up to gain your account information.
Give a fake password
If you not sure if a site is authentic, don't use your real password to sign in. If you enter a fake
password and appear to be signed in, you're likely on a phishing site. Do not enter any more
information; close your browser. Keep in mind, though, that some phishing sites automatically display
an error message regardless of the password you enter. So, just because your fake password is
rejected, don't assume the site is legitimate.
Use a Web browser with antiphishing detection
Internet Explorer, Mozilla Firefox, Web browsers have free add-ons (or "plug-ins") that can help youdetect phishing sites.
Be wary of other methods to identify a legitimate site
Some methods used to indicate a safe site can't always be trusted. A small unbroken key or locked
padlock at the left of the URL bar of your browser is not a reliable indicator of a legitimate website.
Just because there's a key or lock and the security certificate looks authentic, don't assume the site is
legitimate.
Different types of Phishing
Deceptive Phishing
Malware-Based Phishing
Keyloggers and Screenloggers
Session Hijacking
Web Trojans
Hosts File Poisoning
System Reconfiguration Attacks
Data Theft
DNS-Based Phishing ("Pharming")
Content-Injection Phishing
Man-in-the-Middle Phishing
Search Engine Phishing
Deceptive Phishing
A phisher sends bulk email with a message. Users are influenced to click on a link.
Examples: An email stating that there is a problem with recipient’s account at financial institutions
and requests the recipient to click on a website link to update his details. A statement may be sent to
the recipient stating that his account is at risk and offering to enroll him to an anti-fraud program. In
any of the case, the website collects the user’s confidential information. The phisher will
subsequently impersonate the victim and transfer funds from his account, purchase merchandise, take
a second mortgage on the victim’s house or cause any other damage. In most of these cases, the
phisher does not directly cause any economic damage, but sells the illegally obtained information on
a secondary market.
Malware-based Phishing
Malware-based phishing involves running malicious software on the user’s machine. The malware
can be introduced as an email attachment or as a downloadable file exploiting security
vulnerabilities. This is a particular threat for small and medium businesses (SMBs) who fails toupdate their their software applications.
Keyloggers and Screenloggers
Keyloggers and screenloggers are varieties of malware that track input from the keyboard and send
relevant information to the hacker via the Internet. They can embed themselves into the user’s
browsers as small utility programs.
Session Hijacking
Session Hijacking is a kind of phishing attack where user’s activities are monitored clearly until theylog into a target account like the bank account and establish their credentials. At that point, the
malicious software takes control and can undertake unauthorized actions, such as transferring funds,
without the knowledge of the user.
Web Trojans
Web Trojans pop up when the users attempt to log in to an important website or performing any
transaction. These web trojans are invisible to the users. They collect user's credentials locally and
transmit them to the phisher.
Hosts File Poisoning
When a user types a URL of a website it is first translated into an IP address before it's transmittedover the Internet. The majority of user’s PCs running a Microsoft Windows operating system firstlook up these "host names" in their "hosts" file before undertaking a Domain Name System (DNS)lookup. Phishers steal information by "poisoning" the hosts file. They transmit a bogus address, takingthe user unwittingly to a fake "look alike" website.
System Reconfiguration Attacks
This is a kind of phishing attack where the settings on a user's PC are modified with bad intentions.
For example: URLs in a favorites file might be modified to direct users to bogus websites that lookalike. For example: a financial institution's website URL may be changed from "bankofxyz.com" to"bancofxyz.com".
Data Theft
Malicious code running on a user’s computer, can directly steal confidential information stored on the
computer. This information can include activation keys to software, passwords, sensitive and
personal email and any other data that is stored on the victim's computer. Data theft is also widely
used for phishing attacks aimed at corporate espionage. In addition, confidential memos, design
documents or billing info can be publicly leaked, causing embarrassment or financial damage to the
organization. This data can also be leaked to competitors.
DNS-Based Phishing
Domain Name System (DNS)-based phishing or hosts file modification is called Pharming. Therequests for URLs or name service return a bogus address and subsequent communications are
directed to a fake site when the hackers tamper a company’s host files or domain name. As a result,
users remain unaware about the fraud website controlled by hackers.
Content-Injection Phishing
Content-injection phishing means inserting malicious content into a legitimate website. The malicious
content can redirect to other websites or may install malware on a user’s computer and also insert a
frame of content that will redirect data to the phishing server.
Man-in-the-Middle Phishing
Man-in-the-Middle Phishing is hard to detect than many other forms of phishing. In these attackshackers sit between the user and the website or the system. They record the information being entered
by the user but continue to pass the user on to the next steps so that user transactions are not affected
and the user remains unaware. Later, they sell or use the information which may be credentials, credit
card details, and bank account details.
Search Engine Phishing
Phishers develop e-commerce websites with attractive offers. Later these sites are indexed
legitimately with different search engines. When users search for products or services, these sites are
shown by the search engine and are fooled into giving up their information. For example, scammers
have set up false banking sites that offer lower credit costs or better interest rates than other banks.
Victims are often encouraged to transfer account details. In this way, they are deceived into giving up
their details.
Social Engineering
Social engineering, in the context of information security, refers to psychological manipulation of
people into performing actions or divulging confidential information. A type of confidence trick for
the purpose of information gathering, fraud, or system access, it differs from a traditional "con" in that
it is often one of many steps in a more complex fraud scheme.
The term "social engineering" as an act of psychological manipulation is also associated with the
social sciences, but its usage has caught on among computer and information security professionals.
All social engineering techniques are based on specific attributes of human decision-making known
as cognitive biases. These biases, sometimes called "bugs in the human hardware", are exploited in
various combinations to create attack techniques, some of which are listed. The attacks used in social
engineering can be used to steal employees' confidential information. The most common type of social
engineering happens over the phone. Other examples of social engineering attacks are criminals
posing as exterminators, fire marshals and technicians to go unnoticed as they steal company secrets.
One example of social engineering is an individual who walks into a building and posts an officiallooking announcement to the company bulletin that says the number for the help desk has changed. So,
when employees call for help the individual asks them for their passwords and ID's thereby gainingthe ability to access the company's private information. Another example of social engineering would
be that the hacker contacts the target on social networking site and start conversation with the target.
Slowly and gradually, the hacker gains trust of the target and then uses it to get access to sensitive
information like password or bank account details.
Pretexting
Pretexting (adj. pretextual), also known in the UK as blagging or bohoing, is the act of creating andusing an invented scenario (the pretext) to engage a targeted victim in a manner that increases the
chance the victim will divulge information or perform actions that would be unlikely in ordinary
circumstances. An elaborate lie, it most often involves some prior research or setup and the use of
this information for impersonation (e.g., date of birth, Social Security number, last bill amount) to
establish legitimacy in the mind of the target.
Diversion Theft
Diversion theft, also known as the "Corner Game" or "Round the Corner Game", originated in theEast End of London.
In summary, diversion theft is a "con" exercised by professional thieves, normally against a transport
or courier company. The objective is to persuade the persons responsible for a legitimate delivery
that the consignment is requested elsewhere hence, "round the corner".
Baiting
Baiting is like the real-world Trojan Horse that uses physical media and relies on the curiosity or
greed of the victim.
In this attack, the attacker leaves a malware infected floppy disk, CD-ROM, or USB flash drive in alocation sure to be found (bathroom, elevator, sidewalk, parking lot), gives it a legitimate looking and
curiosity-piquing label, and simply waits for the victim to use the device.
In either case, as a consequence of merely inserting the disk into a computer to see the contents, the
user would unknowingly install malware on it, likely giving an attacker unfettered access to the
victim's PC and, perhaps, the targeted company's internal computer network.
Unless computer controls block the infection, PCs set to "auto-run" inserted media may be
compromised as soon as a rogue disk is inserted.
Hostile devices, more attractive than simple memory, can also be used. For instance, a "lucky
winner" is sent a free digital audio player that actually compromises any computer it is plugged to.
Tailgating
An attacker, seeking entry to a restricted area secured by unattended, electronic access control, e.g.
by RFID card, simply walks in behind a person who has legitimate access. Following commoncourtesy, the legitimate person will usually hold the door open for the attacker or the attackers
themselves may ask the employee to hold it open for them. The legitimate person may fail to ask for
identification for any of several reasons, or may accept an assertion that the attacker has forgotten or
lost the appropriate identity token. The attacker may also fake the action of presenting an identity
token.
Shoulder Surfing
Shoulder surfing is using direct observation techniques, such as looking over someone's shoulder, to
get information. Shoulder surfing is an effective way to get information in crowded places because
it's relatively easy to stand next to someone and watch as they fill out a form, enter a PIN number at an
ATM machine, or use a calling card at a public pay phone. Shoulder surfing can also be done longdistance with the aid of binoculars or other vision-enhancing devices. To prevent shoulder surfing,
experts recommend that you shield paperwork or your keypad from view by using your body or
cupping your hand.
Dumpster Diving
Alternatively referred to as trashing, dumpster diving is the practice of digging through a company's
trash bins or dumpsters to gain information. This act is carried out for a number reasons, from seeking
passwords for a network attack, to personal information for social engineering.
When dumpster diving, hackers look for:
Phone lists
Helps map out the power structure of the company, and gives possible account names, and is essential
in appearing as a member of the organization.
Memos
Reveal activities inside the target organization.
Policy manuals
Today's employee manuals give instructions on how not to be victimized by hackers, and likewise
help the hacker know which attacks to avoid, or at least try in a different manner than specified in the
policy manual.
Calenders of events
Tells the hackers when everyone will be elsewhere and not logged into the system. Best time to break
in.
System Manuals, Packing Crates
Tells the hackers about new systems that they can break into.
Print outs
Source code is frequently found in dumpsters, along with e-mails (revealing account names), and
PostIt&tm; notes containing written passwords.
Disks, Tapes, CD-ROMs
People forget to erase storage media, leaving sensitive data exposed. These days, dumpsters maycontain larger number of "broken" CD-Rs. The CD-ROM "burning" process is sensitive, and can leadto failures, which are simply thrown away. However, some drives can still read these disks, allowing
the hacker to read a half-way completed backup or other sensitive piece of information.
Old Hard Drives
Like CD-ROMs, information from broken drives can usually be recovered. It depends only upon thehacker's determination.
Organizational changes, such as mergers, acquitistions, and "re-orgs" leave the company in disarray
that can be exploited by hackers (in much the same way that hackers look upon January 1, 2000 as a
prime hacking day)
Trojan Horses
A trojan horse is a program that appears to be something safe, but in is performing tasks such as
giving access to your computer or sending personal information to other computers. Trojan horses are
one of the most common methods a criminal uses to infect your computer and collect personal
information from your computer. Below are some basic examples of how your computer could
become infected with a trojan horse.
If you were referred here, you may have been “hacked” by a Trojan horse attack. It’s crucial that you
read this page and fix yourself immediately. Failure to do so could result in being disconnected fromthe IRC network, letting strangers access your private files, or worst yet, allowing your computer tobe hijacked and used in criminal attacks on others.
How do I avoid getting infected in the future?
You must be certain of BOTH the source AND content of each file you download! In other words,you need to be sure that you trust not only the person or file server that gave you the file, but also the
contents of the file itself.
Know the source.
Ask questions. Even when you trust the source, it’s easy for a trojan to impersonate a user
when it has control of their computer. Ask questions to determine what the file is before you
download.
Expect the file. If you weren’t expecting a file transfer or attachment, then don’t download it
until you check with the sender personally.
Does everything make sense? If it looks suspicious, it probably is. File types, filenames, anddescriptions should all agree. Your dear aunt Sally wouldn’t put family photos in an Excel
spreadsheet, right? :)
Even when everything else is in order, check the contents with virus scanners.
Remember: Better to ask and feel silly, than to download blindly and be sorry.
Here are some practical tips to avoid getting infected (again). For more general security information,
please see our main security help page.
1. NEVER download blindly from people or sites which you aren’t 100% sure about. Inother words, as the old saying goes, don’t accept candy from strangers. If you do a lot
of file downloading, it’s often just a matter of time before you fall victim to a trojan.
2. Even if the file comes from a friend, you still must be sure what the file is before
opening it, because many trojans will automatically try to spread themselves to friends
in an email address book or on an IRC channel. There is seldom reason for a friend tosend you a file that you didn’t ask for. When in doubt, ask them first, and scan the
attachment with a fully updated anti-virus program.
3. Beware of hidden file extensions! Windows by default hides the last extension of a file,
so that innocuous-looking “susie.jpg” might really be “susie.jpg.exe” - an executable
trojan! To reduce the chances of being tricked, unhide those pesky extensions.
4. NEVER use features in your programs that automatically get or preview files. Thosefeatures may seem convenient, but they let anybody send you anything which is
extremely reckless. For example, never turn on “auto DCC get” in mIRC, insteadALWAYS screen every single file you get manually. Likewise, disable the preview
mode in Outlook and other email programs.
5. Never blindly type commands that others tell you to type, or go to web addresses
mentioned by strangers, or run pre-fabricated programs or scripts (not even popular
ones). If you do so, you are potentially trusting a stranger with control over your
computer, which can lead to trojan infection or other serious harm.
6. Don’t be lulled into a false sense of security just because you run anti-virus programs.
Those do not protect perfectly against many viruses and trojans, even when fully up to
date. Anti-virus programs should not be your front line of security, but instead they
serve as a backup in case something sneaks onto your computer.
7. Finally, don’t download an executable program just to “check it out” - if it’s a trojan,
the first time you run it, you’re already infected!
How do I get rid of trojans?
Here are your many options, none of them are perfect. I strongly suggest you read through all of thembefore rushing out and trying to run some program blindly. Remember - that’s how you got in this
trouble in the first place.
To repair or to reformat?
The decision whether to attempt to repair an infected computer or reformat and do a clean
reinstallation is a difficult one. On one hand, no antimalware software will ever be able to
provide 100% assurance that all malware has been removed. On the other hand, most
infections are from the same couple of hundred actively circulating trojans, that are well
understood and reliably removed by the appropriate removal tool, and a clean reformat and
reinstall with take anywhere from several hours to several days.
As a practical matter, it’s worth trying to repair infected computers first. Most of the time,
you can completely get rid of the infection quickly and easily. If an infection persistantly
returns, it’s likely that it wasn’t completely removed in the first place, at which point
stronger measures should be considered.
Repairing the Damage
Anti-Virus Software: Some of these can handle most of the well known trojans, but none
are perfect, no matter what their advertising claims. You absolutely MUST make sure you
have the very latest update files for your programs, or else they will miss the latest trojans.
Compared to traditional viruses, today’s trojans evolve much quicker and come in many
seemingly innocuous forms, so anti-virus software is always going to be playing catch up.
Also, if they fail to find every trojan, anti-virus software can give you a false sense of
security, such that you go about your business not realizing that you are still dangerously
compromised. There are many products to choose from, but the following are generally
effective: AVP, PC-cillin, and McAfee VirusScan.
Anti-Trojan Programs: These programs are the most effective against trojan horse attacks,
because they specialize in trojans instead of general viruses.
Clean Re-installation
When all else fails, or when any risk of continued infection is unacceptable, the only option
left is a clean re-installation. Although arduous, this will always be the only sure way to
eradicate a trojan or virus.
A clean re-installation will take anywhere from several hours to several days to fully
complete, depending on your system configuration, operating system, amount of data to be
recovered, and many other factors. This will require some degree of technical competency,
and you will need to have your original operating system or recovery media, as well as
original media for any application software, as well as any license keys ready before you
begin.
Extreme caution must be taken in backing up and restoring data to make sure that the
infection is not reintroduced when data is restored.
A professional PC repair shop can be contracted locally to perform a clean reinstallation,
should you not feel capable of doing so yourself.
1. Back up your entire hard disk.
2. Reformat the disk.
3. Re-install the operating system and all your applications from original CDs
4. Install security software and configure it according to manufacturer’s
recommendations.
5. Install all operating system updates. (Setting updates to automatically install
here is a good idea too.)
6. Install all updates to your application software.
7. Make sure system is clean up to this point by scanning the system.
8. At this point, you may wish to make an image of your system in a pristine
state, before restoring anything from backup. You can use this image at a
later time to speed up a clean reinstallation by only needing to download
updates.
9. Treat the contents of the backup as infected, and handle accordingly during
the restore process. Scan everything you decide to restore, and restore only
your user files, and not configuration files for programs, registry settings, or
applications.
This will take several hours, and require some degree of technical competancy. If you are
not up to the task a professional repair shop can be paid to perform these steps.
Computer Virus
A computer virus is a computer program that can replicate itself and spread from one computer to
another. When these infected programs are run, the viral code is executed and the virus spreads
further. Sometimes, what constitutes “programs” is more than simply applications: boot code, device
drivers, and command interpreters also can be infected.
A computer virus is one of thousands of programs that can invade computer and perform a variety of
functions ranging from annoying (e.g., popping up messages as a joke) to dangerous (e.g., deleting
files or destroying your hard disk).
Viruses can increase their chances of spreading to other computers by infecting files on a network file
system or a file system that is accessed by other computers.
The term "computer virus" is sometimes used as a catch-all phrase to include all types of malware,
even those that do not have the ability to replicate themselves. Malware includes computer viruses,
computer worms, Trojan horses, most rootkits, spyware, dishonest adware and other malicious or
unwanted software, including true viruses. Viruses are sometimes confused with worms and Trojan
horses, which are technically different.
How Do Viruses Spread
Computer viruses are programs that must be triggered or somehow executed before they can infect
your computer system and spread to others. Examples include opening a document infected with a
“macro virus,” booting with a diskette infected with a “boot sector” virus, or double-clicking on an
infected program file. Viruses can then be spread by sharing infected files on a diskette, network
drive, or other media, by exchanging infected files over the Internet via e-mail attachments, or by
downloading questionable files from the Internet.
Types of Virus
Viruses come in a variety of types. Breaking them into categories is not easy as many viruses have
multiple characteristics and so would fall into multiple categories. We're going to describe two
different types of category systems: what they infect and how they infect. Because they are so
common, we're also going to include a category specific to worms.
These categories include :
System Sector Viruses : These infect control information on the disk itself.
File Viruses : These infect program (COM and EXE) files.
Macro Viruses : These infect files you might think of as data files. But, because they containmacro programs they can be infected,
Companion Viruses : A special type that adds files that run first to your disk.
Cluster Viruses : A special type that infects through the disk directory.
Batch File Viruses : These use text batch files to infect.
Source Code Viruses : These add code to actual program source code.
Visual Basic Worms : These worms use the Visual Basic language to control the computer
and perform tasks.
How They Infect
Viruses are sometimes also categorized by how they infect. These categorizations often overlap the
categories above and may even be included in the description (e.g., polymorphic file virus). These
categories include:
Polymorphic Viruses : Viruses that change their characteristics as they infect.
Stealth Viruses : Viruses that try to actively hide themselves from anti-virus or systemsoftware.
Fast and Slow Infectors : Viruses that infect in a particular way to try to avoid specific
anti-virus software.
Sparse Infectors : Viruses that don't infect very often.
Armored Viruses : Viruses that are programmed to make disassembly difficult.
Multipartite Viruses : Viruses that may fall into more than one of the top classes.
Cavity (Spacefiller) Viruses : Viruses that attempt to maintain a constant file size when
infecting.
Tunneling Viruses : Viruses that try to "tunnel" under anti-virus software while infecting,
Camouflage Viruses : Viruses that attempted to appear as a benign program to scanners.
NTFS ADS Viruses : Viruses that ride on the alternate data streams in the NT File System.
Virus Droppers : Programs that place vises onto your system but themselves may not be
viruses (a special form of Trojan).
Some Famous & Worst Computer Virus
Year Computer
Virus Name
Description
1971 Creeper This is noted as possibly the first ever
computer virus. It infected computers on
ARPANET.
1982 Elk Cloner Despite Apple's marketing that their
systems are less prone to viruses that
was not always the case. Notable as
possible the first personal computer
virus, Elk Cloner infected the boot
sector of Apple II floppies.
1988 The Morris
Internet
Worm
The grandfather of computer worms,
the Morris worm infected Unix systems
and was notable for its "accidental"
virulence.
1999 Melissa The Melissa virus is notable because it
is a Word macro virus. It cleverly
spread via e-mails sent to contacts from
the infected users' address books.
2000 ILOVEYOU One of the most widespread and rapidly
spreading viruses ever, the ILOVEYOU
virus spread via e-mail, posing as an
executable attachment sent by a friend
from the target's contact list.
2001 Code Red Code Red was a computer worm
observed on the Internet on July 13,
2001. It attacked computers running
Microsoft's IIS web server.
2001 Nimda Nimda is a computer worm, also a file
infector. It quickly spread, surpassing
the economic damage caused by
previous outbreaks such as Code Red.
Nimda utilized several types of
propagation technique and this caused it
to become the Internet’s most
widespread virus/worm within 22
minutes.
2003 SQL
Slammer
This tiny virus infected servers running
Microsoft's SQL Server Desktop
Engine, and was very fast to spread.
2003 Blaster Blaster exploited a Windows operating
system vulnerability and let users know
of its presence with a system shutdown
warning.
2004 Sasser Sasser exploited a buffer overflow and
spread by connecting to port 445 on
networked Windows systems. The
chaos caused was possibly the worst
ever, as systems restarted or crashed.
Anti-Virus Software
Anti-virus software are programs that are installed onto your computer and can scan and
remove known viruses which you may have contracted. The software can also be set to
automatically scan diskettes when inserted into the disk drive, scan files when downloaded
from the Internet, or scan e-mail when received.
Antivirus or anti-virus software is used to prevent, detect, and remove malware, including
but not limited to computer viruses, computer worms, Trojan horses, spyware and adware.
Computer security, including protection from social engineering techniques, is commonly
offered in products and services of antivirus software companies.
Example of Antivirus Software: AVG, Kaspersky, Avira, Quick-Heal, Bit-defender,
McAfee, Trend Micro, etc.
How can you protect yourself?
With dangerous viruses on the network, what can computer users do to protect their systems? Here
are just a few hints:
Be sure to install an anti-virus software program to guard against virus attacks. Also, be sure
you turn on the scanning features. It can’t protect you if it’s not enabled.
Practice caution when working with files from unknown or questionable sources.
Do not open e-mail attachments if you do not recognize the sender (though you may also
receive viruses from people you know). Scan the attachments with anti-virus software
before opening them.
Download files only from reputable Internet sites, and be wary when exchanging diskettes or
other media with friends.
Scan your hard drive for viruses monthly.
Note : Even with these precautions, new viruses may find ways to enter your computer system.
Worm
Like a virus, a worm is also a self-replicating program. A worm differs from a virus in that it
propagates through computer networks without user intervention. Unlike a virus, it does not need to
attach itself to an existing program. Many people conflate the terms "virus" and "worm", using themboth to describe any self-propagating program.
_____________________________
CHAPTER 9
Password cracking and
How to hack an Email password?
_____________________________
Password cracking
Password cracking is the process of recovering passwords from data that has been stored in or
transmitted by a computer system. A common approach is to repeatedly try guesses for the password.
Passwords are the most widely used form of authentication throughout the world. A username and
password are used on computer systems, bank accounts, ATMs, and more. The ability to crack
passwords is an essential skill to both the hacker and the forensic investigator, the latter needing to
hack passwords for accessing the suspect's system, hard drive, email account, etc.
Although some passwords are very easy to crack, some are very difficult. In those cases, the hacker
or forensic investigator can either employ greater computing resources (a botnet, supercomputer,
GPU, ASIC, etc.), or they can look to obtain the password in other ways.
These ways might include insecure storage. In addition, sometimes you don't need a password to
access password-protected resources. For instance, if you can replay a cookie, session ID, a
Kerberos ticket, an authenticated session, or other resource that authenticates the user after the
password authentication process, you can access the password protected resource without ever
knowing the password.
Sometimes these attacks can be much easier than cracking a complex and long password. I will do a
tutorial on various replay attacks in the near future (look out specifically for my upcoming article on
stealing the Facebook cookie to access someone's Facebook account).
Password Storage
In general, passwords are not stored in clear text. As a rule, passwords are stored as hashes. Hashes
are one-way encryption that are unique for a given input. These systems very often use MD5 or SHA1to hash the passwords.
In the Windows operating system, passwords on the local system are stored in the SAM file, whileLinux stores them in the /etc/shadow file. These files are accessible only by someone withroot/sysadmin privileges. In both cases, you can use a service or file that has root/sysadmin
privileges to grab the password file (e.g. DLL injection with samdump.dll in Windows).
Types of Attacks
Dictionary
A dictionary attack is the simplest and fastest password cracking attack. To put it simply, it just runs
through a dictionary of words trying each one of them to see if they work. Although such an approach
would seem impractical to do manually, computers can do this very fast and run through millions of
words in a few hours. This should usually be your first approach to attacking any password, and in
some cases, it can prove successful in mere minutes.
Rainbow Table
Most modern systems now store passwords in a hash. This means that even if you can get to the area
or file that stores the password, what you get is an encrypted password. One approach to cracking
this encryption is to take dictionary file and hash each word and compare it to the hashed password.
This is very time- and CPU-intensive. A faster approach is to take a table with all the words in the
dictionary already hashed and compare the hash from the password file to your list of hashes. If there
is a match, you now know the password.
Brute Force
Brute force is the most time consuming approach to password cracking. It should always be your last
resort. Brute force password cracking attempts all possibilities of all the letters, number, special
characters that might be combined for a password and attempts them. As you might expect, the more
computing horsepower you have, the more successful you will be with this approach.
Hybrid
A hybrid password attack is one that uses a combination of dictionary words with special characters,
numbers, etc. Often these hybrid attacks use a combination of dictionary words with numbers
appending and prepending them, and replacing letters with numbers and special characters. For
instance, a dictionary attack would look for the word "password", but a hybrid attack might look for
"p@$$w0rd123".
Commonly Used Passwords
As much as we think each of us is unique, we do show some common patterns of behavior within our
species. One of those patterns is the words we choose for passwords. There are number of wordlists
that have been compiled of common passwords. In recent years, many systems have been cracked and
passwords captured from millions of users. By using these already captured passwords, you are
likely to find at least a few on the network you are trying to hack.
Password Cracking Strategy
Many newbies, when they start cracking passwords, simply choose a tool and word list and then turn
them loose. They are often disappointed with the results. Expert password crackers have a strategy.
They don't expect to be able to crack every password, but with a well-developed strategy, they can
crack most passwords in a very short amount of time.
The key to develop a successful strategy of password cracking is to use multiple iterations, going
after the easiest passwords with the first iteration to the most difficult passwords using different
techniques for each iteration.
___________________
CHAPTER 10
Penetration Testing
___________________
Penetration Testing
Penetration testing is the process of attempting to gain access to resources without knowledge of
usernames, passwords and other normal means of access. If the focus is on computer resources, then
examples of a successful penetration would be obtaining or subverting confidential documents,
pricelists, databases and other protected information.
The main thing that separates a penetration tester from an attacker is permission. The penetrationtester will have permission from the owner of the computing resources that are being tested and will
be responsible to provide a report. The goal of a penetration test is to increase the security of the
computing resources being tested.
In many cases, a penetration tester will be given user-level access and in those cases, the goal would
be to elevate the status of the account or user other means to gain access to additional information that
a user of that level should not have access to.
Some penetration testers are contracted to find one hole, but in many cases, they are expected to keep
looking past the first hole so that additional vulnerabilities can be identified and fixed. It is important
for the pen-tester to keep detailed notes about how the tests were done so that the results can be
verified and so that any issues that were uncovered can be resolved.
It’s important to understand that it is very unlikely that a pen-tester will find all the security issues. As
an example, if a penetration test was done yesterday, the organization may pass the test. However,
today is Microsoft’s “patch Tuesday” and now there’s a brand new vulnerability in some Exchange
mail servers that were previously considered secure, and next month it will be something else.
Maintaining a secure network requires constant vigilance.
Pen-Testing vs. Vulnerability Assessment
The main focus of this paper is penetration testing but there is often some confusion between
penetration testing and vulnerability assessment. The two terms are related but penetration testing has
more of an emphasis on gaining as much access as possible while vulnerability testing places the
emphasis on identifying areas that are vulnerable to a computer attack. An automated vulnerability
scanner will often identify possible vulnerabilities based on service banners or other network
responses that are not in fact what they seem. A vulnerability assessor will stop just before
compromising a system, whereas a penetration tester will go as far as they can within the scope of the
contract.
It is important to keep in mind that you are dealing with a ‘Test.’ A penetration test is like any other
test in the sense that it is a sampling of all possible systems and configurations. Unless the contractor
is hired to test only a single system, they will be unable to identify and penetrate all possible systems
using all possible vulnerabilities. As such, any Penetration Test is a sampling of the environment.
Furthermore, most testers will go after the easiest targets first.
How Vulnerabilities Are Identified
Vulnerabilities need to be identified by both the penetration tester and the vulnerability scanner. The
steps are similar for the security tester and an unauthorized attacker. The attacker may choose to
proceed more slowly to avoid detection, but some penetration testers will also start slowly so that the
target company can learn where their detection threshold is and make improvements.
The first step in either a penetration test or a vulnerability scan is reconnaissance. This is where the
tester attempts to learn as much as possible about the target network as possible. This normally starts
with identifying publicly accessible services such as mail and web servers from their service
banners. Many servers will report the Operating System they are running on, the version of software
they are running, patches and modules that have been enabled, the current time, and perhaps even
some internal information like an internal server name or IP address.
Once the tester has an idea what software might be running on the target computers, that information
needs to be verified. The tester really doesn’t KNOW what is running but he may have a pretty goodidea.
The information that the tester has can be combined and then compared with known vulnerabilities,
and then those vulnerabilities can be tested to see if the results support or contradict the prior
information.
In a stealthy penetration test, these first steps may be repeated for some time before the tester decides
to launch a specific attack. In the case of a strict vulnerability assessment, the attack may never be
launched so the owners of the target computer would never really know if this was an exploitable
vulnerability or not.
Why Perform Penetration Testing?
Security breaches and service interruptions are costly
Security breaches and any related interruptions in the performance of services or applications, can
result in direct financial losses, threaten organizations’ reputations, erode customer loyalties, attract
negative press, and trigger significant fines and penalties. A recent study conducted by the Ponemon
Institute (2014 Cost of Data Breach Study: Global Analysis) reported the average cost of a databreach for the affected company is now $3.5 million. Costs associated with the Target data breach
that occurred in 2013 reached $148 million by the second quarter of 2014.
It is impossible to safeguard all information, all the time
Organizations have traditionally sought to prevent breaches by installing and maintaining layers of
defensive security mechanisms, including user access controls, cryptography, IPS, IDS and firewalls.
However, the continued adoption of new technologies, including some of these security systems, and
the resulting complexity introduced, has made it even harder to find and eliminate all of an
organizations’ vulnerabilities and protect against many types of potential security incidents. New
vulnerabilities are discovered each day, and attacks constantly evolve in terms of their technical and
social sophistication, as well as in their overall automation.
Penetration testing identifies and prioritizes security risks
Penetration testing evaluates an organization’s ability to protect its networks, applications, endpoints
and users from external or internal attempts to circumvent its security controls to gain unauthorized or
privileged access to protected assets. Test results validate the risk posed by specific security
vulnerabilities or flawed processes, enabling IT management and security professionals to prioritize
remediation efforts. By embracing more frequent and comprehensive penetration testing,
organizations can more effectively anticipate emerging security risks and prevent unauthorized access
to critical systems and valuable information.
Pen test strategies
Targeted testing
Targeted testing is performed by the organization's IT team and the penetration testing team working
together. It's sometimes referred to as a "lights-turned-on" approach because everyone can see the test
being carried out.
External testing
This type of pen test targets a company's externally visible servers or devices including domain name
servers (DNS), e-mail servers, Web servers or firewalls. The objective is to find out if an outside
attacker can get in and how far they can get in once they've gained access.
Internal testing
This test mimics an inside attack behind the firewall by an authorized user with standard access
privileges. This kind of test is useful for estimating how much damage a disgruntled employee could
cause.
Blind testing
A blind test strategy simulates the actions and procedures of a real attacker by severely limiting the
information given to the person or team that's performing the test beforehand. Typically, they may only
be given the name of the company. Because this type of test can require a considerable amount of time
for reconnaissance, it can be expensive.
Double blind testing
Double blind testing takes the blind test and carries it a step further. In this type of pen test, only one
or two people within the organization might be aware a test is being conducted. Double-blind tests
can be useful for testing an organization's security monitoring and incident identification as well as its
response procedures.
Four distinct pen testing service offerings you can provide customers to ensure they have full
coverage.
Vulnerability scanning
This is a straightforward opportunity and a mature offering. The biggest question you'll face is
whether to resell a service offering (like that from Qualys) or to buy a tool and use it internally to
scan your customer's networks and systems. Scanning is one of the requirements for nearly every
regulation, so this is an easy step along the path to security assurance, since all of your regulated
customers need to scan.
Infrastructure pen testing
This offering involves a tool that uses live exploits, like Metasploit or Core Impact. You'll use live
ammunition, so orchestrate these tests with the client to ensure the minimum amount of disruption.
You should test all externally visible IP addresses -- that's what the bad guys out there can see and
are likely trying to penetrate. You may also want to see what you can find if you attach to a
conference room network, one of the softest parts of a customer's defenses.
Application pen testing
Trying to break into applications is probably the most important step nowadays, given that so many
attacks directly target applications. You can use a Web application scanner (HP's WebInspect, IBM's
AppScan), but you should also invest in some people that know how to exploit application logic
errors. There's no substitute for a skilled application tester to determine what's broken in an
application. Once the initial application is compromised, go directly after the database, where the
valuable stuff is. If you can get into the database, the customer is owned. It's much better for you to
figure this out than a malicious hacker.
User testing
This is actually the most fun task for penetration testers. You get to see how gullible most users are.
This type of testing can involve emailing fake messages to customer service reps, trying to talk your
way into the facility (past security or the receptionist) or even dropping thumb drives in the parking
lot to see who will plug them into their machines. Many folks are against social-engineering end
users, but not me. Remember, malicious hackers don't have a set of rules. They use social engineering
because it works. Don't let social engineering surprise your customer and catch them off-guard.
PENETRATION TESTING TOOL
Reconnaissance Tools
Reconnaissance often begins with searches of internet databases including DNS registries, WHOISdatabases, Google, on-line news sources, business postings, and many other on-line resources. The
reconnaissance phase often includes print media as well, specifically electronically searchable
archives that would be found at a college library or large public library.
Nmap
Nmap is a popular port scanning tool. Port scanning is typically a part of the reconnaissance phase of
a penetration test or an attack. Sometimes attackers will limit their testing to a few ports while other
times they will scan all available ports. To do a thorough job, a vulnerability scanner should scan all
port and, in most cases, a penetration tester will scan all ports. An actual attacker may choose to not
scan all ports if he finds a vulnerability that can be exploited because of the “noise” (excess traffic) a
port scanner creates.
Another capability of nmap is its ability to determine the operating system of the target computer.
Different networking implementations will respond differently to different network packets. Nmap
maintains a type of database and will match the responses to make a guess at what type of operating
system the target computer is running. This OS detection isn’t perfectly accurate but it can help the
attacker tailor his attack strategy, especially when coupled with other pieces of information.
Nessus
Nessus is a popular vulnerability scanner that many security professionals use regularly. Nessus has a
huge library of vulnerabilities and tests to identify them. In many cases, Nessus relies on the
responses from the target computer without actually trying to exploit the system. Depending on the
scope of a vulnerability assessment, the security tester may choose an exploitation tool to verify that
reported vulnerabilities are exploitable.
Nessus includes port scanning and OS detection, so sometimes a vulnerability assessment will just
use Nessus and let Nessus call nmap or other scanners for these components of the test. For a stealthyscan, a security professional or an attacker may choose to run these tools separately to avoid
detection.
Packet Manipulation and Password Cracking Tools
There are many other reconnaissance tools within the penetration tester arsenal, but two categories
bear special mention here: packet manipulation tools and password cracking tools. The former
category includes tools like hping that allows a penetration tester or attacker to create and send all
types of specially crafted TCP/IP packets in order to test and exploit network-based securityprotections, such as firewalls and IDS/IPS. The password cracking category includes tools like Johnthe Ripper or Cain and Able, which is used to detect and obtain weak password for multiple
authentication mechanisms, such as the ones supported by most Unix and Windows operating systems.
Exploitation Tools
Exploitation tools are used to verify that an actual vulnerability exists by exploiting it. It’s one thing
to have vulnerability testing software or banners indicate the possibility of an exploitable service, but
quite another to exploit that vulnerability. Some of the tools in this category are used by both attackers
and penetration testers. There are many more exploitation tools than the ones listed here. Many tools
in this category are single-purpose tools that are designed to exploit one vulnerability on a particular
hardware platform running a particular version of an exploitable system. The tools that we’ve
highlighted here are unique in the fact that they have the ability to exploit multiple vulnerabilities on a
variety of hardware and software platforms.
Metasploit Version 2.5
Metasploit is a relatively new addition to the penetration tester’s tool belt. It provides attack libraries
attack payloads that can be put together in a modular manner. The main purpose of Metasploit is to get
to a command prompt on the target computer. Once a security tester has gotten to a command-line, it is
quite possible that the target computer will be under his total control in a short time. The currently
released version of Metasploit Framework as of June, 2006 is version 2.5. Version 3.0 is expected
out shortly.
This is a tool that attackers would use to take over, or own, a computer. Once an attacker can gain this
level of access to a computer, they would often install code that would allow them to get back onto
the computer more easily in the future. In some cases, a penetration tester would also install tools on
the computer, but often they would simply document the access and what data was available and
move on to other testing.
This would depend on the defined scope of the testing. The security professional also would want to
be careful about causing data loss or server instability that may result in lost productivity. A
malicious attacker may be more cavalier about using the computer without regard to lost productivity,
though a highly skilled attacker targeting a specific company may be very careful not to damage the
system so that they can avoid detection.
SecurityForest Exploitation Framework
Although still technically in Beta version, the SecurityForest Exploitation Framework is anotheropen-source tool that can be leveraged by penetration testers. This framework leverages a collection
of exploit code known as the ExploitTree, and the Exploitation Framework is a front-end GUI thatallows testers to launch exploit code through a Web browser (similar to Metasploit’s Web interface).
The Framework is very similar to Metasploit, in fact, with a few key differences. ExploitTree has aremarkable number of exploits included, but the vast majority of these are in pre-compiled format
(most likely in a C file) or exist as Perl executables.
They are also not natively integrated into the Framework. This framework is not nearly as extensible
as some other tools; it primarily functions as a GUI to launch attacks from.
CORE IMPACT (version 5.1)
CORE IMPACT is a commercial penetration testing tool that combines a healthy dose ofreconnaissance with exploitation and reporting into one point and click penetration testing tool. The
main purpose of CORE
IMPACT is to identify possible vulnerabilities in a program, exploit those vulnerabilities without
causing system outages, and clearly document every step along the way so that the entire procedure
can be verified by another party.
The CORE IMPACT penetration testing tool makes is easy for a network administrator or penetrationtester to run tests against a network or host without having a whole suite of security testing utilities.
Overall, we found the program to do a good job of scanning the network for vulnerabilities,
successfully exploiting them, and reporting on the results.
One really slick feature of CORE IMPACT is the ability to install an agent on a compromisedcomputer and then launch additional attacks from that computer. This proved useful in an actual
penetration testing assignment by allowing the tester to compromise one machine and from there run
automated scans inside the network looking for additional machines. Those scans weren’t quite as
good as actually being on-site, but it did allow us to discover internal hosts from outside the network.
For most systems, CORE IMPACT will work well, but as Core Security Technologies states in theirdocumentation, it isn’t meant to be a replacement for an experienced penetration tester. One of the
areas we ran into some trouble on was when a single IP address had different ports mapped to
different servers with different operating systems. Sometimes CORE IMPACT would identify a hostas having a given operating system and then refuse to launch a vulnerability against a service that did
not match that operating system. In one tested network, a single public IP address was in use by three
different computers: an Exchange server, an IIS web server, and a Linux computer running SSH. TheOS had been identified as being in the Linux family so an attack against IIS vulnerability wasn’t anoption. We were able to work around this by re-scanning the machine using only the ports that
mapped to the Windows system.
As a commercial vendor, Core Security Technologies does a lot of testing of their exploit code to
ensure that it will not adversely affect the target hosts. In testing CORE IMPACT, we found that itwas rare for it to crash systems. There was one case where an unpatched Windows 2003 server
rebooted a few times in different testing scenarios. Later, the same test was used to exploit the systemand gain access to a command prompt. Other than this one test against an unpatched Windows 2003
server, we did not crash any systems.
The reporting feature of CORE IMPACT is quite good. It includes an executive report, a report thatlists vulnerabilities and all the machines affected by those vulnerabilities, a detailed report of all
hosts and an exhaustive report of every test that was run, when it ran, how long it ran and detailed
results of the running.
This last report is one that you don’t need very often but if you do need it, it has all the details do
duplicate a test. Keeping accurate notes is one of the most difficult and time consuming tasks for a
pen-tester because often many tests are attempted with small variations to the test. CORE IMPACTmakes it easy to go back and find any steps that weren’t properly recorded.
Manual Penetration Test
Manual penetration testing layers human expertise on top of professional penetration testing software
and tools, such as automated binary static and automated dynamic analysis, when assessing high
assurance applications. A manual penetration test provides complete coverage for standard
vulnerability classes, as well as other design, business logic and compound flaw risks that can only
be detected through manual testing.
Penetration Testing Methodology
Once the threats and vulnerabilities have been evaluated, the penetration testing should address the
risks identified throughout the environment. The penetration testing should be appropriate for the
complexity and size of an organisation. All locations of sensitive data; all key applications that store,
process or transmit such data; all key network connections; and all key access points should be
included. The penetration testing should attempt to exploit security vulnerabilities and weaknesses
throughout the environment, attempting to penetrate both at the network level and key applications.
The goal of penetration testing is to determine if unauthorised access to key systems and files can be
achieved. If access is achieved, the vulnerability should be corrected and the penetration testing reperformed until the test is clean and no longer allows unauthorised access or other malicious activity.
_____________________________
CHAPTER 11
WINDOWS HACKING TRICKS
_____________________________
Windows Hacking
Windows hacking is the practice of modifying Windows Operating System to accomplish a goal
outside of the creator’s original purpose. People who engage in hacking activities are often called
hackers. Since the word “hack” has long been used to describe someone who is incompetent at
his/her profession, some hackers claim this term is offensive and fails to give appropriate recognition
to their skills. Windows hacking is most common among teenagers and young adults, although there
are many older hackers as well.
REGISTRY EDITOR RELATED HACKING
What is Windows Registry? (Registry Editor)
Windows Registry is a database used to store information that is necessary to configure the system for
one or more users, applications and hardware devices and it keeps record of the settings of all the
Software installed in Computer including Operating System.
To open Registry Editor: Start > All Programs > Accessories > Run > regedit
Registry Editor Window
Windows Registry contains Five Hives and hives contain Keys and Sub keys and their respective
Values.
HKEY_CLASSES_ROOT: The information that is stored here makes sure that the correct programopens when you open a file by using Windows Explorer.
HKEY_CURRENT_USER: Contains the configuration information for the user who is currently
logged on. The user’s folders, screen colors, and Control Panel settings are stored here.
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE: Contains configuration information particular to the computer (for any
user).
HKEY_USERS: Contains all the actively loaded user profiles on the computer.
HKEY_CURRENT_USER is a subkey of HKEY_USERS.
HKEY_CURRENT_CONFIG: Contains information about the hardware profile that is used by the
local computer at system startup.
Types of Keys
Binary Value (REG_BINARY):Raw binary data. Most hardware component information is stored
as binary data and is displayed in Registry Editor in hexadecimal format
DWORD Value (REG_DWORD):Data represented by a number that is 4 bytes long (a 32-bit
integer). Can also contain binary, hexadecimal, or decimal format
Expandable String Value (REG_EXPAND_SZ):A variable-length data string. This data type
includes variables that are resolved when a program or service uses the data
String Value (REG_SZ): A fixed-length text string
Multi-String Value (REG_MULTI_SZ):Values that contain lists or multiple values in a form that
people can read are generally this type.
Disclaimer: Modifying the registry can cause serious problems that may require you to reinstall your
operating system. We cannot guarantee that problems resulting from modifications to the registry can
be solved. Use the information provided at your own risk.
Back up the registry
Before you make changes to a registry key or subkey, we recommend that you export, or make a
backup copy, of the key or sub key. You can save the backup copy to a location you specify, such as a
folder on your hard disk or a removable storage device. If you make changes that you want to undo,
you can import the backupcopy.
1. Open the Registry Editor by clicking the Start button, typing regedit into the search box,
and then pressing Enter.
2. Locate and click the key or subkey that you want to back up.
3. Click the File menu, and then click Export.
4. In the Save in box, select the location where you want to save the backup copy to, and then
type a name for the backup file in the Filenamebox.
5. Click Save.
Tips:
You must be logged on as an administrator to perform these steps. If you aren't logged in as
an administrator, you can only change settings that apply to your user account.
Although you can back up more than just the registry key or subkey that you are modifying,
doing so adds to the size of the backup file.
Ultra-speed Shutdown of Windows 7
Follow the following steps to shutdown your Computer with ultra-speed
1. Open the Registry Editor by clicking the Start button, typing regedit into the search box,
and then pressing Enter.
2. In left pane of Registry Editor, go to
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SYSTEM\CurrentControlSet\Control
3. In the right pane, right click on WaitToKillServiceTimeout and click on Modify.
4. Type in a number between 2000-20000 (2-20 seconds) and click on OK.
NOTE: The default time is 12000 (12 seconds).
5. Close regedit.
6. After rebooting (restart) Windows the new settings will take effect. The time to wait for
terminating services will be faster and shutdown won’t drag on forever.
NOTE: If you have problems with programs from your computer shutting down too quickly, thenrepeat the above steps and increase the time (Step 5) a bit.
Change the log-on screen of Windows 7
1. Press Windows Logo key + R to open Run, type regedit and press Enter.
2. Go to:
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\Software\Microsoft\Windows\CurrentVersion\AuthenticatLogonUI\Background
3. Double-click the OEMBackground DWORD key and Set value of the key to 1.
4. Select a background image for logon screen with size less than 256 KB andRename that
image as BackgroundDefault.
5. Copy that image, Open My Computer and go to
C:\Windows\system32\oobe\info\backgrounds folder
6. Paste it and select Copy and Replace.
Tips: Cut and paste the original log-on Screen image in a folder for further use.
7. Reboot, and now your logon image would have changed.
Disable or Enable USB Ports/USB drive/Pen-Drive in Windows 7
It’s really very easy to enable and disable a USB port of your Laptop and desktop computer. Manycompanies disabled their employee’s laptop to prevent data threat. Also many schools, colleges and
universities block the USB ports of their computer. So, here is the easy way to enable USB ports,access it and disable it back.
1. Open the Registry Editor by clicking theStart button, typing regedit into the search box,
and then pressing Enter.
2. In left pane of Registry Editor, go to
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SYSTEM\CurrentControlSet\Services\USBSTOR
3. Right Click Start and Click Modify on right pane of Registry Editor.
4. Do one of the following:
To enable USB ports: change the value from 4 to 3
To disable USB ports: change the Value from 3 to 4
5. After rebooting (restart) Windows the new settings will take effect. The time to wait for
terminating services will be faster and shutdown won’t drag on forever.
How to Display Legal Notice on Start up of your Windows
If your PC has multiple users then you can display legal notice to every user before they login to your
PC. This legal notice will be displayed at every startup just before the Desktop is loaded. Using thisyou can tell your friends about the do’s and don’ts in your computer when they login in your absence.
To do this:
1. Click on Start button and type regedit and press Enter
2. Navigate to the following key in the registry
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SOFTWARE\Microsoft\Windows\CurrentVersion\policies\syst3. On the right side pane look for legalnoticecaption, double click on it and enter the desired
Legal Notice Caption.
4. Next below this look for legalnoticetext and enter the desired Legal Notice Text. The legal
notice text can be up to a page in its size so that it can include a set of do’s and don’ts for
your computer.
5. After you does this just restart your computer and upon the next startup you can see the legal
notice information for your computer.
Faster Thumbnail Previews
The taskbar shows thumbnail previews of opened windows when you hover the mouse over the
program icon. By default, it takes a little time for the preview to appear. Make the previews appear
faster with this registry tweak:
1. Open the Registry Editor by clicking the Start button, typing regedit into the search box,
and then pressing Enter.
2. Navigate to HKEY_CURRENT_USER\Control Panel\Mouse.
3. On the right, open the MouseHoverTime key and reduce its value from the default 400 to
around 150. (Be careful, as decreasing the key further may cause problems.)
4. After rebooting (restart) Windows the new settings will take effect.
Disable Right-Click
This trick removes the context menu that would normally appear when the user right clicks on the
desktop or in the Explorer right results pane.
1. Open the Registry Editor by clicking the Start button, typing regedit into the search box,
and then pressing Enter.
2. Browse to this key in the registry:
HKEY_Current_User\Software\Microsoft\Windows\CurrentVersion\Policies\Explorer
3. Change the value of NoViewContextMenu to 1.
4. Now close the registry editor and restart your computer after any changes to go into effect.
Tips: If NoViewContextMenudoesn't exist then you can create it. Right click in the right-hand pane;
select New, then DWORD (32-bit) Value for 32 bit on Windows 7.
How to Disable or Enable Folder Options in Windows 7
Disable Folder Options in Windows 7
1. Click the Start button, and type regedit in the search box.
2. Browse the list as
HKEY_CURRENT_USER\Software\Microsoft\Windows\Current Version\Policies\Explorer
3. Create a new 32-bit DWORD value.
4. Name it NoFolderOptions.
5. Double click on it to set its value data to 1.
Enable Folder Options in Windows 7
Double click on the value named NoFolderOptions to set its value data to 0.
Clean up the “Open With” Menu in Explorer
Have you ever accidently opened an mp3 with Notepad, or a zip file with Word? If so, you’re also
likely irritated that these programs now show up in the Open with menu in Windows Explorer everytime you select one of those files. Whenever you open a file type with a particular program,
Windows will add an entry for it to the Open with menu. Usually this is helpful, but it can also clutter
up the menu with wrong entries. On our computer, we have tried to open a PDF file with Word and
Notepad, neither which can actually view the PDF itself. Let’s remove these entries. To do this, we
need to remove the registry entries for these programs.
1. Enter regedit in your Start menu search or in the Run command to open the Registry
editor.
Tips: Backup your registry first just in case, so you can roll-back any changes you make if you
accidently delete the wrong value.
2. Now, browse to the following key:
HKEY_CURRENT_USER \Software \Microsoft \Windows \CurrentVersion \ Explore\FileExts\
3. Now, you will see a list of all the file extensions that are registered on your computer.
4. Browse to the file extension you wish to edit, click the white triangle beside it to see the
subfolders, and select OpenWithList. In our test, we want to change the programs
associated with PDF files, so we select the OpenWithList folder under .pdf.
5. Notice the names of the programs under the Data column on the right. Right-click the value
for the program you don’t want to see in the Open With menu and select Delete.
6. Click Yes at the prompt to confirm that you want to delete this value.
7. Repeat these steps with all the programs you want to remove from this file type’s Open with
menu. You can go ahead and remove entries from other file types as well if you wish.
8. Restart the computer and check out the Open withmenu in Explorer again. Now it will be
much more streamlined and will only show the programs you want to see.
Add Recycle Bin to My Computer in Windows 7
To add the Recycle Bin on My Computer, follow the steps:
1. Open up regedit.exe through the start menu search or run box
2. Go to:
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SOFTWARE\Microsoft\Windows\CurrentVersion\Explore3. Now right-click and create a New Key
4. Name the key with the following text as shown in the below figure:
{645FF040-5081-101B-9F08-00AA002F954E}
5. Close the Registry Editor and Open My Computer.
Add Control Panel to My Computer in Windows 7
To add the Control Panel on My Computer, follow the steps:
1. Open up regedit.exe through the start menu search or run box
2. Go to:
HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SOFTWARE\Microsoft\Windows\CurrentVersion\Explore3. Now right-click and create a New Key
4. Name the key with the following text as shown in the below figure
{26EE0668-A00A-44D7-9371-BEB064C98683}
Or
{21EC2020-3AEA-1069-A2DD-08002B30309D}
Tips:
Category View
{26EE0668-A00A-44D7-9371-BEB064C98683}
Icon View
{21EC2020-3AEA-1069-A2DD-08002B30309D}
5. Close the Registry Editor and Open My Computer.
LOCAL GROUP POLICIES RELATED HACKING
Want to know: What happened in your absences on your PC?
1. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
2. Type eventvwr.msc and press Enter. Then Event Viewer window will open. (Events are
stored in three log files: Application, Security, and System. These logs can be reviewed
and archived. For our purposes we want the System log. )
3. Click on Windows Log and then double-click on System in the left-hand column for a list
of events.
4. Look for a date and time when you weren’t home and your computer should have been off.
Double click on the eg: Information and it will show u the detail.
Tips: You can also use this log to see how long someone was on the computer. Just look at the time
the computer was turned on and off for that day.
How to Disable Shutdown, Restart, Sleep and Hibernate
Someday, you might want to make a computer could not be turned off easily. For example because
you are running a program that needs a long time to wait (download a big file, rendering a video, etc.)
and you have to leave the room. To prevent anyone else to turn off the computer, then one way is to
disable the function of Shutdown, Restart, Sleep or Hibernate menu.
Follow these easy steps to disable Shutdown, Restart, Sleep and Hibernate:
1. Click Start button, type gpedit.msc in the Start menu’s search box and then press Enter.
Local Group Policy editor window will open.
2. Go to User Configuration > Administrative Templates > Start Menu And Taskbar
3. In the right pane, find the Remove and Prevent Access to the shutdown, Restart, Sleep,
and Hibernate. Then double click on it.
4. Select Enable, and then click OK.
Tips:
To make it back in to the normal function, just follow all the steps above, except for the last
one; you need to change back the option from Enable to Disable.
When being in a state of disable, in fact we can still shutdown the computer. The way is by
typing the below instructions in the search (Windows 7) and press Enter.
shutdown /s (for shutdown)
shutdown /r (to restart)
How to Disable Access to the Registry in Windows 7
If you don’t know what you’re doing in the Registry, you can mess up your computer pretty good. This
trick helps you to prevent users from accessing the Registry and making any changes to it.
To do this using Local Group Policy Editor:
Tips: This method uses Group Policy Editor which is not available in Home versions of Windows.
1. Type gpedit.msc into the Search box in the Start menu
2. When Group Policy Editor opens, navigate toUser Configuration \ Administrative
Templates then select System. Under Setting in the right panel double-click on Prevent
access to registry editing tools.
3. Select the radio button next to Enabled, click OK, then close out of Group Policy Editor.
4. Now if a user tries to access the Registry, Then he will get the following message advisingthey cannot access it.
Prevent access to the command prompt
This trick helps you to prevent users from accessing the Command prompt.
1. Type gpedit.msc into the Search box in the Start menu
2. When Group Policy Editor opens, navigate to User Configuration \ Administrative
Templates then select System. Under Setting in the right panel double-click on Prevent
access to the command prompt.
3. Select the radio button next to Enabled, click OK, and then close out of Group Policy
Editor.
How to show or hide Control Panel items in Windows 7
One of the common lock down’s that administrator apply to Remote Desktop Services Servers is toremove all but the essential control panel items. The .cpl (e.g. timedate.cpl) file name of the control
panel item you wanted to show or hide however this has changed in Windows 7 and you now need to
use the Canonical Name when hiding or showing specific items. Below I will explain the new way ofconfiguring control panel items for Windows 7 and show you the affect that this has on the control
panel.
Before you begin I recommend that you take a look at the below table which lists all the Canonical
names for the control panel items for Windows 7. You will need to know what Canonical names of
the item you want to restrict or allow.
Windows 7 Control Panel Canonical Names
The following canonical names are defined for Control Panel items in Windows 7. Not all ControlPanel items are available on all varieties of Windows and some Control Panel items might appear
only when appropriate hardware is detected.
Control Panel
Item
Canonical name
Action Center Microsoft.ActionCenter
Administrative
Tools
Microsoft.AdministrativeTools
AutoPlay Microsoft.AutoPlay
Backup and
Restore
Microsoft.BackupAndRestore
Biometric
Devices
Microsoft.BiometricDevices
BitLocker
Drive
Encryption
Microsoft.BitLockerDriveEncryption
Color
Management
Microsoft.ColorManagement
Credential
Manager
Microsoft.CredentialManager
Date and Time Microsoft.DateAndTime
Default
Location
Microsoft.DefaultLocation
Default
Programs
Microsoft.DefaultPrograms
Desktop
Gadgets
Microsoft.DesktopGadgets
Device
Manager
Microsoft.DeviceManager
Devices and
Printers
Microsoft.DevicesAndPrinters
Display Microsoft.Display
Ease of Access
Center
Microsoft.EaseOfAccessCenter
Folder Options Microsoft.FolderOptions
Fonts Microsoft.Fonts
Game
Controllers
Microsoft.GameControllers
Get Programs Microsoft.GetPrograms
Getting Started Microsoft.GettingStarted
HomeGroup Microsoft.HomeGroup
Indexing
Options
Microsoft.IndexingOptions
Infrared Microsoft.Infrared
Internet
Options
Microsoft.InternetOptions
iSCSI Initiator Microsoft.iSCSIInitiator
Keyboard Microsoft.Keyboard
Location and
Other Sensors
Microsoft.LocationAndOtherSensors
Mouse Microsoft.Mouse
Network and
Sharing Center
Microsoft.NetworkAndSharingCenter
Notification
Area Icons
Microsoft.NotificationAreaIcons
Offline Files Microsoft.OfflineFiles
Parental
Controls
Microsoft.ParentalControls
Pen and Touch Microsoft.PenAndTouch
People Near
Me
Microsoft.PeopleNearMe
Performance
Information and
Tools
Microsoft.PerformanceInformationAndTools
Personalization Microsoft.Personalization
Phone and
Modem
Microsoft.PhoneAndModem
Power Options Microsoft.PowerOptions
Programs and
Features
Microsoft.ProgramsAndFeatures
Recovery Microsoft.Recovery
Region and
Language
Microsoft.RegionAndLanguage
RemoteApp Microsoft.RemoteAppAndDesktopConnections
and Desktop
Connections
Scanners and
Cameras
Microsoft.ScannersAndCameras
Sound Microsoft.Sound
Speech
Recognition
Microsoft.SpeechRecognition
Sync Center Microsoft.SyncCenter
System Microsoft.System
Tablet PC
Settings
Microsoft.TabletPCSettings
Taskbar and
Start Menu
Microsoft.TaskbarAndStartMenu
Text to Speech Microsoft.TextToSpeech
Troubleshooting Microsoft.Troubleshooting
User Accounts Microsoft.UserAccounts
Windows
Anytime
Upgrade
Microsoft.WindowsAnytimeUpgrade
Windows
CardSpace
Microsoft.CardSpace
Windows
Defender
Microsoft.WindowsDefender
Windows
Firewall
Microsoft.WindowsFirewall
Windows
Mobility Center
Microsoft.MobilityCenter
Windows
SideShow
Microsoft.WindowsSideShow
Windows
Update
Microsoft.WindowsUpdate
To hide Control Panel items in Windows 7, do the followings:
1. Type gpedit.msc into the Search box in the Start menu
2. W h e n Group Policy Editor opens, navigate to User
Configuration\Policies\Administrative Templates\Control Panel. Under Setting in the
right panel double-click on Hide specified Control Panel items.
3. Select the radio button next to Enabled, Click Show button.
4. Then Show Content dialog-box will appear. Type the required Canonical names and click
OK.
For example: If i want to hide Action Center, then I will typeMicrosoft.ActionCenter in the Value
field.
5. Click OK, and then close out of Group Policy Editor.
Note: In this example we are only going to hide the control panel items we want to see (white list)
however if you use the Show specified Control Panel items policy setting you can black list only the
items you don’t want listed.
How to Disable Control Panel in Windows 7
If you have a shared computer that your family and friends can access, you might not want them to
mess around in the Control Panel, and fortunately with a simple tweak you can disable it.
1. Type gpedit.msc into the Search box in the Start menu
2. When Group Policy Editor opens, navigate to User Configuration \ Administrative
Templates then select Control Panelin the left Column. In the right column doubleclick on Prohibit access to the Control Panel.
3. Select the radio button next to Enabled, click OK, and then close out of Group Policy
Editor.
4. After the Control Panel is disabled, you’ll notice it’s no longer listed in the Start Menu.
5. If the user tries to type Control Panel into the Search box in the Start menu, they will get thefollowing message indicating it’s restricted.
Disable Windows Hotkeys
1. Click Start button, type gpedit.msc in the Start menu’s search box and then press Enter.
Local Group Policy editor window will open.
2. Navigate to User Configuration > Administrative Templates > Windows Components
and then select Windows Explorer in the left column of the LocalGroup Policy editor.
3. Double-click Turn off Windows+X Hotkeys in the Settings section of the Group Policyeditor.
4. Select Enable and then click OK to save the changes.
SHORTCUTS RELATED HACKING
One Click Shutdown / Restart / LogOff / Sleep / Hibernate – (Creating a Shortcut)
Windows operating System has come with a remote shutdown tool to shut down and restart Windows.
You can control this tool through the command line, but a much faster alternative is to create a
shortcut.
1. Right-click your Windows 7 desktop and select New>Shortcut
2. Type shutdown.exe -s -t 00 in the location field
3. Click Next, give a name to the shortcut, e.g. Shut Down Computer, and click Finish.
4. Double-click the shortcut to instantly shut down the system. (For Single Click Follow thebelow tips)
Tips:
To Customize the Shortcut icon – Right-click on the shortcut > ClickProperties > Click
Change Icon> Choose an icon > Click OK> Click OK
You can pin this shortcut from the desktop to the taskbar by right-click on the shortcut and
click Pin to Taskbar.
To Type the Following code in the location field of
Create Shortcut dialog-box
Shutdown shutdown.exe -s -t 00
Restart shutdown.exe -r -t 00
Logoff shutdown.exe -l
Hibernate rundll32.exe PowrProf.dll,SetSuspendState
Sleep rundll32.exe powrprof.dll,SetSuspendState 0,1,0
How to pin My Computer to Windows 7 taskbar directly
Windows 7 has come out with lots of new and exciting features. You may have noticed that, we can’t
open My Computer directly from Windows 7 Taskbar. If we drag & drop My computer to taskbar, it
gets pinned to windows explorer rather than creating a new place for itself. Windows explorer opens
libraries which irritates me and quite a lot of users. So, let’s pin My Computer to Windows 7 taskbar.
1. Right click on Desktop, and select New>Shortcut
2. In location of the item enter the following string exactly as given below:
%SystemRoot%\explorer.exe /E,::{20D04FE0-3AEA-1069-A2D8-08002B30309D}
3. Click Next and give a name to shortcut. For example, My Computer. Click Finish.
4. A new shortcut of My Computer placed on desktop. It has the same icon like that of
Windows explorer. You can change its icon if you wish.
After change the icon My Computer
5. To pin the shortcut to Windows 7 Taskbar, just right click on it and select Pin to Taskbar.
6. Your direct shortcut to My Computer is pinned on taskbar now.
Lock your computer in single click
You can lock your computer using the Windows logo key + L keyboard shortcut. Here’s another way
to do it with a single mouse click.
1. Right-click on your desktop and select New>Shortcut.
2. In Type the location of the item field, type rundll32.exe user32.dll,LockWorkStation.
3. Click Next, name the shortcut Quick Lock, and Finish.
4. If you wish, you can make it look pretty by giving it a lock or keys icon: Right-click,
selectProperties, click ChangeIcon, enter shell32.dll, and select any icon you wish. Click
OK.
5. Drag this shortcut and pin it to the taskbar, after which you can delete the desktop shortcut.
Safety Remove Hardware from desktop
1. Right Click on your desktop and Click on New and Click on Shortcut from the list.
2. Type the below code in the location field as shown in below figure
rundll32.exe shell32.dll,Control_RunDLL hotplug.dll
3. Now click on Next
4. Now give a desired Name for your Shortcut and Click on Finish.
5. Now you have created a shortcut for Safety Remove Hardware on your desktop!!! Nowwhenever you want to eject your hardware device like pen drive, and then just double click
on it and you can remove your Hardware device safely.
NOTEPAD RELATED HACKING
Dancing Keyboard Led Light Trick
1. Open Notepad and type below codes into it.
Set wshShell =wscript.CreateObject("WScript.Shell")
do
wscript.sleep 100
wshshell.sendkeys "{CAPSLOCK}"
wshshell.sendkeys "{NUMLOCK}"
wshshell.sendkeys "{SCROLLLOCK}"
loop
2. Click File (from the Menu bar)and Save as the notepad file as anything.vbs (.vbs is must)
3. Open your save file and see your keyboard led blinking like disco lights.
Tips: How to stop this?
1. First open Task Manager by pressing Ctrl +Alt +Delete
2. Then go to Processes tab.
3. Select wscript.exe
4. Click on End Process.
Make your computer talk what you type!
This is very good and interesting javascript trick which let your computer speaks whatever you type.
There is no requirement of any software. Just follow below simple steps.
1. Open Notepad and type below codes into it.
Dim message, sapi
message=InputBox("What do you want me to say?"
,
"TALKING COMPUTER")
Set sapi=CreateObject("sapi.spvoice")
sapi.Speak message
2. Click File (from the Menu bar)and Save as the notepad file as anything.vbs
3. Open that save file.
4. Type anything and click ok to make your computer talk whatever you typed.
Pin a drive to the taskbar
1. Open Notepad, and click on File (Menu bar) and Saveas.
Tips: You will need to leave notepad blank.
2. Navigate to your desktop. Under Save as type, change it to All Files (*.*), type in a name
you want for this (ex: Drive C.exe) with the .exe file extension at the end, and click on the
Save button.
3. Close Notepad.
4. Right click on the saved .exe file on your desktop (ex: Drive C.exe), and click on Pin to
Taskbar.
5. Right click on the pinned .exe icon on the taskbar, right click on the .exe file (ex: Drive
C.exe) in the jump list, and click on Properties.
6. In the Start in field, make sure it's blank. In the Target field, change it to be the drive letter
path (ex: C:\ ) that you want the pinned icon on the taskbar to open. Click onOK. (Just
Looks Like the below image)
7. Log off and log on, or restart the computer to have the icon on the taskbar to change to the
correct drive icon afterwards.
8. You can now drag the drive icon anywhere you like within the other pinned icons on the
taskbar if you like.
9. You can now delete the .exe file on your desktop (ex: Drive C.exe) if you like.
Tips: To Unpin Drive from Taskbar: Right click on the pinned drive icon on the taskbar, and click on
Unpin this program from taskbar.
Shut-down the computer after conveying a message
What this trick does is, after conveying a (any) message it shuts down the computer without any
confirmation. In order to create the Shutdown file, follow the below mentioned steps:
1. Open Notepad.
2. Type the following code in it:
@echo off
msg * Shutting Down.
shutdown -c “Hello the computer is shutting down! Bye” -s
3. Click File (from Menu bar) and Select Save as.
4. Choose Desktop to save the file on desktop.
5. In the File name field type shutdownmsg.bat and click Save.
6. Double Click the batch file on desktop to execute the batch file.
Tips:
Make sure the file name has .bat extension.
Use this carefully. The Computer shuts down the computer forcefully.
Matrix Falling Code Effect
Inspired by the movie Matrix, this falling code trick is extremely popular on social networkingwebsites. Type the code given below in Notepad and save the file as "Matrix.bat" or anything.bat
(File Extension must be .bat). Upon running the bat file, you will see the "Matrix falling code" effect.
@echo off
color 02
:matrix tricks
echo
%random%%random%%random%%random%%random%%random%%random%%random%
goto matrix tricks
Make Your Keyboard Type (Any) Message Continuously
This VBS trick can make keyboard type any message continuously. OpenNotepad, type the code
given below and save the file as keyboard.vbs or anything.vbs (File Extension must be .vbs).
Set wshShell = wscript.CreateObject("WScript.Shell")
do
wscript.sleep 100
wshshell.sendkeys "This is a Virus. You have been infected."
loop
Tips: If you will open the VBS file then you might need to restart your computer to stop this.
Continuously eject CD/DVD drives
This VBS trick will create a code which will continuously eject all your connected Optical drives. If
you put them back in, it will pop them out again. Type the code given below in Notepad as eject.vbs
or anything.vbs (File Extension must be .vbs)
Set oWMP = CreateObject("WMPlayer.OCX.7")
Set colCDROMs = oWMP.cdromCollection
do
ifcolCDROMs.Count>= 1 then
For i = 0 to colCDROMs.Count - 1
colCDROMs.Item(i).Eject
Next
For i = 0 to colCDROMs.Count - 1
colCDROMs.Item(i).Eject
Next
End If
wscript.sleep 5000
loop
Double click to open this file and you will be impressed by this awesome trick.
Notepad trick to use it as a Diary
1. Open Notepad.
2. Type .LOG
3. Save the file as LOG.txt
4. Write anything in it and it will be saved with the time when you edit it.
World Trade Center Notepad Trick
1. Open Notepad.
2. Type the flight number Q33N
3. Go to Format > Font and then Change the Font to Wingdings
4. Increase the Font Size to 72, Click OK.
MISCELLANEOUS RELATED HACKING
Increase Windows Boot Up Speed
Increase the speed of Startup
1. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
2. Type msconfig and press Enter. The System Configuration window appears.
3. Go to Boot tab and change Timeout to 5 sec from 30. Then click OK.
Remove Unwanted Startup Programs
1. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
2. Type msconfig and press Enter. The System Configuration window appears.
3. Go to Services or Startup tab.
4. Uncheck the programs that you are no longer want to run in the background. Then click OK.
Defragmentation of Hard Drive
1. Go to Start > All Programs > Accessories > System Tools > Disk Defragment
2. Select the Disk(s). If you want to select all disks, then hold Ctrl key and click the disks.
3. Click Analyze disks and after analyzing is over click on Defragment disks.
Delete Temporary & Recent files from your PC regularly
Delete Temporary files
1. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
2. Type %temp%and press Enter. Now the folder of temporary files will be open.
3. Select all files by pressing Ctrl + A, press Delete and then Enter (You may press Shift +
Delete to delete those files permanently)
Tips: If a popup window (File In Use windows) opens, then Skip those items.
Delete Recent files
1. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
2. Type recent and press Enter. Now the folder of recent files will be open.
3. Select all files by pressing Ctrl + A, press Delete and then Enter (You may press Shift +
Delete to delete those files permanently)
Scan disk regularly for fix issues
1. Open My Computer and right click on C: drive.
2. Select Properties. A popup menu will be open. Then click on Tools tab.
3. Under Error-Checking Option click on Check Now and fix issues. Then click Start.
Tips: If you have any other drives like D:, E: etc., then scan those disks also.
Speed up the Windows 7
Windows 7 is starved for resources. It features many visual effects that draw heavy on your graphics
card and system memory. If your system was slow out of the box, chances are you can easily fix that
by turning off excessive effects.
1. Click on the Start button and then click Control Panel.
2. Click on System and Security
3. Click on System and then click on Advanced system settings from the left hand pane.
4. On Advance tab, under Performance Click Settings
5. The Performance Options window will open.
6. Under Visual Effects select Adjust for best performance.
Tips: If you would like to retain a nice interface, select Custom and check Use visual styles on
windows and buttons.
God Mode of Windows 7
Windows 7 has changed Control Panel a little, but it's still too difficult to locate all the applets and
options that you might need. God Mode, however, while not being particularly godlike, does offer an
easier way to access everything you could want from a single folder.
To create God Mode,
1. Create a New folder and rename it to GodMode.{ED7BA470-8E54-465E-825C99712043E01C}
2. The extension, {ED7BA470-8E54-465E-825C-99712043E01C}, must be entered exactly
as it is here, though, including the curly brackets. When you press Enter the extension of the
name will disappear
3. Double-clicking the GodMode will display shortcuts to functions in the Action Centre, the
Network and Sharing Centre, Power options, troubleshooting tools, user accounts and others- more than 260 options in total. You can rename the folder as you wish.
Tips:
To create Create a New Folder and
Rename the folder as the
below codes
GodMode GodMode.{ED7BA470-
8E54-465E-825C99712043E01C}
Recycle Bin Recycle Bin.{645FF040-
5081-101B-9F08-
00AA002F954E}
My
Computer
My Computer.{20D04FE0-
3AEA-1069-A2D8-
08002B30309D}
Network
Connections
Network Connections.
{7007ACC7-3202-11D1-
AAD2-00805FC1270E}
User
Accounts
User Accounts.{60632754-
c523-4b62-b45c4172da012619}
Libraries Libraries.{031E4825-
7B94-4dc3-B131-
E946B44C8DD5}
Unlock Hidden Themes in Windows 7
1. Go to Control Panel.
2. If you are in Category view: Click on Appearance and Personalization> Folder Option
3. If you are in Large icon/Small icon view: Click on Folder Options
4. Click on View tab
5. Click on Show hidden files, folders and drives
6. Then uncheck the box Hide protected operating system files(Recommended).
7. It will show you a warning, Click Yes.
8. Click OK.
9. Go to C:\Windows\Globalization\MCT
This is the inside of MCT folder in My Computer.
10. Inside MCT folder you will see folders with name MCT-AU/CA etc. These are the
country codes in which these themes are automatically available.
11. Inside eachMCT-XX (where XX will be AU, CA etc.) you will see a Theme
folder. Open it and Double-click on the theme file to unlock it.
12. Once you unlocked the theme will be available to you in personalization option.
Create Keyboard Shortcuts for Programs
You can create keyboard shortcuts for any program in Windows 7.
1. Right-click on the program icon and then click Properties
2. Select the Shortcut tab, click in Shortcut key and enter a key to set the keyboard shortcut
for that program.
3. Click OK.
Invisible a folder
1. Create a New folder on the desktop.
2. Select to rename it, delete the default New folder title. (do not Press Enter)
3. Press and hold Alt then 0160 (press the numbers from Number padwhich is locatedon the
right hand side of the keyboard), release the Alt key and then press Enter. This names the
folder as a Space. (Make sure Num Lock is ON)
Tips: Desktops must use the number keys on the right of the keyboard and not above the letters.
For it to work on your laptop you need to keep Holding down the Alt key you will also need to
hold the Fn key and type the numbers "0160." These are over the letters m, j, o, m. Let go of all
of the keys and hit enter. Holding the Alt and typing those numbers will name the folder as a
space, pretty much giving it no name. Make sure the Num Lock on the laptop is selected from on
screen keyboard.
4. Select and right click on the folder. Select Properties, then Customize tab, and then
Change icon.
5. If you scroll through the provided icons, you will see a certain area that seems a few icons
are simply missing. Select one of those empty spaces, or in other words, invisible folders.
6. Click OK, then Apply, then OK.
7. You now have an invisible folder on your desktop to place any files you want to make
transparent. Please remember that this is not a secured file, just invisible to the eyes.
Tips: Alternate code is Alt + 225
Open any folder in Command Prompt instantly
Press Shift when right-clicking on a folder to get that option in the context menu. This also works on
the desktop.
View Expanded ‘Send To’ Menu
Press Shift when right-clicking on a folder to get an expanded Send To menu.
Open Command Prompt with right click
If you don’t already have a quick launch icon or a hotkey set to open a command prompt, there’s
really quick trick that you can do on any Windows 7 computer to open up a command prompt without
having to navigate the menu.
Open Command prompt from Desktop
1. Hold down the Shift key and right-click on the desktop.
2. Choose Open Command Window Here from the menu.
Open a folder with Command prompt
1. Hold down the Shift key and right-click on any folder.
2. Choose Open Command Window Here form the menu.
OR inside any folder
1. Open the folder that you want to open with Command Prompt.
2. Right-click on inside the folder and choose Open Command Window Here form the
menu.
Reset Windows 7 password with Simple Command
If you forget your password in windows 7, then don't be panic. By this simple process you can easilychange your Windows 7 password without knowing current password.
1. Click on Start>All Programs>Accessories
2. Right click on Command Prompt and click on Run as administrator.
3. In the Command Prompt window type the below command and Press Enter
4. net user Account Name Your New Password
Example of Reset password on Command Prompt : In the above picture SRB is the Account Name
and 123456 is the new password
5. At last a message will show "The command completed successfully".
6. Lock your computer and type the new password to unlock it.
Tips: Remember the new password, don’t forget it.
Watch Star War Episode IV in Command Prompt
You can watch an ASCII version of the full Star Wars Episode IV movie right in the CommandPrompt window. Just follow the steps –
1. Open Control Panel.
2. In Category View: ClickPrograms > Programs and features > Click Turn Windows
features on or off on the left side of the window.
OR In Large/Small icons View: Click Programs and features > Click Turn Windows features
on or off on the left side of the window.
3. Then Windows Features window will open.
4. Put tick mark in Telnet Client and Telnet Server like the above image. Then click OK.
5. Open Command Prompt. Type telnet towel.blinkenlights.nl and press Enter. The Star
Wars movie will start immediately.
Set your Shutdown Button / Power button
If you restart your computer more often than you shut it down, change the default Shutdown power
button to Restart. Right-click on Start, selectProperties, and choose the Power button action that
you use the most and Click OK.
Shutdown button changes to Restart button
Use Check Boxes in Windows Explorer
You can select non-adjacent files in Explorer using Ctrl-click, but there is an easier way using check
boxes.
Selecting multiple items using check box
1. Open MyComputer, click Tool, then select Folder options from the File menu.
2. Click on the View tab, under Advanced Settings, scroll down to select Use check boxes
to select items.
3. Click OK.
Now you can easily select multiple items using only the mouse.
Use Pen drive to fast your computer (Boost performance with ReadyBoost)
Windows 7 has a feature called ReadyBoost which enables its users to use their pen drives as
temporary RAM for their systems. This feature is helpful when because of any reason you need tospeed up your system for short time. Instructions to do this are given below:
1. Insert a Pen Drive/USB drive in the USB port.
2. Open My Computer.
3. Right-click on the icon of the newly inserted USB drive and select Properties.
4. In the Removable Disk Properties dialog-box go to ReadyBoost tab.
5. If you want to dedicate the entire space of your pen drive for ReadyBoost you can select the
radio button that says Dedicate this device to ReadyBoost. Alternatively you can dedicate
any specified amount of space from the pen drive for ReadyBoost. To do this you can select
Use this device radio button and in the text box you can specify the amount of space fromthe pen drive that you want Windows 7 to use as RAM.
6. Click OK buttons on all Windows to accept and confirm your selections and configurations.
More Info: When ReadyBoost is enabled a file namedReadyBoost.sfcache is created. This file is
compressed and encrypted so that even if anyone steals the pen drive, the thief cannot read data the
pen drive contains.
Recommendations: Don’t pull flash drive out of USB Port while it is being used as a ReadyBoostdevice. Don’t save any data files on the flash drive when it is being used as ReadyBoost device.
Secure USB Drives with BitLocker
Secure your USB flash drives using BitLocker encryption.Right-click on your USB drive in My
Computer, select Turn on BitLocker and follow the instructions to protect sensitive data on your
thumb drives.
The next time you use your USB drive on another computer, it will prompt you for thepassword
before allowing you read-only access to your flash drive. You can even use the drive on older
computers running Windows XP/Vista.
Create a System Recovery Disc
A system recovery disc helps you in situations where Windows cannot start successfully. Your
Windows 7 installation disc also serves as a recovery disc. When Windows 7 comes pre-installed on
computers, you will need to create a system recovery disc.
Click Start, type recdisc.exe in the search boxand press Enter. Insert a blank CD/DVD in yourCD/DVD drive, and click Create Disc.
Rotate Upside-Down Desktop Screen
You can rotate Desktop Screen by 90 or 180 or 360 angles. You can invert your window screen and
can impress your friends; this is one of the scariest tricks which turn Windows upside down. Here are
steps:
Press To
Ctrl + Alt + Down
arrow key
Rotate by 180 degree,
invert screen.
Ctrl + Alt + Left
arrow key
Rotate by 90 degree.
Ctrl + Alt + Right
arrow key
Rotate by 270 degree
Ctrl + Alt + Up Make it normal again.
arrow key
Tips: If the keyboard shortcut doesn’t work, then follow the below steps
1. Go to Control Panel\Appearance and Personalization\Display\Screen ResolutionORRight-click on the Desktop and click Screen Resolution.
2. Click on the drop-down menu labeled Orientation and choose your desired screen rotation.
3. Click Apply to preview the changes. If the changes are acceptable, click Keep changes
from the confirmation pop-up window.
4. Click OK to close the Display Settings window.
Disable Error Reporting in Windows 7
Error reporting is enabled by default in Windows 7. You might want to disable error reporting for
privacy concerns, if you're not connected to the Internet all the time, or maybe just to stop being
annoyed by the alerts. Error reporting works by prompting you after a critical error in the Windows 7
operating system or in other programs and then notifying Microsoft about it.
To disable error reporting in Windows 7:
1. Click on the Start button and then Control Panel.
2. Click on the System and Security
Tips: If you're viewing the Large icons or Small icons view of Control Panel, click on Action
Center and skip to Step 4.
3. Click on the Action Center.
4. In the Action Center window, click the Change Action Center settings on the left.
5. In the Related settings section at the bottom of the Change Action Center settings
window, click on the Problem reporting settings.
6. Choosing Never check for solutions will fully disable error reporting in Windows 7.
7. Click the OK.
8. Click the OK button of the Change Action Center settings window
9. Close the Action Center window and it’s done.
Know the Exact time of Last Turn on the Computer
Do you remember the exact date or time when you last turn on the computer? If you don’t know, then
the following two processes will help you out.
Process - 1
1. Open Command Prompt.
2. Type systeminfo | find /I “boot time”
3. Press Enter.
4. This will show the time when you last rebooted the computer. Subtract that from the current
date-time to know for how long you have been running the computer.
Tips: To know the date of installation of Windows on your PC –Type systeminfo | find /I “install
date”
Process – 2
1. OpenTask Manager by pressing Alt + Ctrl + Delete orright click on the taskbar and
click Start Task Manager.
2. Switch to the Performance tab and you should see a field that says Up Time as shown in
the below figure.
Make a Private Folder – no-one can enter, copy, cut, delete Private Folder
To make Private folder which nobody can open, delete, see properties, rename. To make such a
folder you need to make a folder with any name.
Follow the steps to make a Private Folder:
1. Create a New Folder and rename as you wish. In this example I rename the folder to Secret.
2. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
3. Type cmd and Press Enter to open cmd.exe
4. Type cd desktop and press Enter
5. Then type cacls secret /E /P everyone:n and Press Enter to Lock the Secret folder.
6. To unlock the Secret folder type cacls secret /E /P everyone:f and Press Enter.
How to Make Your PDF Files Speak To You
Would you like to know if someone reads it for you & that too free of cost. I know you guys are eager
to know that, so here it is.
1. First of all install Adobe Reader, if you haven’t already.
2. Go to View > Read out Loud > Activate Read Out Loud.
3. After you have done, the go to View > Read out Loud > Read To End of Document
4. Now it will read it to you out loud in the Default Microsoft Sam voice.
Swap Mouse Right & Left Click
1. Open Control Panel.
2. Do one of the following:
For Category View: Click Hardware and Sound and then click on Mouse
For Large/Small View: Click on Mouse.
3. Mouse Properties Dialog-box will appear.
4. Check the Switch primary and secondary buttons option as shown in the above image.
5. Left click on Apply and OK.
Enable / Disable Automatic Updates in Windows 7
1. Open Control Panel.
2. Do one of the following:
For Category View: Click System and Security and then click on Windows Update
For Large/Small View: Click on Windows Update.
3. On the Left side, click Change Setting.
4. Choose one of the following:
Install updates automatically (recommended)
Download updates but let me choose whether to install them
Check for updates but let me choose whether to download and install them
Never check for updates (not recommended)
5. In order to have the same behavior for Recommended updates also tick the Give me
recommended updates the same way I receive important updates check box.
6. You can also choose if you want to allow anyone to install updates by selecting the Allow
all users to install updates on this computer check box.
7. ClickOK to save the settings. If you are prompted for an administrator password or
confirmation, type the password or provide confirmation.
Note: Microsoft recommends that you must keep your windows up-to-date in order to remain secure.
And I recommend the same, my computer is always up-to-date, this is one reason I never get attackedby any kind of virus.
Change Your Computer Name in Windows 7
If you’ve ever bought a new computer with the operating system already installed, you might be
annoyed by the default name of the computer when you start trying to connect different computers
together. I like to use more descriptive names than SR782711OI… for example; I called my newdesktop ULTRACOMPUTER.
1. Right-click on MY Computer and click on Properties. Then a window opens as shown in
the below image.
2. Click on Advanced System Settings on the left menu.
3. Now System Properties dialog-box opens as shown in the below image.
4. Click on Computer Name tab and click on Change button on the right-low side.
5. Enter a name in Computer name field. You could also change the name of the workgroup to
something more descriptive as well. ClickOK. You’ll have to reboot after you make this
change.
Steganography – Hide a text behind an image
Steganography is the art and science of hiding messages. Steganography is often combined withcryptography so that even if the message is discovered it cannot be read. The word steganography is
derived from the Greek words "steganos" and "graphein", which mean "covered" and "writing."
Steganography, therefore, is covered writing. Historical steganography involved techniques such as
disappearing ink or microdots. Modern steganography involves hiding data in computer files. It is
fairly easy to hide a secret message in a graphic file without obviously altering the visible
appearance of that file.
To hide a text behind an image:
To hide a file behind a image file which means that if any one opens that image he will see the image
only but if you open in a special way then you can open the hidden file behind the image.
1. Open Command Prompt, by going to Start > All Programs > Accessories > CommandPrompt
2. Select an image to be used for hiding file behind the image.
3. Now select a file to hide behind the image and make it in .RAR format with the help of the
WinRAR.
4. And most important is that paste both the files on desktop and run the following command on
the command prompt.
5. And then type the following command.
cd desktop <press Enter>
Copy /b imagename.jpg + filename.rar finalnameofimage.jpg
6. Then press Enter the file will be created with the file final file name of the image.
Warning: Using this method for the illegal Activities is against the Laws this tutorial is for
educational Purpose only.
Disable delete confirmation dialog box
The delete confirmation dialog box appears every time you give the command of deleting a file.
However, there are times you are deleting many unnecessary files in order to clean up your hard
drive. This delete confirmation dialog box will really bother you at such times and you would want to
get rid of it as it takes up a lot of your time while you are deleting numerous files.
There is an easy way to disable delete confirmation dialog box in Windows 7. As you disable delete
confirmation dialog box in Windows 7, you will be able to save a lot of your time. However, it is
recommended that you do not disable delete confirmation dialog box in Windows 7 unless really
necessary. You should turn it back on after you are done with your cleaning up of the computer.
Follow these easy steps to disable delete confirmation dialog box in Windows 7:
1. Right-click on the Recycle Bin icon on the desktop
2. Select Properties. The Recycle Bin Properties dialog box will appear.
3. Uncheck the Display delete confirmation dialog box at the bottom.
4. Click on the Apply and then the OK button.
You have been successful to disable delete confirmation dialog box in Windows 7. The method to
turn it on again is very simple too. Just follow the above steps and check the Display delete
confirmation dialog box.
Minimize quickly with shake
Using Shake, you can quickly minimize all open windows on the desktop except the one you want to
focus on. Just click the title bar of the window you want to keep open and drag (or shake) the window
back and forth quickly, and the other open windows are minimized.
To restore the minimized windows, shake the open window again.
Shake a window to minimize all other windows
Snap
You can use Snap to arrange and resize windows on the desktop with a simple mouse
movement.
Using Snap, you can quickly align windows at the side of the desktop, expand themvertically to the entire height of the screen, or maximize them to completely fill the desktop.
Snap to sides of the desktop
Drag a window to the side of the desktop to expand it to half of the screen
Note: By snapping the other side, the window maximizing in that manner.
Snap to top of the desktop
To use Snap, drag the title bar of an open window to either side of the desktop to align it there, or
drag it to the top of the desktop to maximize the window. To expand a window vertically using Snap,
drag the top edge of the window to the top of the desktop.
Drag a window to the top of the desktop to expand it to full of the screen
Aero Peek
You can use Aero Peek features to quickly preview the desktop without minimizing all your
windows, or preview an open window by pointing at its icon on the taskbar.
Peek at the desktop
The Show desktop button has been moved the opposite end of the taskbar from the Start button,
making it easier to click or point at the button without accidentally opening the Start menu.
In addition to clicking the Show desktop button to get to the desktop, you can temporarily view or
peek at the desktop by just pointing your mouse at the Show desktop button. When you point at the
Show desktop button at the end of the taskbar, any open windows fade from view, revealing the
desktop. To make the windows reappear, move the mouse away from the Show desktop button.
Quickly view your desktop using Peek
This can be useful for quickly viewing desktop gadgets, or when you don’t want to minimize all open
windows and then have to restore them.
Peek at an open file on the desktop
You can also use Aero Peek to take a quick look at other open windows without clicking away fromthe window you are currently working on.
Peek at open window using thumbnails on the taskbar
Point your mouse at a program icon on the taskbar that has open files. Thumbnail previews of anyopen files associated with that program appear above the taskbar. You can point at a thumbnail to
preview that window’s contents, and all the other open windows on the desktop fade away to reveal
just the window you’re previewing. To open the window you're previewing, click the thumbnail.
Change how icons appear on the taskbar
You can customize the taskbar, including the appearance of icons and how they group together when
you have multiple items open. Here are your choices:
Always combine, hide labels
This is the default setting. Each program appears as a single, unlabeled icon, even when
multiple items for a program are open.
A single icon represents both a program and open items
Combine when taskbar is full
This setting shows each item as an individual, labeled icon. When the taskbar becomes
crowded, programs with multiple open items collapse into a single program icon. Clicking
the icon displays a list of the items that are open. Both this setting and Never combine
resemble the look and behavior of earlier versions of Windows.
Individually labeled icons combine when the taskbar is full
Never combine
This setting is similar to Combine when taskbar is full, except icons never collapse into a
single icon, regardless of how many windows are open. As more programs and windows
open, icons decrease in size and eventually scroll within the taskbar.
Individually labeled icons always appear
To change how programs and icons appear on the taskbar
1. To open Taskbar and Start Menu Properties-right click on the Taskbar and then left click on
the Properties.
2. Under Taskbar appearance, select one of the options from the Taskbar buttons list:
 Always combine, hide labels
 Combine when taskbar is full
 Never combine
3. To use small icons, select the Use small icons check box. To use large icons, clear the
check box.
4. Click OK.
Pin any item to the Windows 7 taskbar
You can pin your favorite applications or files so that you could open them quickly from any window
at any time. In Windows 7, you can pin shortcuts for favorite or frequently used files, folders, and
websites to the Jump Lists for each of those programs to the taskbar.
To pin a program shortcut to the taskbar, do one of the following:
If the program is already running, right-click the program’s button on the taskbar (or drag the
button toward the desktop) to open the program’s Jump List, and then click Pin this programto taskb
If the program isn’t running, click Start, find the program’s icon, right-click the icon, and
then click Pin to Taskbar.
You can also pin a program by dragging the program’s shortcut from the Desktop or Start
menu to the taskbar.
Example of dragging and pin: Pin a program from desktop (Left) : Pin a program from Start menu(Right)
Pin Control Panel to the Taskbar
You cannot pin the Control Panel to the taskbar via the Start Menu or by drag and drop. Open theControl Panel and right-click its taskbar icon to pin it to the taskbar. An advantage of this is that
Control Panel’s Jump List allows quick access to recently used functions.
Windows 7 Taskbar icons appears in the center of the taskbar
Everything that comes out of the box by default lacks the ability to re-adjust. Windows 7 Taskbar is
the single biggest feature of Windows 7 and yet, you can’t do much about it other than re-arrange the
icon in order. Also, by default the icons will always be aligned to the left, what if you want to make
them align to the center or even right?
Center align icons on taskbar
1. You need to create a New folder (that should be an empty folder), Name it as you wish.
2. Right click on the taskbar, Uncheck Lock the taskbar to unlock the taskbar
3. Go to Toolbars>Newtoolbar (by using right-click on taskbar)
4. Select the folder that you’ve just created. (Hint: New empty folder)
5. Drag the new toolbar all the way to the left, and here you can adjust any extra spaces you
would like to have between the start menu button and the icons.
6. Right-click on the new toolbar and Uncheck Showtitle, and ShowText.
7. Adjust the taskbar icons to center of the taskbar.
8. Right-click on taskbar and check Lock the taskbar to lock the taskbar when you are done.
Access Jump Lists with the Left Mouse Button
Jump Lists usually show up when you right-click on a taskbar icon. However, they can also be
accessed by holding the left mouse button and dragging upwards. If you’re using a laptop touchpad or
a touch screen, this is convenient because you do not have to click any button to access a context
menu.
Customize Number of Items in Jump Lists & Start Menu
Right-click Start, select Properties, click Customize and choose the Number of recent programs
to be display and the Number of items display in Jump Listsfrom the Start Menu Size section
below. Click OK.
Add Any Folder to Favorites
Before adding the folder to favourite list (Left) : After adding the folder to favourite list (Right)
You can add any library or folder to the Favorites section in Windows Explorer. To add a folder,
navigate to it in Explorer, right-click Favorites in the left navigation pane, and select Add current
location to Favorites. You can remove the folder form the Favorites list by right-click the folder
from the Favorite list and click Remove.
Get Exact Colors on Your Screen
If you are an artist or you work with colors, use the Calibrate Color option in the Control Panel
Display applet or run dccw.exe from the Start Menu search box. Then Display Color Calibrationwindow appears. Follow the Steps and Choose right options as you wish and click Finish.
Tips: You can adjust gamma, brightness, contrast, and color balance, ensuring that colors are
displayed correctly on your screen.
Adjust Screen Text with Clear Type
Use Clear Type Tuner for the best look on your LCD monitor or laptop screen. Runcttune.exe from
the Start Menu search box. Choose your options and Finish.
Shortcut to Run Program as Administrator
You can Ctrl + Shift + Click on a taskbar icon to run the application as an Administrator with full
rights (provided your account has permissions). Simply Shift + Right-click on any program shortcut
to run it as a different user, if for example you need higher privileges when logged in with your
child’s account.
Run commands List
To open Run – Press Windows logo key + R or, Go to (Click) Start > All Programs > Accessories
> Run
To open Type & press Enter
Accessibility Options access.cpl
Add Hardware (Device
manager)
hdwwiz.cpl
Add / Remove Programs appwiz.cpl
Administrative Tools control admintools
Automatic Updates wuaucpl.cpl
Calculator calc
Character Charmap
Checking disk chkdsk
Manager of the album
(clipboard)
clipbrd
Command Prompt cmd
Service components (DCOM) dcomcnfg
Computer Management compmgmt.msc
Date and Time Properties timedate.cpl
Device Manager devmgmt.msc
Disk Cleanup cleanmgr
Disk Defragmenter dfrg.msc
Disk Management diskmgmt.msc
Partition manager diskpart
Display Properties control desktop
Event Viewer Eventvwr.msc
Folder Options control folders
Fonts control fonts
Fonts folder windows fonts
Free Cell (card game) freecell
Hearts (card game) mshearts
IExpress (file generator. Cab) IExpress
Internet Properties inetcpl.cpl
IPConfig (display
configuration)
ipconfig / all
IPConfig (displays the contents
of the DNS cache)
ipconfig / displaydns
IPConfig (erases the contents
of the DNS cache)
ipconfig / flushdns
IPConfig (IP configuration
cancels maps)
ipconfig / release
IPConfig (renew IP
configuration maps)
ipconfig / renew
Keyboard Properties control keyboard
Local Security Settings secpol.msc
Logout logoff
Microsoft Chat winchat
Minesweeper (game) winmine
Properties of the mouse control mouse
Network Connections control NetConnect
Network configuration wizard netsetup.cpl
Notepad notepad
Screen Keyboard OSK
Monitor performance perfmon.msc
Monitor performance (2) Perfmon
Power Options powercfg.cpl
Printers and Faxes control printers
Regional and Language
Options
intl.cpl
Registry Editor regedit
Remote desktop connection Mstsc
Scheduled Tasks controlschedtasks
Security Center wscui.cpl
Console management services services.msc
Turn off windows shutdown
Sounds and Audio Devices mmsys.cpl
Spider (card game) Spider
System Configuration Editor sysedit
System Configuration Utility msconfig
System Properties sysdm.cpl
System Information Dxdiag
Task Manager taskmgr
Telnet client telnet
User Accounts nusrmgr.cpl
Utility Manager (Magnifier,
etc)
Utilman
Microsoft Magnifier magnify
Protection of the accounts
database
syskey
Windows update wupdmgr
Wordpad write
Simple Steps to Protecting Your Computer
Hackers have thousands of tools at their disposal to take advantage of you including tools such as
keystroke loggers. Keystroke loggers record every single keystroke you type on your computer; this
includes your private email messages, your bank account password, and your credit card number.
This article focuses on Microsoft Windows users since the majority of computer users today use a
version of this operating system on their home and/or office computers.
1. Use Strong passwords.
2. Update your computer to latest Operating System (e.g. Windows 7 or 8)
3. Update Microsoft Windows regularly.
4. Turn on Windows firewall.
5. Use antivirus software or internet security to protect your computer from virus. (e.g. AVG
anti-virus/internet security, Norton Antivirus, McAfee VirusScan, Kaspersky, etc.)
6. Block Spyware - Spyware and viruses often go hand-in-hand but can take many forms. Some
'hijack' your web browser and redirects you to their website. Others quietly download and
install Trojans, key logger programs, etc. to your computer so hackers can take control of
your computer later. Install and run an anti-spyware program such as: Spy Sweeper, Adaware SE Personal
7. Keep your software up-to-date. (e.g. Microsoft Office, Adobe Rader, Adobe Flash Player,
Mozilla Firefox, Anti-virus, etc.,)
8. Backup your important data often.
_________________________
CHAPTER 12
INTERNET HACKING TRICKS
_________________________
Internet Hacking
Internet hacking means accessing a secure computer system by disabling or bypassing the
security. Some hackers will steal data or destroy data, or use the system to hide their tracks as
they hack into a dif erent system and some just do it for fun. Like most cases of extortion, the
criminal's identity is especially dif icult to trace and is magnified because of the nature of the
internet. When the Internet was gaining immense popularity, businesses were scrambling to secure
domain names and using the technology to expand their market. Seeing e-commerce as an
untapped goldmine, many were eagerly diving headfirst into a slew of problems, including security
breaches. Viruses, shutdowns, crashes and email hacking will be the burden of the user, a
company's money lost to theft will be the burden of its customers and a government's money spent
on security will be the burden of its citizens.
Block and unblock any website
First you have to show all hidden files, folders, and drives on your computer.
Go to My Computer > Tools > View
Click on the Show hidden files, folders, and drives button.
Then Click OK.
Then do the followings:
1. Click Start > All Programs > Accessories > Right Click on Notepad and click on Run as
administrator
2. Then in Untitled - Notepad window click File > Open (in Menu bar). Open dialog-box
will appear.
3. Navigate to - C:\Windows\System32\drivers\etc
4. Then select All Files next to the File name field. (By selecting All Files option all files are
shown as shown in the below figure.)
5. Click host and click Open. Then the notepad is seems to be like in below picture.
6. Now add a new entry in the bottom, let you want to block www.facebook.com.then add the
line 127.0.0.1 www.facebook.com
7. This line means that when you try to open the www.facebook.com,then it is redirected to IP
Address 127.0.0.1, which is a back IP of the windows.
8. Save the file (by pressing Ctrl + S) and restart the computer. Then www.facebook.com is
block for all browsers.
9. To unblock it, remove the entry, which you have made and Save the file. Then restart the
computer.
Tips: This method works for all browsers.
Note: You can bypass registration of software by blocking their website and update requests using
this trick.
How to Increase Internet Speed
Many of internet users are not happy with their slow internet connections speed. So this is the trick to
increase your internet speed by yourself easily. To do this,
1. Click on the Start button, type gpedit.msc on the search bar and then press Enter button.
Then a Local Group Policy Editor window will appear.
2. I n Group Policy window click on Computer configuration menu. Then click on
Administrative Templates.
3. Click on Network. Under the Network menu click on QoS Packet Scheduler.
4. Under the QoS Packet Scheduler menu double click on Limit reservable Bandwidthoption.
5. Then in Limit reservable Bandwidth window you will find that the settings and are
disabled. But by default Limit reservable Bandwidth is eating your internet speed by 20%.
In this you have to do a simple thing. Click onEnabled button in Limit reservable
Bandwidth menu; reduce the Bandwidth by 0%.
6. Click on Apply button and then OK.
7. Restart your computer. Congratulation you are done now.
Now connect the internet & see the difference in internet connection or your browsing speed.
Search Internet from the Start Menu
Enable Internet search from the Start Menu using your default browser. Rungpedit.msc from the Start
Menu search box to start the Local Group Policy Editor. In the left pane, go to User Configuration >
Administrative Templates > Start Menu and Taskbar. Then SelectAdd Search Internet link toStart Menu from the right pane, right-click to Edit and Enable to add search internet link to Start
menu. Click OK.
Know any website IP address in Command Prompt
1. Press Windows logo key + R to open Run
2. Type cmd and press Enter.
3. Type ping www.websitename.com and press Enter in Command Prompt window. Then
the result shows the IP address of the website.
Example: type ping www.google.com
View Passwords hidden in asterisks
We always want the browsers to remember the username and password of our online accounts. After
a period of time, we tend to forget what the password was. It is easy to find those passwords, if we
are able to see what is behind the black dots (……..) or asterisks (*******). To know the password
behind the dots then follow the steps:
1. Right click on the password textbox and from the options click on Inspect Element(Q).
2. Then, a small window would come up with a few lines of code. You need not worry about
the codes. The line in which the password will be highlighted. If the codes are not showingin a html format below then click on button on the lower left corner of that page.
3. Now double click on the term password and change it to text and press enter. Now you see
what’s behind the dots.
How to speedup online videos and performance of Firefox
By default Firefox automatically saves your session every 10 seconds so that it can be easily restored
even of a crash. But if you think 10 seconds is either too much or is not enough, then you can change it
to whatever you think is right for you, with just a little tweak to the about:config settings. To do this,
1. Open Mozilla Firefox browser and in the address bar type about:config and press Enter.
2. Then you will get a warning message, click on I'll be careful, I promise.
3. Then in the filter text entry bar (on top left), type browser.sessionstore.interval
4. Just double click on it and change its value to 120000. If you want to input your own value,
then you should know that the value is actually in milliseconds. So, if you want to change the
interval to 1 minute, then you would enter 60000.
5. Click OK and restart the Firefox.
Sign-out of all Gmail sessions
If you have forgotten to sign-out from your Gmail account anywhere, you can now sign-out from all
Gmail sessions. To do this,
1. Open your Gmail account and click on the Details link in the bottom right of your screen.
2. This will open up a pop up window where you can see recent activity, whether your Gmail
account is open in any other location, and choose to Sign out of all other sessions.
3. Clicking that button will ensure all your previous Gmail sessions are logged out, leavingyou logged in to the current computer only.
Sign-in to multiple Google accounts in the same browser
If you use multiple Google accounts say one for Gmail another for ad-sense and yet another for
Reader, you would know that you can sign into only one account at a time in a browser. Of course you
could use separate browsers for each of the account, but it is hassle to do so. It is a great alternative
that Google has an advanced feature that lets you sign into multiple Google Accounts simultaneouslyin the same browser.
In this case I will show you how to sing in multiple Gmail accounts.
1. Sign in to your Gmail Account.
2. Then at the top-left corner Click on your profile photo and click Add Account.
3. Then another tab opens in your web-browser. Enter another Username and Password.
Click Sign in.
Now, you are able to view your both Gmail Accounts in one web-browser.
Log in to multiple web accounts simultaneously - (Google, Gmail, Facebook, Twitter, etc.)
Many of us have multiple accounts with one web site. Whether it be several Gmail accounts or twoseparate twitter accounts or any such multiple accounts. But it is always a hassle to have to log out of
each account to access another. Follow the steps to log in to multiple web accounts simultaneously.
In Internet Explorer 8 and higher version
Open Internet Explorer, Click onFile and then New Session. This opens up a new browser window
that will allow you to log into different accounts across the sessions.
Save any web article to PDF for free
Internet is a very huge library of information. It has millions and millions of pages of informationabout virtually anything. Reading each and every article may not be possible due to many reasons
mainly due to time limitation.
The website http://pdfmyurl.com/ helps you to save the web-article to PDF format and you can read
it at anytime you want.
PDF MY URL - http://pdfmyurl.com/
1. Type http://pdfmyurl.com/ on your browser’s address bar.
2. Enter the URL (that you want to convert into pdf format). In this case I have typed the webaddress http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Windows_8
3. Click button next to the Enter url Location field.
4. In a few seconds, this website allows you to download a PDF version of the requested
webpage.
5. Then you can download the PDF file and read even through the requested URL may be
blocked.
Similarly, there is another website http://joliprint.com/ helps you to save and share the pdf format of
web-article. This site gives you various options for saving the file. You can directly download it,
have it send to your Email address or even can be shared using Facebook and Twitter. In this way
you can access the blocked website on the internet.
JOLIPRINT - http://joliprint.com/
1. Type http://www.joliprint.com on your browser’s address bar.
2. Enter the URL (that you want to convert into pdf format).
3. Click joliprint it ! button next to the Enter URL Location field.
4. In a few seconds, this website allows you to download a PDF version of the requestedwebpage. You can save the PDF file to Google Docs, Gmailand share with Facebook and
Twitter.
Free online Resume builder
A resume (also called CV: Curriculum Vitae) is a document used by persons to present their
backgrounds and skills. Resumes are the best reflections of your career. It can be used for a variety
of reasons, but most often they are used to secure new employment. Majority of the recruiters agree
that they go through each resume only for a few seconds and that the first impression they get is fromthem. Hence, the resume will have to make the first big punch for you. Having said all these, the
below List of Resume builder websites makes superb resumes for you.
List of Resume builder
websites
www.resumebuilder.org
www.cvmkr.com
www.resumesimo.com
www.instantonlinecv.co.in
www.resumonk.com
www.resumesimo.com
www.gotresumebuilder.com
www.freeresumebuilder.biz
www.onlinecvgenerator.com
www.mycvbuilder.com
Unlock PDF and EXCEL files Online
If a PDF files have some restrictions (like Copy from the PDF file won’t work, etc.) and password.Then the website http://www.pdfunlock.com/ helps you to remove passwords and restrictions fromsecured PDF files.
1. Go to http://www.pdfunlock.com/
2. Browse the PDF file that you want to unlock. Then click Unlock!.
3. Within few seconds, you will able to download the unlocked PDF file.
File Type Website
PDF www.pdfunlock.com
www.unlock-pdf.com
Excel www.unprotectexcel.com

Free online file converter
This is a nice online converter file which can be used for almost all type of files at anytime from
anywhere. To do this,
1. Go to www.online-convert.com and select the tool you want to use.
2. Suppose you wish to convert an image to PNG format. Select the conversion and click on
Go.
3. Now browse the file or enter the web URL of the image. Select the quality settings and then
click on Convert.
4. After the conversion, you will find the download link of the converted file. Download the
file.
Online Edit Photos
Upload your picture or photo or enter the URL of an image on the Internet. After uploading, you can
resize, sharpen and/or rotate your photo. Several filters and effects are available to enhance your
photo: Red Eye Removal, Sepia, Enhance, Sharpen and Polaroid Effect.
Some popular websites are :
http://www.freeonlinephotoeditor.com/
http://www.fotor.com/
http://pixlr.com/editor/
http://web.photocat.com/edit/
http://www.befunky.com/
http://www.pizap.com/pizap
http://www.picmonkey.com/
https://www.picmonkey.com/editor
Scan your files for malwares online for free
This is a site where in you can upload your suspected files and get them scanned for free .An email
from anyone can also have a virus or a malware which might have got attached to the mail without his
or her knowledge. Antivirus software has become an indispensable element of your computer. It is
very good for them who hate anti-viruses. Jotti's Malware scan is a free online service where 20
prominent antivirus software scan the files uploaded by you and inform whether they are clean or
not. The file you suspect to be infected can be uploaded and the result is almost immediate. To do
this,
1. Type the http://virusscan.jotti.org/en on your browser’s address bar.
2. Then select the file required to be scanned.
Online trace any mobile number anywhere
You can find out all information we have on any phone number in the world. Simply enter the phone
number in international format for correct results.
Phonetrace.Org
http://www.phonetrace.org/
How does it work?
Using both GPS satellite techniques and triangulation based on phone towers.
Who makes use of this technology?
Cell phones are giving employers new ways to check up on employees in the field and raising fresh
workplace privacy concerns as a result. Law enforcement agencies have found this technology to be
the biggest breakthrough since DNA testing. Also PhoneTrace has been in huge demand by people
check up on an untrustworthy spouse!
Trace ... Mobile Number - Location Tracking with details
http://www.findandtrace.com/trace-mobile-number-location
Phone No Tracker | Online GPS Mobile Locator Using Cell Phone Number
http://gpsphonetracker.org/
GPS Phone Tracker is the first free website for finding any phone signals only with number. Now
you can start tracking your friends, kids or spouse. Phone tracker app can locate your lost or
stolen cell phone in less than 20 seconds! Try out gps phone tracker free online to get experience
about how to track someones phone without them knowing. Just put a phone number which you
want to lookup, then get your locations for Android, iPhone or Windows mobile devices.
Search pictures of people in 3D layout
The website www.facesaerch.com is a free website which helps you search faces of people. This
website has a very simple layout and all you need to do is to enter the person's name in the search box
and click on search. The interface gives a 3D layout of pictures with matching names.
Disable websites from resizing your Firefox browser window
Firefox is a very popular browser. Be it in the speed which it displays a webpage, it downloads a
file or the number of plug-in available for further making the browser user-friendly, Mozilla Firefox
stands ahead of other browsers. It is really disturbing to see certain websites resizes the browser
window. This is how to disable them doing so in Firefox.
1. Click on Tools menu and select Options.
2. Click on the Content tab.
3. Opposite to the check box name Enable JavaScript, you can find a button named
Advanced. Click on it.
4. Uncheck the option Move or resize existing windows.
5. Click OK twice.
How to run Firefox inside Firefox inside Firefox
Open Mozilla Firefox and in the address bar type the following URL and press Enter.
chrome://browser/content/browser.xul
You could again enter the above URL in the second Firefox that appears to open a third one. You
could repeat this as many times as your screen size permits.
YouTube SECRETS
YouTube, the extremely popular video sharing website averaging more than 3 billion page views per
day needs no introduction to its fans who spend a considerable amount of their time watching and
sharing videos on it. While most of these users know every nook and corner of this website, there are
some features that are hidden deep within, in a manner that only few of the most experienced users
seem to know about them. This article contains some such features, tips and tricks.
YouTube MySpeed
Are YouTube videos taking too much time to load on your internet connection? Visit the YouTube
MySpeed page to find your video streaming speed and compare it with the average speed of your ISP,
your city, your state, your country and the world.
YouTube Disco
YouTube is all set to replace your music players with YouTube Disco. This music discovery project
allows you to find the videos of your choice, create a list of them and then easily watch them without
having the need to choose a new video after the one you are watching is finished.
YouTube Editor
Do you edit your videos before uploading them to YouTube? Now, you don't need to because it lets
you to do all of that online with YouTube Editor; well not all of that but it at least lets you combine,
trim and rotate videos. The best part about YouTube Editor is that it allows you to find copyright free
music that you can add to your videos. It also offers some comparably advanced features like
stabilizing shaky videos and inserting transitions.
YouTube TV
YouTube lets you watch the videos of your choice but have you ever wanted to just sit back and enjoy
watching videos just like you watch television? If you have, then YouTube TV can be of help.
YouTube TV plays high quality full screen videos tailored to your choices (if you are signed in to
your Google account). If you are not signed in, you can choose a category to watch videos from,
watch featured videos and even search for the video of your choice.
Set default video playback quality
Are you annoyed at manually changing the quality of every YouTube video you watch? Now you don't
need to, because YouTube has an option that automatically lets you select the quality of videos you
see. If you have a slow connection, you can select the option of never playing high quality videos.
You can also select the option of showing captions and annotations automatically.
Watch Videos blocked in your country with a URL trick
If the URL of the video that is blocked in your country is youtube.com/watch?v={video-id}, you can
access it by going to youtube.com/v/{video-id}. As an additional advantage, you will be able to view
the video at the full size of your browser window.
Link to a specific time in a video
If you want to link to a video at a specific time, you can add #t=XXs to the URL where XX is a
variable which represents the number of seconds after which the video will start.
Play videos in slow motion
Press the space bar while a video is being played to play it in slow motion.
YouTube Live
Ever wanted to broadcast your videos live on the internet? YouTube Live lets you do just that.
YouTube Live supports larger production than Hangouts on Air. However, to broadcast videos live,
your channel must be in good standing.
Create a feed of almost anything on YouTube
Just go to the YouTube Data API page and build a custom feed for yourself. However, there is a
problem with the URI generated for specific categories as "{http://gdata.youtube.com/ schemas/
2007/ categories.cat}" is also added to it. Remove this and the URI is good to go.
Find out what is popular on YouTube
Want to find the best videos on YouTube? Use Popular on Youtube channel to find what other users
are watching, discussing and favoring. You can select a particular category to determine the best
videos in that particular category. You also have the option to play all the videos that are popular
right now.
Legally Watch Full Length Movies and TV Shows on YouTube
YouTube has a dedicated page to allow users to watch full-length ad supported movies for free.
Movies are classified based on their genre and are offered in full HD quality. Movies are uploaded
by the creators for the purpose of creating another source of revenue for themselves as Google gives
them a portion of the advertising revenue. A similar page exists for TV shows. These two pages are
country specific and may or may not be available in your country.
YouTube Easter eggs
For Star Wars and Star Trek fans
If you are a Star Wars fan, then there is some good news for you. YouTube has an easter egg just for
you guys. Search YouTube for "use the force, Luke" to warp your screen. Star Trek fans need not be
disappointed as there is an easter egg for them as well. Searching YouTube for "Beam me up, Scotty"
reveals it.
YouTube Snakes Easter egg
You can play the classic Snakes game while watching any video in your browser. Just pause a video,
hold the left arrow key for 2 seconds and while still holding it, press the Up arrow key. This only
works in the new YouTube player on videos played on YouTube.com.
do the Harlem shake
Search YouTube for "do the Harlem shake" and the entire page will shake violently with the song
"Harlem Shake" by Baauer being played in the background.
Add Firefox’s Spelling-Check feature to forms
Mozilla Firefox comes with a cool built-in spelling checker. You could right-click the word to see
spelling suggestions along with the usual context-menu options.
1. Open Mozilla Firefox, type about:config in the address bar and press Enter.
2. Click I’ll be careful, I promise!.
3. In the Filter field, type spellcheck. Right-click on layout.spellcheckDefault, and click on
Modify.
4. Change the value from 1 to 2 and restart Firefox. The spelling checker should now work in
most online forms.
Check username availability on multiple sites at once
Most people use a specific username or alias across a lot of sites, as it is easier to remember and
also, your friends could identify you easily in various sites with your username. But it could be very
frustrating, when you try to sign up on a new site only to find that your username is already taken.
Checking for availability of your chosen username in several sites of interest could be a daunting task.
Fortunately, there is an easier way.
www.usernamecheck.com is a site, in which you can use to check the username availability on
multiple sites at once. You can type in your desired name usernamecheck.com will scan over 20
social networks and services and tells you within seconds whether the username is available or taken.
If it is available, it provides Thumbs Up sign to the site, where you can sign up before someone else
takes your name.
You don't need the “http://” portion of a web page on Address bar/Location bar
When typing an Internet address you do not need to type http:// or even www. in the address.
For example, if you want to visit Google you could just type google.com and press Enter.
Type google.com and press Enter (Left) : Type google and press Ctrl + Enter (Right)
To make things even quicker, if you're visiting a .com address you can type google and then press
Ctrl + Enter to type out the full http://www.google.com address.
Take advantage of tabbed browsing
Take full advantage of tabbed browsing in all Internet browsers. While reading any web page if you
come across a link you may be interested in open that link in a new tab so it can be viewed later. A
new tab can be opened by holding down the Ctrl key and clicking the link or if you have a mouse
with a wheel click the link with the middle mouse button.
Quickly move between the fields of a web page
If you're filling out an online form, e-mail, or other text field you can quickly move between each of
the fields by pressing the Tab key or Shift + Tab to move back a field.
To move Forward, press Tab key.
To move Backward, press Shift + Tab key.
For example, if you're filling out your name and the next field is your e-mail address you can press the
Tab key to switch to the e-mail field.
Tips
This tip also applies to the buttons, if you press tab and the web developer has designed
correctly the button should be selected and will allow you to press the Space bar or Enter
to push the button.
If you have a drop-down box that lists every country or every state you can click that box
and then press the letter of the state or country you're looking for. For example, is a
drop-down box of States in the India you could press u on the keyboard to quickly scroll
to I types.
Google “I’m Feeling Lucky” button Magic Tricks
Go to Google Home Page (www.google.com) and type the following codes and click I’m Feeling
Lucky button right next to the Google Search button. You must Turn off Instant search (fromSearch settings option).
Type the following codes and click I’m Feeling Lucky button
right next to the Google Search button.
google sphere google gravity google mirror google pacman
weenie google lol limewire epic google annoying google
rainbow google let it snow tilt google loco
google heart
page
epic box who’s awesome who is the
cutest
google magic sexy snape Google Pirate Google Hacker
GoHarsh Google God Google Gothic Google Piglatin
"Googlo" Google Pond Translate for
Animals
Funny Google
Google Blackle Google
Variations
Google Guitar do a barrel roll
Google
“country
name”
Google “color
name”
How Huge Is
Google?
(Infographic)
am I awesome
Tips:
Type Google “country name” and click on I’m Feeling Lucky. For example type google
china and click on I’m Feeling Lucky.
Type Google “color name” and click on I’m Feeling Lucky. For example type google
blue and click on I’m Feeling Lucky.
Example of Google mirror
If you clickGoogle Search button after type the code, then you have to click on the first web-search
option.
Google Results page full overview
1. Header
2. Search bar
3. Search results
4. Tools & filters
5. Right-hand section
6. Bottom of the page
Google Calculator
Google search can be used as a calculator. It can calculate anything from the simplest math to the most
complex equation. Enter any math equation into the search box and we'll calculate your answer.
Example: Type 100 * 3.14 - sin(65) and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Search with an exact phrase in Google
Put quotation marks around words "any word" to search for an exact phrase in an exact order. Keep in
mind that searching with quotes might exclude relevant results. For instance, a search for "Alexander
Bell" will miss pages that refer to Alexander G. Bell.
Example: Type “to be or not to be” and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Search for specific file types in Google
There are various kinds of files available over the net. Searching for a specific file type isn’t reallyeasy. But using this tip you can easily search for a specific file type. Search for specific types of files,
such as PDFs, PPTs, or XLS, by adding filetype: and the 3-letter file abbreviation.
Example: Type filetype:pdf Computer or Computer filetype:pdf and Click Google Searchor
Press Enter.
Google Measurement Converter
Convert any measurement -- like miles to kilometers or ounces to liters -- by typing in the number and
unit of measurement.
Example: Example: Type 5km to cm and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Currency conversions in Google
Get current exchange rates by searching [currency 1] in [currency 2].
Example: Type 1$ in INR and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Exact time of any place in Google
To see what time it is anywhere in the world, search time and the city or country. If you want to see
the local time, then just type time and Press Enter. If you want to know the time in a specific city or
country, then type time city/country name and Press Enter.
Example: Type time london and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Check the weather of anywhere in Google
If you want to see the local weather, then just type weather and Press Enter. If you want to know the
weather of a specific city or country, then type weather city/country name and Press Enter.
Get Sunset and Sunrise time of anywhere in Google
To Get Type and Press Enter
Local Sunrise time sunrise
Local Sunset time sunset
City/Country Sunrise
time
sunrise city/country
name
City/Country Sunset
time
sunset city/country
name
Get definitions of everything in Google
If you want to know the definition of anything, and then type define any word & Press Enter to get its
definition.
Example: Type define computer and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Trace My IP Address
If you want to know the exact IP address of your computer, then type my ip & Press Enter.
Example: Type my ip and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Search by advanced image search in Google
1. Go to Google Image.
2. Enter the search item in the search bar.
3. Use Search tools to find an exact size, color or type of photo or drawing.
4. With the tools in the bottom panel, you can filter your search to include only photos with
faces, clip art, high-res images or only images that are available for commercial use.
Get movie times in Google
Search on a movie name or just movie to see theater locations and showtimes in your area.
Example: Type movies washington and Click Google Search or Press Enter.
Get the list of all films of any Actor and Actress
Go to www.google.com
Type Actor/Actress name movie and Press Enter.
Example : Al Pacino movie
Google URL shortener
The Google URL Shortenerat https://goo.gl/ is a service that takes long URLs and squeezes theminto fewer characters to make a link easier to share, tweet, or email to friends. For example, the short
URL http://goo.gl/v0SOu is a convenient shorthand representation for the long URL
http://www.latimes.com/business/la-fi-windows-surface-20121130,0,474887.story
Go to http://goo.gl/ and paste the long URL you wish to shorten into the input box at the top of the
page. Click Shorten and to the right of the box you’ll see a short goo.gl URLthat can be copied and
pasted anywhere you’d like to share it.
If you’d like to track the analytics of your shortened URL, please sign in to your Google Accountbefore shortening your URL. Your shortened URL will automatically be added to your goo.gl history.
Google Earth
Google Earth is a virtual globe, map and geographical information program that was originally called
EarthViewer 3D.
Google Earth allows you to travel the world through a virtual globe and view satellite imagery, maps,
terrain, 3D buildings, and much more. With Google Earth's rich, geographical content, you are able toexperience a more realistic view of the world. You can fly to your favorite place, search for
businesses and even navigate through directions. It's all up to you!
Although the options within Google Earth are endless, here are a few things you can do:
Discover the Earth: Fly to any location in the world, learn about a city and it's geographic
features, find local businesses, and create tours.
Explore the Sky: Enjoy the wonders of the heavens and learn about our solar system.
Dive in the Ocean: Go beneath the surface and visit the depths of the ocean and explore the
planet's deepest underwater canyons. Learn about ocean observations, climate change, and
endangered species. You can even discover new places to surf, dive and fish.
Walk on the Moon: Take tours of landing sites narrated by Apollo astronauts and view 3D
models of landed spacecraft.
Visit Mars: Travel the Red Planet and explore NASA's latest imagery of our galacticneighbor.
Google Earth is simply your ticket to explore the Universe!
To explore the earth in 3D view:
1. Go to http://www.google.co.in/earth/
2. Click Download
3. After completion of download, open Google Earth.
4. Search any location in 3D view.
Most useful Google Operators
The following table lists the search operators that work with each Google search service. There is nospace between operator and keyword. Ex. software site:www.download.com
Operator Example
Site: software
site:www.download.com
will find all sites containing the
word software, located within the
download.com domain
Intitle: intitle:google hacking
will find all sites with the word
google in the title and hacking in
the text
Allintitle: allintitle:google hacking
will find all sites with the words
google and hacking in the title
Inurl: inurl:google hacking
will find all sites containing the
w or d hacking in the text and
google in the URL
Allinurl: allinurl:google hacking
will find all sites with the words
google and hacking in the URL
filetype:
(or ext:)
filetype:pdf hacking
will return PDFs containing the
word hacking, while filetype:xls
hacking will return Excel
spreadsheets with the word
hacking
Numrange: numrange:50000-100000 car
will return sites containing a
number from 50000 to 100000
and the word car. The same result
can be achieved with
50000..100000 car
Link: link:www.google.com
will return documents containing
one or more links to
www.google.com
Inanchor: inanchor:hacking
will return documents with links
whose description contains the
word hacking (that's the actual
link text, not the URL indicated by
the link)
Allintext: allintext:google hacking
will return documents which
contain the phrase google
hacking in their text only
cache: cache:www.timesofindia.com
will display Google’s cached
version of a web page, instead of
the current version of the page.
info:
(or id:)
info:www.google.com
will find the information about
www.google.com
related: related:www.timesofindia.com
will find websites related to the
timesofindia website.
~ ~hacking
will find the synonym
“ ” “windows hacking”
will find the phrase
OR computer OR laptop
will find the results include either
search term.
– ipod –itunes
use – immediately before a search
term you want to exclude
+ +the
use + immediately before
automatically excluded search
terms that you want included
Google help center
If you have the curiosity about Google, then the following website helps you out.
Help
Center
Website
Google
Help Center
https://support.google.com
Google+
Help center
https://support.google.com/plus
Google Play
Help center
https://support.google.com/googleplay
YouTube
Help center
https://support.google.com/youtube
Gmail Help
center
https://support.google.com/mail
Web
Search
Help center
https://support.google.com/websearch
Google Map
Help center
https://support.google.com/maps
Google
Chrome
Help center
https://support.google.com/chrome/
Google
Features
www.google.com/insidesearch/features/
Backup all your facebook data like photos, videos, and text
1. Login to your Facebook account.
2. Click on the Arrow dropdown and then Settings.
3. In General tab Click on Download a Copy at the bottom of page to backup your Facebook
data.
4. Click on Start My Archive button twice.
5. Click on Confirm button.
6. Now, Facebook will generate your personal archive and send to your default Email ID
when it's ready.
Facebook shortcut keys
Facebook has shortcuts (access keys) for people who only use their keyboards to navigate.
Find the right combination of keys for your browser in the list below, and replace # with the access
key number listed under Access Keys below.
Internet Explorer for PC: Alt + #, then Enter
Firefox for PC: Shift + Alt + #
Safari for Mac: Ctrl + Opt + #
Firefox for Mac: Ctrl + Opt + #
Chrome for Mac: Ctrl + Opt + #
Chrome for PC: Alt + #
Access Keys
0 - Help
1 - Home
2 - Timeline
3 - Friends
4 - Inbox
5 – Notifications
6 – Settings
7 - Activity Log
8 - About
9 - Terms
Keyboard Shortcuts
News Feed
j and k - Scroll between News Feed stories
enter/return - See more of the selected story
p - Post a new status
l - Like or unlike the selected story
c - Comment on the selected story
s - Share the selected story
o - Open an attachment from the selected story
/ - Search
q - Search chat contacts
? - Open a list of these keyboard shortcuts while in News Feed
Web Messenger:
CTRL + g - Search conversations
CTRL + q - Show/hide keyboard shortcuts
CTRL + Delete - Archive/unarchive conversation
CTRL + j - Mark as spam
CTRL + m - Start a new message
CTRL + i - Go to Inbox
CTRL + u - Go to Other
How to deactivate or permanently delete a Facebook account
If you would like to delete your Facebook account, then
1. Login to your Facebook account.
2. Click on the Arrow dropdown and then Settings.
3. On the Security tab click on Deactivate Your Account at the bottom of page.
4. Confirm Facebook Account Deactivation page will load. Select one of the reasons why
you want to delete your Facebook account and click on confirm button.
5. Your facebook account will be deactivated after again choosing the Deactivate button on
next step.
If you would like to delete your Facebook account permanently with no option for recovery, then
1. Log in to your Facebook account.
2. Open https://www.facebook.com/help/delete_account in your browser
3. Click on delete my account.
Your facebook account will be deleted after choosing reasons why you want to delete your Facebook
account and click on confirm button.
Post blank status and comment on facebook
This is an amazing trick to post blank status and comments on Facebook means your status update
shows nothing and your friends will be amazed to see this.
Updating Blank Status
To update a blank status,
1. Log in to your Facebook account.
2. Click on Update Status box and Press the ALT key, hold it, and type 0,1,7,3 without those
commas (ALT+0173).
3. Click on Post.
Tips: If you want to post multiple blank lines, then you should type the above code line by line.
Posting Blank Comments
Posting a blank comment is pretty much the same as creating a blank file or folder in windows. If you
missed that article, catch it now.
Okay, so to post a blank comment all you have to do is press the ALT key, hold it, and type 0,1,7,3
without those commas (ALT+0173). Remember, do not release the alt key while typing. Now leave
all the keys and press enter.
Insert symbols and characters in Facebook status and comments
This is a cool trick to update Facebook status
1. Log in to your Facebook account.
2. Go to http://fsymbols.com/
3. Click and Copy the symbols and characters which you want to insert in facebook status
4. Paste it in your facebook status and comments
Note : Another website for your interest
http://www.symbols-n-emoticons.com/p/facebook-emoticons-list.html
How to block people/apps/events/pages on facebook
To do this,
1. Log into your Facebook account.
2. Click on the Arrow dropdown and then Settings.
3. Click on Blocking on the left panel.
4. Then block anything you want.
View Facebook Photos in Full Screen Mode
Now Facebook has published out new photo viewer. This feature allows users to view Facebook
photos in full screen mode.
1. First open a photo by clicking on it.
2. Place the mouse pointer on it and click on Options at the bottom right of the photo.
3. Click on Enter Fullscreen for view facebook photos in full screen mode.
4. That's it and now use Esc key for exit full screen mode.
How to find if somebody hacked your facebook account
Now-a-days everybody wants to know everyone’s facebook password. So if they will get your
password then your facebook account will be used in a bad way. This is a method to know who
opens your account silently. To do this,
1. Login to your Facebook account.
2. Click on the Arrow dropdown and then Settings.
3. Click on Security tab, choose Where You're Logged In option.
Find out the locations with time and devices to trace out whether you logged in or not at that
time.
4. If you want to logout from that session then click on End Activity.
How to Block Facebook Applications Forever
1. Log into your Facebook account.
2. Click on the Home-dropdown and then Privacy Settings.
3. Click on Edit settings under Ads, Apps and Websites section.
4. Click on Edit settings.
5. Close all platform apps one by one.
Who can look me up? On Facebook
1. Log into your Facebook account.
2. Click on the Arrow dropdown and then Settings.
3. Click on Privacy tab
4. Under the Who can look me up? Edit your desired settings.
Facebook Emoji
Facebook includes a long list of emoji and emoticons that users can use in messages, status updates,
comments and basically any place there is text on Facebook. You can use the emoji keyboard on your
iPhone or Android, but you can also type out Facebook emoticon short codes in Facebook.
FACEBOOK
EMOTICON
SHORT
CODE
NAME
(y) Like
O:) Angel
3:) Devil
8-) Glasses
<3 Heart
:* Kiss
:v Pac Man
<(“) Penguin
:|] Robot
(^^^) Shark
:-o Gasp
:p Tongue Out
^_^ Kiki
8-| Sunglasses
:poop: Poop
:3 Goofy Face / Cat
The list of Facebook emoticons above includes the short code that you need to type in to Facebook to
make the emoji. You can also copy and paste the short code from this list.
Convert Facebook Profile into a Page
The method is very cool as you will no need to individually invite all your friends to like your page
as you will be just converting the Facebook profile into the page. So just follow up some of simple
steps below to proceed.
1. First of all login into your profile which you want to migrate to a Facebook page.
2. Now open the link to migrate your profile.
3. Now you will see all the category in which you can change your page, select any of your
choice or need.
4. Now agree the Facebook terms and conditions and proceed.
5. Note that converting your facebook profile into a page will lost all your facebook data and
your friends will convert into your page likes.
6. Facebook will ask you some security question while proceeding answer them and proceed.
7. That is it you are done now your profile get completely converted into a page, share your
links and media there.
Verify Facebook Page or Profile
Facebook Page Verification method only four type of verification of pages or profiles in 2015 which
are :-
Journalists
Popular Brand or Businesses
Government Officials
Celebrities
These are the four categories of pages or profile which can be verified by Facebook with the newmethod of verification facebook page or profile 2015. Suppose if you have any local business which
is popular then Facebook may claimed your page if you are official. And then there is no need to
submit any type of request to Facebook for page verification. They automatically claim your page as
verified depend on some details and minimum requirements mention by Facebook.
If you have pages mentions above there will be chances to get your page or profile is verified and
your Facebook page must be official represent your local business or any personality and may be
have some popularity on Facebook. When you create Facebook page fill all the real info about your
or your business so Facebook will get to know that your real person. You need to follow some
instructions :-
1. Link To Your Profile or Page From Official Website on your page or profile which you want to
verify facebook page 2015.
2. Provide accurate information in details about your business in About Section of Page or Profile.
In About section you must add :
Significant long and short description,
Keyword who represent your business,
Email,
Official Website,
Products and
Verified Facebook Page Location with claimed business address
And Other details in Page Info tab.
To send them Facebook page verification “Request a verified Badge” request you need to
follow the link given below and fill the real information.
REQUEST FOR FACEBOOK PAGE OR PROFILE VERIFICATION
Click to open the below link
REQUEST A VERIFIED BADGE
Facebook Mentions is only available to people with verified Facebook profiles or Pages. To request
a verified badge for your Page, please fill out this form. Fill in the required information and send
request and then you are done.
Accept/Reject all Facebook Requests at once
The method is very simple and easy as you just have to use a simple Google Chrome extension that
will work for you to accept or rejects all the friends’ requests at once. Just follow the simple steps
discussed below to proceed.
1. First of all in Google Chrome Browser open and install the extension Facebook Friends
Requests Accept/Reject from here.
2. Now a Facebook Friends Requests Accept/Reject icon at right top corner of chrome.
3. Now open the link https://www.facebook.com/friends/requests and you will see all the
Facebook request of your account.
4. Now click on the Facebook Friends Requests Accept/Reject icon at right top corner of
chrome.
5. Now it will ask you for accept all or reject all just select according to your wish and then
refresh the page.
6. Now you will see all friends request will be accept or reject accordingly you had selected.
Delete all Facebook Messages at once
1. First of all you need a simple browser extension that is available for both the Google
Chrome and Mozilla Firefox.
2. For Google Chrome download and install it from here and For Mozilla Firefox download
and install it from here.
3. Now after you installed these browser extension just proceed with login into your Facebook
account whose messages you want to delete.
4. Now go to your Facebook inbox where you will see all the messages that you have done
with your friends.
5. Now at the top right corner of your browser you will see Facebook Delete All Message
Extension’s icon, just click on it.
6. Now after clicking on it you will receive a popup confirming your action to delete all
Facebook messages just confirm it.
7. After a moment you will see All Chat History will get deleted.
Hide last seen in Facebook chat
HIDE LAST SEEN IN FACEBOOK CHAT IN GOOGLE CHROME
1. First of all install and open the Google Chrome Browser of your computer.
2. Now in the browser open the link by clicking here.
3. Now you will see Facebook unseen extension in the page displayed.
4. Now click on install there and installation process will begin and the extension will get
added in your browser.
5. That’s it you are done now you can easily see all the message without showing the seen on
that with this extension.
HIDE LAST SEEN IN FACEBOOK CHAT IN MOZILLA FIREFOX
1. First of all install and open the Mozilla Firefox Browser of your computer.
2. Now install the plugin stealth by clicking here.
3. That’s it you are done now you can easily see all the message without showing the
seen on that with this extension.
Wayback Machine
It is a digital archive of the World Wide Web and other information on the Internet created by the
Internet Archive, a non-profit organization, based in San Francisco, California. It was set up by
Brewster Kahle and Bruce Gilliat, and is maintained with content from Alexa Internet. The service
enables users to see archived versions of web pages across time, which the Archive calls a "three
dimensional index."
Since 1996, they have been archiving cached pages of web sites onto their large cluster of Linux
nodes. They revisit sites every few weeks or months and archive a new version if the content has
changed. The intent is to capture and archive content that would otherwise be lost whenever a site is
changed or closed down. Their grand vision is to archive the entire Internet.
The name Wayback Machine was chosen as a droll reference to a plot device in an animated cartoon
series, The Rocky and Bullwinkle Show. In one of that animated cartoon's component segments,
Peabody's Improbable History, lead characters Mr. Peabody and Sherman routinely used a time
machine called the "WABAC machine" (pronounced wayback) to witness, participate in, and, more
often than not, alter famous events in history.
1. Go to http://archive.org/web/
2. Then in the search bar enter the Website URL, which you wish to go back in it.
3. Then click on BROWSE HISTORY.
4. Select a date on that calendar and go you are now seeing the page of history of that
website.
WEB proxy server or HTTP proxy server
In computer networks, a proxy server is a server (a computer system or an application) that acts as an
intermediary for requests from clients seeking resources from other servers. A client connects to the
proxy server, requesting some service, such as a file, connection, web page, or other resource
available from a different server and the proxy server evaluates the request as a way to simplify and
control its complexity. Proxies were invented to add structure and encapsulation to distributed
systems. Today, most proxies are web proxies, facilitating access to content on the World Wide Web
and providing anonymity.
Communication between two computers (shown in grey) connected through a third computer
(shown in red) acting as a proxy. Bob does not know whom the information is going to, which is
why proxies can be used to protect privacy.
List of WEB proxy servers or HTTP proxy servers
https://www.hidemyass.com/proxy
https://zend2.com/
https://kproxy.com/
https://hide.me/en/proxy
https://www.proxfree.com/
https://www.filterbypass.me/
https://zendproxy.com/
www.anonproxy.eu/
www.cyberghostvpn.com/en/proxy
http://proxy.org/
Glype
A web-based proxy script is hosted on a website which provides a proxy service to users via a web
browser. A proxy service downloads requested web pages, modifies them for compatibility with the
proxy, and forwards them on to the user. Web proxies are commonly used for anonymous browsing
and bypassing censorship and other restrictions.
Glype : https://www.glype.com/
Glype Downloader : https://www.glype.com/download.php
Glype is a web-based proxy script written in PHP which focuses on features, functionality, and ease
of use. Webmasters use Glype to quickly and easily set up their own proxy sites. Glype helps users to
defeat Internet censorship and be anonymous while web browsing. There have been over 949,000
downloads of Glype since 2007. Thousands of web-based proxy websites are powered by Glype.
Glype Features
Free for personal use and licensing options are available for commercial use.
Source Viewable and webmasters may modify the source code subject to the terms of the
Software License Agreement.
Plug and Play. Simply upload, configure and go!
Admin Control Panel for easy management and configuration.
JavaScript Support provides increased compatibility with websites.
Skinable. A theme system allows for customization of your proxy.
Access Controls blacklist users by IP address and websites by domain name.
Blocked.com Integration protects the proxy by blocking specificed countries, filtering
companies, malicious traffic, bots and spiders, and more.
Unique URLs provide greater privacy by expiring URLs in the browser history at the end of
a browsing session.
Plugins allow for easy installion of site-specific modifications. Useful for adding new
functionality to websites.
Advanced Options let users change their user-agent and referrer, manage cookies, and
remove JavaScripts and Flash.
Hide-My-IP.Com
This is a tool which, once installed on your computer, will allow you to bypass censorship, hide your
identity and surf the internet anonymously.
https://www.hide-my-ip.com/
Surf anonymously, prevent hackers from acquiring your IP address, send anonymous email, and
encrypt your Internet connection. Protect your online privacy by changing your IP with Hide My
IP.
JonDo – the IP changer
https://anonymous-proxy-servers.net/en/jondo.html
You may use JonDonym for anonymous surfing, anonymous e-mail, chats and other purposes. JonDo,
formerly JAP, is the ip changer proxy tool you have to install on your computer. It acts as a proxy and
will forward the traffic of your internet applications multible encrypted to the mix cascades and so it
will hide your ip address. It is a Java application, open source and you can download it for free. You
may use JonDonym for free, but free mix cascades are restricted in some cases.
JonDo will provide an anonymisation proxy for you, but it does NOT change your system setting. You
have to configure the proxy setting of each internet application you want to use anonymous with
JonDonym by self.
VPN (Virtual Private Network) Services
What's a VPN service? If you've ever had to connect to a corporate network while working remotely,
you may already be familiar with the technology. In simplest terms, you are creating a secure,
encrypted connection between your computer and your company's VPN server. This tunnel essentially
makes you part of the company's network, as if you are physically sitting in the office. All your
network traffic passes through this protected tunnel, and no one in the hotel you are staying in can see
what you are up to. The VPN service is essentially the same idea, except the VPN provider is not
letting you have access to its network, but rather offering secure access to the Internet.
Think about it this way: if your car pulls out of your driveway, someone can follow you and see
where you are going, how long you are at your destination, and when you are coming back. With a
VPN service, you are essentially driving into a closed parking garage, switching to a different car,
and driving out, and no one who was originally following you knows where you went.
There is a caveat to this metaphor, though. Just as the person who was following you could figure out
where you went if he or she happened to be at the supermarket when you got out of the car, there are
complicated timing algorithms that can figure out your activity at the exact moment you leave the
encrypted tunnel. VPN services, while tremendously helpful, are not fool-proof. As with anything else
on the Internet, don't do anything stupid.
There are several reasons why you should use VPN services: to change your IP address to something
else, to prevent anyone from eavesdropping on your online activity while you are connected to Wi-Fi
networks, and to make it harder for online advertisers to track you. There are activists who rely on
VPN services to get around government censors to communicate with the outside world. Of course,
that may be against the law in countries with strict censorship, so be careful.
VPN services are very useful and we highly recommend using them to protect your online activity
from malicious snoops. Yes, you can change your IP address to pretend to be from someplace else in
order to access content that may be restricted on a geographic basis. But be smart: don't ignore the
company's terms of service in order to get around the geographic restrictions for your own personal
gratification. You can't complain if you get caught.
How to Pick a VPN Service
The VPN services market has exploded over the past three years. Many providers are capitalizing on
the general population's growing concerns about surveillance and cyber-crime, which means it's
getting hard to tell when a company is actually providing a secure service and when it's throwing out
a lot of fancy words while selling snake oil. It's important to keep a few things in mind when
evaluating which VPN service is right for you: reputation, performance, type of encryption used,
transparency, ease of use, support, and extra features. Don't just focus on price.
Despite widespread agreement that VPN services are important to online privacy, you don't actually
see a lot of big-name security companies getting into the game. Symantec was one of the first security
companies to dip its toe into the VPN pool, but it has since discontinued its Norton Hotspot Privacy
product. F-Secure (Freedome) and Avast! (SecureLine) are among the few security companies still in
the space. Most VPN providers tend to be stand-alone companies, such as Spotflux and AnchorFree
(Hotspot Shield Elite), which makes it a little harder to figure out who to trust. I tend to trust
companies that have been around a little longer, just because if they are terrible to their customers,
then it would be easier to uncover the complaints than if the company just popped up a year ago. But
your mileage may vary when looking at the company reputation.
Performance is a must when considering VPN services. When you didn't have a lot of choices, you
expected to have hiccups and lags while online. Now that there are services that still give you a great
experience online while keeping you secure, there is no reason to accept slow speeds or servers
which are frequently offline. We spend about a week testing each service at varying times of the day
and from different locations to make sure we get a good idea of what the overall service is like. Look
for services that provide a free trial, and take advantage of it. Make sure you are happy with what you
sign up for, since most of them will not give you any refunds. This is actually why I also recommend
starting out with a short term—a week or a month—to really make sure you are happy. Yes, you may
get that discount by signing up for a year, but that's a lot of money to lose if you realize the service
doesn't meet your performance needs.
I am not a cryptography expert so I can't verify all of the encryption claims providers make. I do know
that when I looked at my network traffic using tools such as Wireshark, they were encrypted. I
verified that what URLs I visited and what data I was submitting on forms were not transmitted in
plaintext. At the very least, there would be no virtual eavesdropping by the person sitting in the coffee
shop. I prefer providers that use OpenVPN—it's a standard, and it's a lot better than the common (and
older) PPTP. I am not saying do not use PPTP—it's still preferable to not having anything at all.
Transparency is a big one for me. Is it easy to find the terms and conditions and privacy policy for the
service? Does the privacy policy spell out what the service does, what it collects, and what its
responsibilities are? There are companies that explain they collect some information but aren't clear
on how it is being used. Some—like HideIPVPN—tell you upfront that P2P and torrenting is not
allowed, and that they will cancel your account if they suspect you of using it while connected to their
service. I appreciated TorGuard's clear explanation of how it keeps track of payment card
information without maintaining any logging information. Find out where the company is based—
some countries don't have data retention laws so it is easier to keep the "We don't keep any logs"
promises.
What kind of user are you? Some people are comfortable setting up the service by downloading a
configuration file and importing it into the OpenVPN client. Others just want a simple executable to
download, install, and be up and running. Or you may prefer something small and invisible operating
in the background you don't have to think about.
A decent VPN service should be easy enough to use that you don't have to worry about support. But
you want help available for when things go wrong. Online tutorials and extensive documentation
should be a must. Chat support and phone support are definitely useful for those times when you just
need to get a person online. If the service accepts alternate payments, that's a good thing to look at.
I've yet to use Bitcoin to sign up for any of these services, but I've used pre-paid cards to sign up for
some. It's a little bit more work, but sometimes, it's not a bad idea to keep some payments separate
from your main credit card.
Finally, know what you are looking for. Do you just want a vanilla VPN service that just encrypts
your connection and gives you a brand-new IP address? Or are you looking for something more? I
personally prefer a service which acts proactively and shuts down certain applications if my VPN
connection drops suddenly (Kill Switch). Perhaps you want the service to automatically turn on—or
prompt you to turn on—if you launch a browser. Or you want some kind of network metering so that
you can track your usage. Perhaps you want to block aggressive advertising trackers. If you are a
heavy BitTorrent user, don't select a VPN service which specifically says it won't allow P2P or
torrents.
Useful Extensions and Add-ons
For Google Chrome : https://chrome.google.com/webstore/category/extensions
AdBlock
The original AdBlock for Chrome. Block all advertisements on all web pages, even
Facebook, Youtube, and Hulu.
It works automatically: just click "Add to Chrome," then visit your favorite website and see
the ads disappear!
You can also get AdBlock for Safari, Opera, and Firefox from getadblock.com.
Adblock for Youtube
Removes the video ads from Youtube
Facebook AdBlock
Tired of Facebook ads?
No problem ! Just install this AdBlock extension and all your problems are gone.
This Facebook AdBlock will remove the ads from your Facebook page, to leave you with
clean Facebook pages.
Photo Zoom for Facebook
Join nearly 5 million people using Photo Zoom for Facebook, the Highest Rated Most
Popular Extension for Google Chrome!
FlashControl
FlashControl prevents Flash content from loading unless you allow it.
Google Dictionary (by Google)
View definitions easily as you browse the web.
Google Mail Checker
Displays the number of unread messages in your Google Mail inbox. You can also click the
button to open your inbox.
Popup Blocker Pro
Blocks unwanted popups and popunders on sites you visit.
You will see a notification when any popup is blocked. You can add sites to whitelist to
ignore this.
White list is synchronised to all chrome browsers that you are signed in.
Ghostery
Protect your privacy. See who's tracking your web browsing with Ghostery.
Silver Bird
Silver Bird is a Twitter extension that allows you to follow your timelines and interact with
your Twitter account.
WOT
WOT helps you find trustworthy websites based on millions of users’ experiences and is
one of Chrome’s most popular add-ons
Video Downloader professional
Download videos from web sites or just collect them in your video list without
downloading them.
Turn Off the Lights
The entire page will be fading to dark, so you can watch the videos as if you were in the
cinema
LastPass: Free Password Manager
LastPass, an award-winning password manager, saves your passwords and gives you
secure access from every computer and mobile device
Click&Clean
Deletes typed URLs, Cache, Cookies, your Download and Browsing History...instantly,
with just 1-click on Click&Clean button
Speed Dial [FVD]
New Tab Page Replacement with 3D Speed Dial and predefined images, sync and organize
your bookmarks, groups, and most visited
Facebook Invite All
Automatically invite all your facebook friends to Events or Pages with just one click
Todoist: To-Do list and Task Manager
Todoist is the leading online to-do list and task manager. We manage millions of to-dos and
we are ready to manage yours as well!
Emoji Input by EmojiStuff.com
Allows you to see and input emoji on any website. Can replace Twitter and Gmail style
emoji with iPhone style emoji.
Buffer
Buffer is the best way to share great content to Twitter, Facebook and LinkedIn from
anywhere on the web, with just one click.
Evernote Web Clipper
Use the Evernote extension to save things you see on the web into your Evernote account.
Tampermonkey
The most popular userscript manager for Blink-based browsers
feedly Mini
The easiest way to add content to your feedly.
Proxy SwitchySharp
Manage and switch between multiple proxies quickly & easily. Based on "Proxy Switchy!"
& "SwitchyPlus"
Pushbullet
Bringing together your devices, friends, and the things you care about.
RSS Feed Reader
Get a simple overview of your RSS and Atom feeds in the toolbar
For Mozilla Firefox : https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/extensions/
Adblock Plus
Adblock Plus blocks all annoying ads, and supports websites by not blocking unobtrusive
ads by default (configurable).
Video DownloadHelper
The easy way to download and convert Web videos from hundreds of YouTube-like sites.
NoScript Security Suite
The best security you can get in a web browser!
Allow active content to run only from sites you trust, and protect yourself against XSS and
Clickjacking attacks.
Ghostery
Protect your privacy. See who's tracking your web browsing and block them with Ghostery.
Speed Dial [FVD]
FVD Speed Dial - Speed dial button, Online Synchronization, New Tab Start Page,
Organize bookmarks, Custom backgrounds, custom dials, organized groups, most visited
dials.
Tab Mix Plus
Tab Mix Plus enhances Firefox's tab browsing capabilities. It includes such features as
duplicating tabs, controlling tab focus, tab clicking options, undo closed tabs and windows,
plus much more. It also includes a full-featured session manager.
YouTube Video and Audio Downloader
Downloads YouTube videos in all available formats (FLV, MP4, WebM, and 3GP) with
video quality of your choice. It also contains a pure JavaScript library to extract the
ORIGINAL audio file embedded in video files.
Web Developer
The Web Developer extension adds various web developer tools to the browser.
X-notifier (for Gmail,Hotmail,Yahoo,AOL ...)
Notifier for gmail, yahoo, hotmail, aol and more webmails.
X-notifier(aka WebMail Notifier) checks your webmail accounts and notifies the number of
unread emails...
Supports : gmail, yahoo, hotmail, POP3/IMAP, facebook, twitter and more
Web of Trust – WOT
Find out which websites you can trust. WOT adds intuitive traffic light-style icons next to
search results and URLs to help you make informed decisions about whether to visit a site
or not.
FoxyProxy Standard
FoxyProxy is an advanced proxy management tool that completely replaces Firefox's
limited proxying capabilities. For a simpler tool and less advanced configuration options,
please use FoxyProxy Basic.
Fastest Search - Browse/Shop Faster!
Search/browse/shop faster than ever! Ctrl-Shift-F for whole-word/regex/all tabs/diacritic
search;create custom engines;shopping assistant compares price;Smart SearchBox;Preview
results;Auto copy plain text, dnd save image/open link.
DownThemAll!
The first and only download manager/accelerator built inside Firefox!
LastPass Password Manager
LastPass, an award-winning password manager, saves your passwords and gives you
secure access from every computer and mobile device.
AutoProxy
Are you concerned about your privacy? Or, are you blocked from some websites by a
firewall? And, are you arming yourself with a proxy? In that case, AutoProxy is designed
for you! A tool to help you use your proxy automatically & efficiently.
KeeFox
Simple and secure password management. Login automatically, never forget another
password, stay in control of your passwords and improve their security. Powered by the
world-renowned KeePass Password Safe.
LeechBlock
LeechBlock is a simple productivity tool designed to block those time-wasting sites that can
suck the life out of your working day. All you need to do is specify which sites to block and
when to block them.
_______________
CHAPTER 13
Top Most
Hackers
_______________
Kevin Mitnick : a.k.a The Condor, The Darkside Hacker
Kevin David Mitnick (born August 6, 1963) is an American computer security consultant, author
and hacker.
He was once the most wanted cybercriminal in the world. He had an obsession with computers that
escalated into a two and half year hacking spree where he stole millions of dollars of corporate
secrets from IBM, Motorola, telecom companies and even the National Defense warning system.
At age 15, Mitnick used social engineering and dumpster diving to bypass the punch card system used
in the Los Angeles bus system. After a friendly bus driver told him where he could buy his own ticket
punch, he could ride any bus in the greater LA area using unused transfer slips he found in the trash.
Social engineering later became his primary method of obtaining information, including user-names
and passwords and modem phone numbers.
Mitnick first gained unauthorized access to a computer network in 1979, at 16, when a friend gave
him the phone number for the Ark, the computer system Digital Equipment Corporation (DEC) usedfor developing their RSTS/E operating system software. He broke into DEC's computer network andcopied their software, a crime he was charged with and convicted of in 1988. He was sentenced to 12
months in prison followed by three years of supervised release. Near the end of his supervised
release, Mitnick hacked into Pacific Bell voice mail computers. After a warrant was issued for his
arrest, Mitnick fled, becoming a fugitive for two and a half years.
According to the U.S. Department of Justice, Mitnick gained unauthorized access to dozens ofcomputer networks while he was a fugitive. He used cloned cellular phones to hide his location and,
among other things, copied valuable proprietary software from some of the country's largest cellular
telephone and computer companies. Mitnick also intercepted and stole computer passwords, altered
computer networks, and broke into and read private e-mail. Mitnick was apprehended on February15, 1995, in Raleigh, North Carolina. He was found with cloned cellular phones, more than 100 clone
cellular phone codes, and multiple pieces of false identification.
In 1999, he was convicted of various computer and communications-related crimes. At the time of his
arrest, he was the most-wanted computer criminal in the United States.
Since 2000, Mitnick has been a paid security consultant, public speaker and author. He does securityconsulting for Fortune 500 companies, performs penetration testing services for the world's largest
companies and teaches Social Engineering classes to dozens of companies and government agencies.
Vladimir Levin : a.k.a Vova
First internet bank robber
He is a Russian-born Jewish individual famed for his involvement in the attempt to fraudulently
transfer USD 10.7 million via Citibank's computers.
He was delivered into U.S. custody in September 1997, and tried in the United States District Courtfor the Southern District of New York. In his plea agreement he admitted to only one count of
conspiracy to defraud and to stealing US$3.7 million. In February 1998 he was convicted andsentenced to three years in jail, and ordered to make restitution of US$240,015. Citibank claimed that
all but US$400,000 of the stolen US$10.7 million had been recovered.
In 2005 an alleged member of the former St. Petersburg hacker group, claiming to be one of the
original Citibank penetrators, published under the name ArkanoiD a memorandum on popular
Provider.net.ru website dedicated to telecom market. According to him, Levin was not actually a
scientist (mathematician, biologist or the like) but a kind of ordinary system administrator who
managed to get hands on the ready data about how to penetrate in Citibank machines and then exploit
them.
ArkanoiD emphasized all the communications were carried over X.25 network and the Internet wasnot involved. ArkanoiD's group in 1994 found out Citibank systems were unprotected and it spent
several weeks examining the structure of the bank's USA-based networks remotely. Members of the
group played around with systems' tools (e.g. were installing and running games) and were unnoticed
by the bank's staff. Penetrators did not plan to conduct a robbery for their personal safety and stopped
their activities at some time. One of them later handed over the crucial access data to Levin(reportedly for the stated $100).
In 2005 an anonymous hacker group came claiming that they were the ones truly responsible for
the theft and that they only sold Vladimir the data needed to steal the money.
Gary Mckinnon : a.k.a Solo
He was known by his Internet handle, “Solo.” Using that name, he coordinated what wouldbecome the largest military computer hack of all time. The allegations are that he, over a 13-
month period from February 2001 to March 2002, illegally gained access to 97 computers
belonging to the U.S. Armed Forces and NASA.
He claimed that he was only searching for information related to free energy suppression and UFOactivity cover-ups. But according to U.S. authorities, he deleted a number of critical files, renderingover 300 computers inoperable and resulting in over $700,000 in damages.
Being of Scottish descent and operating out of the United Kingdom, he was able to dodge theAmerican government for a time. As of today, he continues to fight against extradition to the United
States.
Mathew Bevan (a.k.a Kuji) and Richard Pryce (a.k.a Datastream Cowboy)
This British hacking duo took the U.S. government for a ride when they attacked the Pentagon's
network for several weeks in 1994. They copied battlefield simulations from Griffiss Air Force Basein New York, intercepted messages from U.S. agents in North Korea, and got access into a Koreannuclear facility. Pryce was a 16-year-old then, and Bevan was 21 (he's thought to have been tutoring
Pryce).
The hacking attacks were especially troublesome for the U.S. government because they couldn't tell if
the duo was using their system to hack into a South or North Korea - if it were North Korea, theattacks could've been seen as an act of war. Luckily, South Korea was the hackers' target, and after an
international investigation, they were arrested in the following year.
Michael Calce : a.k.a MafiaBoy
He was a high school student from West Island, Quebec, who launched a series of highly
publicized denial-of-service attacks in February 2000 against large commercial websites,
including Yahoo!, Fifa.com, Amazon.com, Dell, Inc., E*TRADE, eBay, and CNN. He also launcheda series of failed simultaneous attacks against 9 of the 13 root name servers.
On February 7, 2000, Calce targeted Yahoo! with a project he named Rivolta, meaning “riot” inItalian. Rivolta was a denial-of-service attack in which servers become overloaded with different
types of communications to the point where they shut down completely. At the time, Yahoo! was a
multibillion dollar web company and the top search engine. Mafiaboy's Rivolta managed to shut
down Yahoo! for almost an hour. Calce's goal was, according to him, to establish dominance for
himself and TNT, his cybergroup, in the cyberworld. Buy.com was shut down in response. Calce
responded to this in turn by bringing down Ebay, CNN, Amazon and Dell.com via DDoS over thenext week.
In a 2011 interview, Calce tried to redeem his image by saying that the attacks had been launched
unwittingly, after inputting known addresses in a security tool he had downloaded from a repository
on the now defunct file-sharing platform Hotline, developed by Hotline Communications. Calcewould then have left for school, forgetting the application which continued the attacks during most of
the day. Upon coming home Calce found his computer crashed, and restarted it unaware of what had
gone on during the day. Calce claimed when he overheard the news and recognized the companies
mentioned being those he had inputted earlier in the day that he "started to understand what might have
happened".
Adrian Lamo : a.k.a The Homeless hacker
He was a mobile hacker who launched his work from the confines of Internet cafes, libraries or
cof ee shops. He actually did it just as a challenge and for fun, as he would regularly break into
computer systems and then immediately tell the owner of the network about its vulnerability. He
even made himself an expert by adding his name to the database of the New York Times.
Lamo first gained media attention for breaking into several high-profile computer networks, including
those of The New York Times, Yahoo!, and Microsoft, culminating in his 2003 arrest. In 2010, Lamo
reported U.S. soldier PFC Bradley Manning (now known as Chelsea Manning) to federal authorities,claiming that Manning had leaked hundreds of thousands of sensitive U.S. government documents toWikiLeaks. Manning was arrested and incarcerated in the U.S. military justice system and later
sentenced to 35 years in confinement.
Jeanson James Ancheta : a.k.a Resilient
He became the first person to be charged for controlling large numbers of hijacked computers or
botnets on May 9, 2006.
In 2004 he started to work with botnets rxbot, a computer worm that can spread his net of infected
computers which gave him control to 500,000 computers including US military computers.
In November 2005 he was captured in an elaborate sting operation when FBI agents lured him to theirlocal office on the pretext of collecting computer equipment. The arrest was part of the Operation Bot
Roast.
On May 9, 2006 Ancheta pleaded guilty to four felony charges of violating United States CodeSection 1030, Fraud and Related Activity in Connection with Computers. Ancheta must serve 60months in prison, forfeit a 1993 BMW and more than $58,000 in profit. He must also pay restitutionof $15,000 US to the U.S. federal government for infecting the military computers.
Jonathan James : a.k.a c0mrade
He (December 12, 1983 – May 18, 2008) was an American hacker who was the first juvenileincarcerated for cybercrime in the United States. The South Florida native was 15 years old at the
time of the first of ense and 16 years old on the date of his sentencing.
What is his ticket to fame? He was convicted and sent to prison for hacking in the United States–all
while he was still a minor. At only fifteen years of age, he managed to hack into a number of
networks, including those belonging to Bell South, Miami-Dade, the U.S. Department of Defense, andNASA.
Yes, James hacked into NASA’s network and downloaded enough source code to learn how the
International Space Station worked. The total value of the downloaded assets equaled $1.7 million.
To add insult to injury, NASA had to shut down their network for three whole weeks while they
investigated the breach, which cost them $41,000.
The story of James has a tragic ending, however. In 2007, a number of high profile companies fell
victim to a massive wave of malicious network attacks. Even though James denied any involvement,
he was suspected and investigated. In 2008, James committed suicide, believing he would be
convicted of crimes that he did not commit.
Albert Gonzalez
He paved his way to Internet fame when he collected over 170 million credit card and ATM card
numbers over a period of 2 years. Yep. That’s equal to a little over half the population of the
United States.
He started off as the leader of a hacker group known as ShadowCrew. This group would go on tosteal 1.5 million credit card numbers and sell them online for profit. ShadowCrew also fabricated
fraudulent passports, health insurance cards, and birth certificates for identity theft crimes totaling
$4.3 million stolen.
The big bucks wouldn’t come until later, when Gonzalez hacked into the databases of TJX Companiesand Heartland Payment Systems for their stored credit card numbers. In 2010, Gonzalez wassentenced to prison for 20 years (2 sentences of 20 years to be served out simultaneously).
Kevin Poulsen : a.k.a Dark Dante
He gained his fifteen minutes of fame by utilizing his intricate knowledge of telephone systems. At
one point, he hacked a radio station’s phone lines and fixed himself as the winning caller, earning
him a brand new Porsche. According to media, he was called the “Hannibal Lecter of computer
crime.”
He then earned his way onto the FBI’s wanted list when he hacked into federal systems and stole
wiretap information. Funny enough, he was later captured in a supermarket and sentenced to 51
months in prison, as well paying $56,000 in restitution.
Like Kevin Mitnick, Poulsen changed his ways after being released from prison. He began working as
a journalist and is now a senior editor for Wired News. At one point, he even helped law
enforcement to identify 744 sex offenders on MySpace.
Anonymous
The concept of being a “digital Robin Hood” was far from being conceived, but in the computer age,
it is very likely that someone somewhere has bagged this title. A “hacktivist group” called
Anonymous are known with the penname of being the “digital Robin Hood” amongst its supporters.
Identified in public by wearing a Guy Fawkes Masks, Anons, as they are widely known, havepublicized themselves by attacking the government, religious and corporate websites. The Vatican,
the FBI, the CIA, PayPal, Sony, Mastercard, Visa, Chinese, Israeli, Tunisian, and Ugandangovernments have been amongst their targets. Although, Anons have been arguing whether to engage
in a serious activism or a mere entertainment, many of the group members have clarified their intent
which is to attack internet censorship and control.
Anonymous originated in 2003 on the imageboard 4chan, representing the concept of many online and
offline community users simultaneously existing as an anarchic, digitized global brain.
Beginning with 2008's Project Chanology—a series of protests, pranks, and hacks targeting the
Church of Scientology—the Anonymous collective became increasingly associated withcollaborative hacktivism on a number of issues internationally. Individuals claiming to align
themselves with Anonymous undertook protests and other actions (including direct action) in
retaliation against anti-digital piracy campaigns by motion picture and recording industry trade
associations.
In 2012, Time called Anonymous one of the "100 most influential people" in the world.
Anons have publicly supported WikiLeaks and the Occupy movement. Related groups LulzSec andOperation AntiSec carried out cyberattacks on US government agencies, media, video gamecompanies, military contractors, military personnel, and police officers, resulting in the attention of
law enforcement to the groups' activities. It has been described as being anti-Zionist, and has
threatened to erase Israel from the Internet and engaged in the "#OpIsrael" cyber-attacks of Israeliwebsites on Yom HaShoah (Holocaust Remembrance Day) in 2013.
LulzSec
LulzSec or Lulz Security, a high profile, Black Hat hacker group, gained credentials for hacking intoSony, News International, CIA, FBI, Scotland Yard, and several noteworthy accounts. So notoriouswas the group that when it hacked into News Corporations account, they put across a false report of
Rupert Murdoch having passed away. While the group claims to have retired from their vile duties,
the motto of the group, “Laughing at your security since 2011!” stays alive. There are assertions of the
group having hacked into the websites of the newspapers like The Times and The Sun to post its
retirement news. Many, however, claim that this group had taken it upon itself to create awareness
about the absence of efficient security against hackers.
One of the founders of LulzSec was a computer security specialist who used the online moniker Sabu.
The man accused of being Sabu has helped law enforcement track down other members of the
organization as part of a plea deal. At least four associates of LulzSec were arrested in March 2012as part of this investigation. British authorities had previously announced the arrests of two teenagers
they allege are LulzSec members T-flow and Topiary.
Astra
Astra, a Sanskrit word for weapon was the penname of a hacker who dealt in the weapon stealing and
selling. A 58-year-old Greek Mathematician hacked into the systems of France’s Dassault Group,
stole vulnerable weapons technology data and sold it to different countries for five long years. While
the real identity of the ASTRA remains untraced, officials have said that he had been wanted since
2002. Astra sold the data to approximately 250 people from around the globe, which cost Dassault
$360 millions of damage.
